<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88115-0023 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-15-88.f2.A1022</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 10 / Friday, January 15, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Minerals Management Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">30 CFR Parts 202 and 206</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Revision of Gas Royalty Valuation Regulations and Related Topics</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Minerals Management Service (MMS), Interior.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This rulemaking provides for the amendment and clarificationof regulations governing valuation of gas for royalty computation purposes.The amended and clarified regulations govern the methods by which valueis determined when computing gas royalties and net profit shares underFederal (onshore and Outer Continental Shelf) and Indian (Tribal and allotted)oil and gas leases (except leases on the Osage Indian Reservation, OsageCounty, Oklahoma).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>March 1, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Dennis C. Whitcomb, Chief, Rulesand Procedures Branch, (303) 231-3432, (FTS) 326-3432.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The principal authors of this rulemakingare John L. Price, Scott L. Ellis, Thomas J. Blair, Stanley J. Brown, andWilliam H. Feldmiller of the Royalty Valuation and Standards Division ofthe Royalty Management Program (RMP), Minerals Management Service; DonaldT. Sant, Deputy Associate Director for Valuation and Audit, Minerals ManagementService; and Peter J. Schaumberg of the Office of the Solicitor, Washington,DC. <ITAG tagnum="84">I. Introduction</ITAG>On February 13, 1987, 52 FR 4732, MMS issued a notice of proposed rulemakingto amend the regulations governing the valuation of gas from Federal leasesonshore and on the Outer Continental Shelf (OCS), and from Indian Tribaland allotted leases. During the public comment period, MMS received almost100 written comments. In addition, public hearings were held in Lakewood,Colorado, on April 7, 1987, and in Houston, Texas, on April 28, 1987. Sixteenpersons made oral presentations at those hearings.Because of the complexity of the regulations, and in accordance with MMS'sunderstanding with the Congress, MMS issued a further notice of proposedrulemaking on August 17, 1987 (52 FR 30776), which included as an appendixMMS's draft of the final regulations. The purpose of the further noticeof proposed rulemaking was to obtain further public comment during a shortcomment period and then to make any necessary revisions to the final regulations.See Conference Report on H.R. 1827, in the <T3>Congressional Record </T3>of June 27, 1987, pages H5651-H5666.The public comment period on the first further notice of proposed rulemakingwas scheduled to close on September 2, 1987, but was extended to September11, 1987 (52 FR 33247, Sept. 2, 1987). On September 21, 1987, MMS issueda Notice of Intent to Issue a Second Further Notice of Proposed Rulemaking(52 FR 35451). In that Notice, MMS stated that all comments received onthe Further Notice of Proposed Rulemaking and the first draft final ruleswould be included in the rulemaking record for this rule, even if theywere received after September 11.In addition to receiving written comments on the first draft final rules,MMS held several meetings with representatives from the States, Indianlessors, and industry in an effort to develop a set of regulations whichwere acceptable generally to all groups, though not a panacea for any oneof them. Each of the groups exhibited a commendable willingness to makepositive contributions to the process and, where necessary, to reach compromises.In a further effort to ensure that all of the interested constituencieshad a full and fair opportunity to comment upon the gas valuation rulesfollowing the several meetings and MMS's review of the written comments,MMS issued a second further notice of proposed rulemaking and second draftfinal rules (52 FR 39792, October 23, 1987). Public comments were receivedfor 30 days. Over 35 additional comments were submitted in response tothe second further notice of proposed rulemaking. Many commenters repeatedcomments that had been submitted in response to earlier requests for comments.However, MMS did receive additional comments, particularly on sectionswhich were changed. All comments were reviewed and considered in draftingthe final rules.The MMS has considered carefully all of the public comments received duringthis rulemaking process, which included draft rules and input from theRoyalty Management Advisory Committee (RMAC), proposed rules, and furthernotices of proposed rulemaking with draft final rules. A complete accountof the RMAC process is included in the preamble to the proposed regulationsissued in February 1987. Based on its review, MMS hereby adopts final regulationsgoverning the valuation of gas from Federal and Indian leases. These regulationswill apply prospectively to gas production on or after the effective datespecified in the DATES section of this preamble.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Purpose and Background</ITAG>The MMS has revised the current regulations regarding the valuation ofgas to accomplish the following:(1) Clarification and reorganization of the existing regulations at 30CFR Parts 202 and 206.(2) Creation of regulations consistent with the present organizationalstructure of the Department of the Interior (DOI).(3) Placement of the gas royalty valuation regulations in a format compatiblewith the valuation regulations for all leasable minerals.(4) Clarification that royalty is to be paid on all consideration receivedby lessees, less applicable allowances, for production removed or soldfrom the lease.(5) Creation of regulations to guide the lessee in the determination ofallowable transportation and processing costs for gas to aid in the calculationof proper royalty due the lessor.A number of sections have been renumbered and/or moved to a new subpart.In Part 202, existing andSection;andSection; 202.150, 202.151, and 202.152of Subpart D, were redesignated as new sections under Subparts B and Cand new andSection;andSection; 202.150, 202.151 and 202.152 were added. Sections206.150, 206.151, and 206.152 under Part 206, Subpart D, have been revised.In addition, new andSection;andSection; 206.153, 206.154, 206.155, 206.156,206.157, 206.158, and 206.159 have been added to Subpart D of Part 206.Several general provisions which relate to both oil and gas have been addedto Part 202. These provisions are included in the final rule to amend theoil valuation regulations also being published by the Department elsewherein today's <T4>Federal Register.</T4>This rule applies prospectively to gas production on or after the effectivedate of this rule. It supersedes all existing gas royalty valuation directivescontained in numerous Secretarial, Minerals Management Service, and U.S.Geological Survey Conservation Division (now Bureau of Land Management,Onshore Operations) orders, directives, regulations, and Notices to Lessees(NTL) issued over past years, particularly NTL-5 (42 FR 22610, May 4, 1977,as amended; 51 FR 26759, July 25, 1986). Specific guidelines governingreporting requirements consistent with these new gas valuation regulationswill be incorporated into the MMS Payor Handbook.For the convenience of oil and gas lessees, payors, and the public, thefollowing chart summarizes the effects of these rules.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Regulation changes </H1><H1>Descriptions</H1>I. Redesignations:<ITAG tagnum="12"/><T3>Part 202:</T3> <ITAG tagnum="3">Sections 202.150, 202.151 and 202.152 under Subpart D are redesignatedas new andSection; 202.100, under Subpart C and new andSection;andSection; 202.53and 202.52, under Subpart B, respectively </ITAG><D>This administrative action more appropriately locates within Part 202the information contained in these sections.</D>II. Removals:<ITAG tagnum="12"/><T3>Part 206:</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Sections 206.106 and 206.107 are removed from Subpart C </ITAG><D>These requirements have been incorporated into new andSection;andSection;202.150 and 202.151 in Part 202.</D>III. Additions:<ITAG tagnum="12">1. </ITAG><T3>Part 202:</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">New andSection;andSection; 202.150, 202.151, and 202.152 are added to SubpartD </ITAG><D>These new sections provide gas valuation standards and</D><ITAG tagnum="12">2. </ITAG><T3>Part 206:</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">New andSection;andSection; 206.10, 206.153, 206.154, 206.155, 206.156,206.157, 206.158, and 206.159 are added to Subparts A and D </ITAG><D>These new sections provide gas valuation standards and procedures andidentify allowable costs for transportation and processing to be deductedfrom gas royalty value.</D></ITAG>The rules in andSection; 206.150 expressly recognize that where the provisionsof any Indian lease, or any statute or treaty affecting Indian leases,are inconsistent with the regulations, then the lease term, statute, ortreaty governs to the extent of the inconsistency. The same principle appliesto Federal leases.A separate gas definitions section applicable to the royalty valuationof gas is included in this rulemaking in Part 206. All definitions containedunder each subpart of Part 206 will be applicable to the regulations containedin Parts 202, 203, 207, 210, and 241.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Response to General Comments Received on the Proposed Gas ValuationRegulations and Related Topics</ITAG>The notice of proposed rulemaking for the amendment and clarification ofregulations governing valuation of gas for royalty computation purposeswas published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on February 13, 1987 (52 FR 4732). This was followedby a Further Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (52 FR 30776, Aug. 17, 1987),and a Second Further Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (52 FR 39792, October23, 1987). Over 200 comments were received from interested persons includingIndian lessors, the States, and industry.The Indian commenters included tribal groups, a tribal council, and Indiantrade groups. Various government agencies, including State entities, Federalagencies, State associations, State Governors, and local governments alsocommented. Industry commenters included oil and gas companies, individualcommenters, and several industry trade groups.Many commenters made comments on the basic issues and principles underlyingthe proposed rulemaking without addressing specific sections of the proposedregulations, but addressing the basic premise underlying the proposed valuationmethodology. These comments generally were repeated in response to thefirst and second notices of further proposed rulemaking.The respondents were generally composed of two groups, with industry generallyon one side and States, Indians, and local governments on the other. Industrygenerally endorsed the basic principles underlying the proposed regulations.Although the industry commenters objected to many of the specific provisionsof the proposed and draft rules, they stated generally that a market-orientedapproach based on gross proceeds from arm's-length contracts would fulfillMMS's goals of creating royalty certainty, fairness, and long-term revenuemaximization. Some industry commenters advocated the adoption, in total,of the Royalty Management Advisory Committee (RMAC) Gas Panel's recommendationsas the only proper solution to the valuation issue. States, Indians, andlocal governments, on the other hand, generally objected to the basic premiseof the proposed valuation methodology that gross proceeds from arm's-lengthcontracts represent value. They also objected to other parts of the proposedregulations for a variety of reasons.The general comments raised by industry, States, and Indians may be categorizedsimilarly to those raised with respect to the oil valuation regulations:(1) Acceptance of gross proceeds under an arm's-length contract, or thebenchmarks, as the value for royalty purposes; (2) deduction of transportationcosts; (3) legal mandates and responsibilities toward Indians; (4) complexityand obscurity of regulations and definitions; and (5) economic impacts.Because the general issues raised and MMS's responses thereto are so similar,MMS hereby incorporates the discussion in the General Comments portionof Section III of the Preamble to the final oil valuation regulations publishedelsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register, </T4>as if fully and completely set forth herein.The Further Notice of Proposed Rulemaking of August 17, 1987 (52 FR 30776),and the Second Further Notice of Proposed Rulemaking of October 23, 1987(52 FR 39792), specifically requested comments on certain broad issues.These issues were whether there were additional requirements or approacheswhich would improve the royalty payment process, the ability of auditorsto determine compliance with these regulations and the extent to whichthese rules were responsive to concerns regarding royalty underpaymentsidentified in the Linowes Commission Report and reports of the Congress,the General Accounting Office, and the Department's Office of InspectorGeneral.A number of comments were received on additional requirements or approacheswhich would improve the royalty payment process. Some of the commentersstated that improvement had been made, but the provisions in the draftfinal rules attempting to ensure that a lessee had acted prudently hadremoved some of the certainty of earlier versions. These commenters suggestedthat MMS recognize that lessees act prudently in contract negotiationsand allow royalty to be based on these contracts.One commenter recommended that regulations must be revised as soon as therequirements of those provisions are identified as creating problems forlessees and MMS. One Indian commenter suggested that MMS establish an Indianaudit branch and a special Indian valuation office.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS does believe that the vast majority of lesseesact prudently in contract negotiations and that values for royalty purposeswill be set by the terms of those contracts. Therefore, the provisionsof the final regulations providing MMS with the ability to assure thatvalues are set only by the terms of arm's-length contracts that have beenprudently negotiated should not detract from the improvements made overthe existing regulations.The suggestion that timely revisions to regulatory provisions be made toalleviate problems is well received by MMS. Many reports have stated thatthe area of product valuation was long ignored by the Department. MMS believesthat the dialogue with industry, States, and Indians over the last fewyears has been invaluable in leading to these final rules, and it is anticipatedthat communication will continue so that necessary revisions to any ofthe provisions of the final rules adopted today will be timely promulgated.It is clear from the requirements of the final rules that MMS must becomeincreasingly familiar with the transactions occurring in those areas whereFederal and Indian lands are situated. Many of the Indian lands under theDepartment's jurisdiction are in close proximity to Federal lands and purchasersof production from these areas often are the same. Although MMS expectsthat the increased awareness of the marketplace and the already high prioritygiven audits of Indian leases will suffice in assuring compliance withthese rules, MMS will study the suggestion for separate audit and valuationoffices for Indian lands.Most of the commenters addressing the ability of auditors to determinecompliance with these regulations suggested the establishment of guidelinesgoverning audit closure rather than addressing the specific issue. A fewcommenters stated that clear regulations with timely revisions would enhancethe ability of auditors to determine compliance. One commenter stated thatthe difficulty in determining if any consideration outside of the contractexists, the lack of any provisions for approval of non-arm's-length contracts,the burden on auditors to show control and administer the benchmark system,and the lack of independent cross-checks on values all act as impedimentsto auditors in determining compliance with the regulations.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS agrees that regulations that are clear andunderstandable and timely revision of provisions causing problems enhancean auditor's ability to determine compliance with those regulations. TheMMS agrees that it is difficult to identify consideration that exists outsideof a contract. However, it is no more difficult than determining whetheror not the requirement under current regulations that a lessee pay royaltiesbased upon its gross proceeds has been met when part of the considerationreceived by the lessee is not covered by the sales contract. Similarly,approval of non-arm's-length contracts would not improve an auditor's abilityto determine compliance. Approval of non-arm's-length contracts would notassure that the lessee has provided documentation of all considerationto be received in the transaction. Further, the resources that would benecessary to approve all non-arm's-length contracts and any amendmentsthereto would be overwhelming. The MMS does recognize that demonstratingcontrol will be somewhat burdensome on auditors. However, showing controland the valuation of the gas sold under that contract under the benchmarksystem does not mean that the gross proceeds under that contract will notbe accepted as defining value. Also, there are tests in the final rulesthat will result in the valuing of the gas under the benchmark system ifthe value under an arm's-length contract is unreasonable because of misconductor a breach of the lessee's duty to market the gas for the mutual benefitof the lessee and the lessor. Finally, MMS does not agree that the benchmarksystem will be difficult to administer or that there will be a lack ofcross-checks. As stated above, MMS realizes that it must become increasinglyfamiliar with transactions occurring in the areas where Federal and Indianleases are situated. By becoming more familiar and obtaining sales volumeand price information, MMS will be able to identify anomalies that existand review the circumstances involved in those transactions.Two commenters stated that the changes in the valuation regulations andother changes implemented by the Department were responsive to the concernsaddressed by the Linowes Commission and others. One commenter stated thatthe regulations were not responsive to the concerns addressed by the LinowesCommission because States' suggestions were ignored, and the regulationswere open to interpretation in many areas and lacked independent cross-checks.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that the regulations adopted todayaddress most of the concerns of the Linowes Commission and others. Clarityand a great deal of certainty have been added to replace the vague requirementsof the existing regulations which were identified as the major contributorto the undervaluing of production. The MMS does not agree that the concernsof States were ignored. Representatives of States have been involved inevery step of the long process leading to these final rules and many ofthe provisions in the final rules directly reflect suggestions made byStates. Although MMS does not agree that the final rules are as open tointerpretation as suggested by this commenter, MMS intends to supplementthese rules with chapters in the MMS Payor Handbook specifically dealingwith all areas of valuation. The MMS will be able to identify anomaliesin reported values and allowances by monitoring information reported toit and comparing reported information with other reported information andinformation collected independently by MMS. The MMS believes that suchmonitoring of reported values and allowances meets the requirement forcross-checks called for by the Linowes Commission.The Second Further Notice of Proposed Rulemaking also specifically requestedcomments on certain individual issues. These issues were: (1) The feasibilityof a larger scale royalty-in-kind program, particularly including gas;(2) whether or not the oil and gas valuation regulations should be consolidated;(3) whether or not the provisions dealing with extraordinary cost allowancesrelating to gas production and gas processing should be retained; (4) thepractical limit on the term ``relative'' used in the definition of arm's-lengthcontract; (5) whether or not allowances for certain post-production costsshould be added; and (6) the allocation of transportation costs among products.The comments received regarding a royalty-in-kind program for gas wereevenly divided. Half of the commenters recommended that MMS take its gasroyalty in-kind, particularly when there is a disagreement over the valueof the gas. However, most of these commenters suggested a separate rulemakingto address the complicated issues involved in such a program. The otherhalf of the commenters stated that MMS should not implement a royalty-in-kindprogram for gas because of the complications of such a program.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS agrees that a royalty-in-kind program forgas is too complicated to be implemented without an in-depth study of allof the issues involved.The commenters addressing the consolidation of the oil and gas valuationregulations either rejected the idea altogether or suggested deferringany attempt to do so until after the separate regulations are issued asfinal rules.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS agrees that consolidation could not be accomplishedin a timely manner and that experience with the separate rules should beobtained to identify if a need for consolidation exists.The comments received concerning the remaining four issues will be addressedin later sections of this preamble dealing with the regulatory provisionsspecifically concerning those issues.The MMS will monitor the operation and effect of the rules being adoptedtoday. In 3 years, MMS will review the results of its analysis to determineif any significant changes to the regulations are required. In the meantime,technical and minor adjustments to the rules will be made as necessary.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Section-by-Section Analysis and Response to Comments</ITAG>Comments were not received on every section of the proposed regulations.Therefore, if those sections were not changed significantly from the proposal,there generally is no further discussion in this preamble. The preambleto the proposed regulation (52 FR 4732, Feb. 13, 1987) may be consultedfor a full description of the purposes of those sections. For other sections,this preamble will address primarily the extent to which the final rulewas changed from the proposal or, in some instances, from the draft finalrules. Again, a complete discussion of the applicable sections may be foundin the preamble to the proposed regulation.The mineral leasing laws require that the Secretary receive a royalty onthe ``value of production'' from minerals produced from Federal lands,but value is a word without precise definition. ``Men have all but driventhemselves mad in an effort to definitize its meaning.'' <T3>Andrews v. Commissioner of Internal Revenue,</T3> 135 F.2d 314, 317(2nd Cir. 1943). The word ``value'' has sometimes been modified by thewords ``fair market'', although the mineral leasing law provisions on ``valueof production'' do not include these words. But, these adjectives do notreally clarify the word value. The word ``fair'' can modify the word valueas in ``fair value'' or it can modify the word market as in ``fair market.''The term ``fair value'' may not be interpreted the same as the ``fair market''value. The term fair market value, however, has been generally acceptedto be the price received by a willing and knowledgeable seller not obligatedto sell from a willing and knowledgeable buyer not obligated to buy. Willing,knowledgeable, and obligated are again adjectives which are not terms ofprecise definition. These general concepts, however, were still the generalprinciples which were followed in drafting these regulations on valuationof production for the purposes of calculating royalties. The general presumptionis that persons buying or selling products from Federal and Indian leasesare willing, knowledgeable, and not obligated to buy or sell. Because theU.S. economy is built upon a system in which individuals are provided theopportunity to advance their individual self interest, this seems to bea reasonable presumption. This system and its reliance on self-motivatedindividuals to engage in transactions which are to their own best interest,therefore, is a cornerstone of the regulations.The purpose of the regulations is to define the value of production, forroyalty purposes, for production from Federal and Indian lands. Value canbe determined in different ways, and these rules explain how value is tobe established in different circumstances. Value in these regulations generallyis determined by prices set by individuals of opposing economic intereststransacting business between themselves. Prices received for the sale ofproducts from Federal and Indian leases pursuant to arm's-length contractsare often accepted as value for royalty purposes. However, even for somearm's-length contracts, contract prices may not be used for value purposesif the lease terms provide for other measures of value (such as Indianleases) or when there is a reason to suspect the bona fide nature of aparticular transaction. Even the alternative valuation methods, however,are determined by reference to prices received by individuals buying orselling like-quality products in the same general area who have opposingeconomic interests. Also, in no instance can value be less than the amountreceived by a lessee in a particular transaction.Section 202.150 Royalty on gas.Indian commenters recommended that paragraph (a) should provide specificallythat Indian lessors, as well as MMS, have the right to require paymentin-kind for royalties due on production.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> Most Indian lessors have the authority to requirepayment in-kind for royalties due on production. To the extent the leaseterms so provide, the lessor may take its royalty-in-kind. However, becauserequests to take royalty-in-kind may involve operational difficulties forthe lessee, as well as a change in accounting and reporting proceduresnecessary for MMS to properly monitor royalty obligations, MMS will continueto administer such requests. Therefore, if an Indian lessor wants royalty-in-kind,he or she must contract MMS. The MMS then will make arrangements with thelessee for the in-kind payment.The MMS also has added a provision clarifying that when royalties are paidin value, the royalties due are equal to the value, for royalty purposes,multiplied by the royalty rate.Section 202.150(b).The MMS received many industry comments stating that unavoidably flaredgas should be exempt from royalty requirements. Commenters stated thatthe definition of the term ``unavoidably lost'' should be incorporatedin andSection; 206.151, Definitions. The commenters also recommended thatthis paragraph address the procedures for obtaining permission to use gasoff-lease for the benefit of the lease.One industry commenter recommended deletion of the phrase ``when such off-leaseuse is permitted by the appropriate agency.'' The commenter recommendedthat legal interpretations affecting the inclusion of any on-lease or off-leaseuse could be more appropriately covered in the MMS Payor Handbook.Industry commenters also stated that on-lease or off-lease royalty-freegas use should also include gas used in post-production operations, includingboosting residue gas delivery pressure and other operations incidentalto marketing, because this gas is used for the benefit of the lease.One industry commenter recommended the inclusion of the following language:``Gas used for the benefit of the lease in royalty free, which includesgas used in lease equipment located on a platform or in a central facilityserving multiple leases. Such platform or central facility may be locatedon a lease other than the one physically providing gas used.''One industry commenter did not agree that the standard for royalty liabilitydetailed in this paragraph is consistent with section 308 of the FederalOil and Gas Royalty Management Act of 1982 (FOGRMA), 30 U.S.C. 1756, whichlimits royalty liability to loss or waste owing to negligence or noncompliancewith operational requirements.Two industry commenters proposed that MMS consider expansion of the clauseto include all gas used ``on or off a lease as long as it is for the benefitof the lease.'' Industry commenters endorsed MMS's decision that gas used off-lease forthe benefit of the lease is royalty-free when such use is permitted bythe appropriate agency. Some Indian commenters also recommended that any royalty-free use of gasbe subject to prior approval to ensure that production from Indian leasesis not disproportionately used in royalty-free operations. <T3>MMS Response:</T3> The determination of whether or not gas has beenunavoidably or avoidably lost and whether or not gas used is royalty-free(whether used off-lease or on-lease) are operational matters covered bythe appropriate regulations of the Bureau of Land Management (BLM) andMMS for onshore and offshore operations, respectively. The BLM's requirementsare governed by the provisions of 43 CFR Part 3160 and Notice of Lesseesand Operators No. 4A. The MMS's requirements are governed by the provisionsof 30 CFR Part 250. Therefore, although these comments raised many substantiveissues, they are not properly addressed in this rulemaking. The MMS doesnot believe that prior approval for royalty-free use of gas is warrantedbecause most leases, by their specific terms, allow royalty-free use ofgas and it is a matter which will be reviewed during audits to preventabuse. Proposed andSection; 202.150(b)(2), which addressed royalty-free use of gasfor leases committed to unit or communitization agreements, has been expandedin the final rules to also cover production facilities handling productionfrom more than one lease with the approval of the appropriate agency. AlthoughMMS is satisfied that this issue is an operational matter governed sufficientlyby the appropriate operation of the unit agreement or communitization agreementand BLM's and MMS's regulations, the number of comments received regardingthis issue led MMS to believe that reiterating these operational requirementswas advisable. This regulation simply provides that a disproportionateshare of the fuel consumed at a production facility serving mutliple leasesmay not be allocated to an individual lease without incurring a royaltyobligation on a portion of the fuel. One industry commenter was strongly in agreement with andSection; 202.150(b)(3)of the proposed rules, which recognizes the provisions of Indian leasesthat are inconsistent with the regulations. One Indian commenter stated that this paragraph may not act to the benefitof Indian lessees unless MMS makes a specific requirement by instruction,manual releases, or notices to lessees with respect to the specific valuationguidelines to be applied. <T3>MMS Response:</T3> The provisions of proposed andSection; 202.150(b)(3)were adopted in the final rules. In most instances, the valuation regulationswill apply equally to both Federal and Indian leases. This section coversany leases which may be inconsistent with the regulations. The final regulationsrecognize the primacy of statutes, treaties, and oil and gas leases andprovide a means for dealing with special valuation requirements for bothIndian and Federal leases. In many instances, lease terms are modifiedby unitization or communitization agreements. The reference to ``leases''in the regulations means the lease terms as modified by any such agreement,where appropriate. Section 202.150(c). Section 202.150(c) was proposed as andSection; 206.150(d). It provides thatif the BLM (for onshore leases) or MMS (for offshore leases) determinesthat gas was avoidably lost or wasted, then the value of that gas willbe determined in accordance with Part 206. This section also applies togas drained from onshore leases for which BLM determines that compensatoryroyalty is due. One industry commenter stated that the term ``avoidable'' indicates thatsuch losses could have been anticipated and eliminated and that seriouscharges like these should be documented and proven, not merely assumedafter the loss has been reported. Therefore, the commenter takes exceptionto this regulation. <T3>MMS Response:</T3> Avoidably lost determinations are handled by personnelresponsible for lease management operations, BLM onshore and MMS offshore,and are not a valuation issue. Any operator or lessee that BLM or MMS notifiesof an avoidable loss determination has the right to appeal the determinationif it is believed to be unjust or unfair. One Indian commenter stated that payment should be due for the entire value,and not just the royalty portion of gas that is determined to have beenavoidably lost or wasted from Indian leases. One industry commenter stated that it should be made clear in this provisionthat the amount due for avoidably lost gas should be a royalty value andnot the total value (100 percent). <T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS policy for offshore leases is to assessonly royalty for gas determined to have been avoidably lost. This alsois BLM's policy for onshore leases for gas avoidably lost on and afterOctober 22, 1984. This date is the effective date of BLM's revised regulationsat 43 CFR 3162.7-1(d) (49 FR 37356, September 21, 1984), which includedthe provision for royalty on avoidably lost gas in accordance with Section308 of FOGRMA, 30 U.S.C. 1756. The MMS and the BLM believe that collectionof royalty provides an effective deterrent to wasting gas. Section 202.150(d). Section 202.150(d) was proposed as andSection; 206.150(e) and requires royaltiesto be paid on insurance compensation for unavoidably lost gas. Several industry commenters stated that to require a lessee to pay royaltieson any compensation received ``through insurance coverage or other arrangementsfor gas unavoidably lost is unfair.'' They stated that insurance proceedsare not received for the sale of production and should not be subject tosharing with the lessor. They believe, however, that if MMS insists oncollecting a portion of such proceeds, the cost of such insurance coverageshould be allowed as a deduction from royalty. The MMS removed the insurance compensation section from the first draftfinal rule. Many Indian and State commenters thought this change was unfair,stating that if the lessee was compensated for the production, the lessorshould than receive its royalty share. <T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has reinstated this provision in the finalrules. However, royalties are due only if the lessee receives insurancecompensation from a third person. No royalty is due where the lessee selfinsures. Section 202.150(e). Several industry commenters opposed andSection; 202.150(e), which was proposedas andSection; 202.150(c). They questioned the authority to require othernon-Federal/Indian lessees to pay royalties on leases on which they arenot the lessee. According to the commenters, this could present gas balancingproblems where production taken by a lessee falls below that lessee's productionentitlement. These commenters suggested that proposed andSection; 202.150(c)fails to recognize the marketing aspects of production. Although MMS attemptedto clarify the purpose and scope of this section in the draft final rules,many additional comments were received. Many industry commenters commentedthat a requirement to pay royalties based upon what other unit participantsreceive for the gas raises many problems of information gathering makingtimely and accurate reporting of royalties extremely difficult. These commenterssuggested alternatives such as allowing a lessee to pay royalties basedupon its own contract price or allowing a lessee to pay royalties basedupon the volume of production it actually sold. <T3>MMS Response:</T3> Section 202.150(e) of the final rules states thatall production attributable to a Federal or Indian lease under the termsof the agreement is subject to the royalty payment and reporting requirementsof Title 30 of the Code of Federal Regulations even if an agreement participantactually taking the production is not the lessee of the Federal or Indianlease. Only a few concerns were expressed about this requirement and manycommenters supported it. Most important, however, andSection; 202.150(e)requires generally that the value, for royalty purposes, of this productionbe determined in accordance with 30 CFR Part 206 under the circumstancesinvolved in the actual disposition of the production. As an example, ifa Federal lessee does not sell or otherwise dispose of its allocable shareof unit production, it will be sold or otherwise disposed of by other unitparticipants. If one of the unit participants other than the Federal lesseetransports unprocessed gas to a sales point off the unit area under anarm's-length transportation agreement and then sells the gas under an arm's-lengthsales contract, the value, for royalty purposes, will be that participant'sgross proceeds less the costs of transportation incurred under the arm's-lengthtransportation agreement. This provision does not address the issue ofwhat participant must report and pay the royalties; it only addresses theissue of valuation. These rules do not require non-Federal and non-Indian lessees to conformto these regulations for valuing production. The MMS merely has requiredthat the lessee must determine its royalty liability in accordance withthe other interest owners' contracts or proceeds as long as those royaltiescomply with these value regulations. Any gas balancing problem that mayexist because of interest owners taking more than their entitlement isa matter to be settled by the agreement members. The MMS has added a new paragraph (3) to the final rules to clarify thatall agreement participants actually taking volumes in excess of their allocatedshare of production in any month are deemed to have taken ratably fromall persons taking less than their proportionate share. The MMS decidedthat such a provision was required to provide certainty as to which unitparticipants' dispositions the lessee must consider to satisfy the requirementsof this provision, especially where there is no balancing agreement amongthe unit participants. Two industry commenters also stated that the foreseeable results of thisparagraph includes: ``* * * (1) chronic late payments of royalties; (2)inconsistent AFS and PAAS reporting; (3) difficulty in determining properroyalty values where the overproduced working interest owners dispose ofproduction pursuant to non-arm's-length transactions; and (4) excessiveaccounting and administrative costs for MMS and all working interest owners.''<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that lessees generally will beable to comply with the requirements of the regulations. However, MMS hasadded a new paragraph (2) which authorizes MMS to approve a royalty valuationmethod different from that prescribed by paragraph (1) to value any volumesof agreement production allocated to a lessee but which the lessee doesnot take. The lessee must request the exception and MMS may approve itonly if it is consistent with the purposes of the regulations. For example,under a unit agreement a Federal lessee may be entitled to 100,000 mcfof production. The lessee is required to pay royalty on that volume. However,the lessee is able to sell only 75,000 mcf under its arm's-length contractthat month. The lessee could request that MMS allow it to pay royalty onthe remaining 25,000 mcf at its contract price. The MMS recognizes that under most balancing agreements, a lessee who hasundertaken at some point will overtake to balance its account. Becausethe lessee was required to pay royalties on the value of its allocatedshare when it undertook, the lessee is not required to pay additional royaltiesfor prior periods for that lease when it subsequently over takes. Again,royalties are due only on the allocated share of agreement production evenwhen the lessee takes and sells a greater volume. The MMS has added a newparagraph (4) to clarify this issue. Some industry commenters recommended that paying and reporting royaltiesbe accomplished solely on the basis of sales. According to these comments,because royalties will have been paid on total sales from the leases, thereshould be no decrease in royalty payments due over the life of the leasethrough the use of the sales approach. <T3>MMS Response:</T3> Paying and reporting royalty solely on the basisof sales would not conform to the requirements of the federally approvedagreement or the terms of the lease. It also could cause a hardship forIndian lessors who rely on a steady stream of revenues when there is productionfrom their leases. Therefore, it is not an acceptable procedure. In response to comments that the valuation method for production from unitizationand communitization agreements required by the proposed and draft rulescould cause royalty calculation and reporting problems for lessees, MMSis including in the final rules in subsection (f) an exception authorityfor valuing production from Federal and Indian leases committed to agreements.The authority is discretionary and may be exercised where the lessee requestsan alternative method, the proposal is consistent with applicable statutes,lease terms and agreement terms, to the extent practical, persons withan interest in the agreement are notified and given an opportunity to comment,and, to the extent practical, all persons with an interest in a Federalor Indian lease committed to the agreement agree to use the proposed method.Section 202.151 Royalty on processed gas. Section 202.151(a). Some commenters recommended deleting the word ``reasonable'' before thewords ``actual costs'' in paragraph (a) because the lessee should be ableto deduct actual costs from the processed gas value. One commenter statedthat condensate recovered without resorting to processing should not beincluded in calculating royalty if the condensate is not allocated to thelease. <T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS's policy is to allow ``reasonable'' actualcosts incurred by the lessee for processing lease production. The MMS doesnot believe that it should share in unreasonable costs and has not adoptedthis suggestion. The MMS does not agree that a lessee should be allowedto remove production from the lease and avoid the royalty obligation forany part of that production. Therefore, MMS will retain the requirementthat condensate recovered without resorting to processing be included whendetermining the value of gas that is processed. The MMS received a comment regarding the requirement for dual accountingin andSection; 206.155. That commenter stated that dual accounting shouldbe required in all instances where gas is processed from onshore Federaland Indian leases, because that is the only way to ensure that royaltyis paid on that portion of the gas stream leaving the lease which becomesa liquid during the transmission of the gas to the plant. These liquidsare commonly referred to as drip condensate. The commenter pointed outthat in many instances the company transporting the gas retains these liquidsand the lessee makes no royalty payment for this portion of the productionremoved from the Federal or Indian lease.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: As the commenter properly pointed out, royalty isdue on all gas production removed from the lease, including any gas whichbecomes a liquid during transmission to a gas plant. When gas is sold atthe lease and the lessee does not retain or exercise the right to processthe gas, the total gas production removed from the lease is properly accountedfor at that point. Thus, the issue of royalty on drip condensate is notinvolved in these instances.When gas is processed by the lessee, any portion of the gas removed fromthe lease which becomes a liquid during transmission to a gas plant mustbe accounted for to properly define the value of the total gas productionremoved from the lease upon which royalty is due. Although MMS is not adoptingthe recommendation to require dual accounting in all instances where gasis processed, MMS is modifying the final rules in andSection; 202.151 andandSection; 206.153 to specify this requirement. Therefore, it is being madeclear that the value of gas which is processed by a lessee must includethe combined values of the residue gas, all gas plant products <T3>and </T3>any condensate recovered downstream of the point of royaltysettlement without resorting to processing.Section 202.151(b).Several industry commenters stated that an allowance for boosting residuegas should be allowed under paragraph (b) for operation of the processingplant. The rationale was that costs associated with this process are incurredas a result of processing and should not be regarded as costs necessaryto place the gas in marketable condition.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: The regulations specify the MMS's policy that thelessee is required to condition the production for market. The cost forboosting residue gas is considered as a cost necessary to place the gasin marketable condition, and will not be an allowable deduction.Three industry commenters recommended deleting the word ``reasonable''before the words ``* * * amount of residue gas * * *'' and allowing actualamounts of residue gas used to be royalty-free. Indian commenters wereconcerned that the regulation should specify that residue gas could notbe disproportionately charged to their leases royalty-free.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: Historically, MMS's policy has been to allow a reasonableamount of residue gas to be royalty-free for the operation of a processingplant. In most instances the actual amounts of residue gas used are consideredto be reasonable. However, the final rule specifies that only a lease'sproportionate share of the residue gas necessary for the operation of theprocessing plant may be allowed royalty-free. Although adopted in responseto the concerns of Indian commenters, this provision is equally applicableto all Federal and Indian leases.Section 202.151(c).Two industry commenters strongly endorsed the language set forth in paragraph(c).One Indian commenter stated that ``* * * the Secretary should not retainunilateral authority to authorize the royalty-free reinjection of residuegas or gas plant products from Indian production into unit areas or communitizedareas.'' The recommendation was that the volume of royalty-free residuegas or gas plant products which can be reinjected into a unit area shouldbe limited to the ratio of lease production to total unit production multipliedby the volume of unit production reinjected.One industry commenter requested clarification that the use of the word``reinjection'' includes original injection. In addition, the commenterrecommended deletion of the qualification ``* * * when the reinjectionis included in a plan of development or operations and the plan has receivedBLM or MMS approval, * * *'' because the recovery must be paid for entirelyby the lessee.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: The BLM or MMS for onshore or offshore operations,respectively, has the authority to approve the plan of development or operations.The issue regarding reinjection of residue gas or gas plant products isa matter which is addressed by the appropriate operational regulationsof BLM and MMS.Section 202.152 Standards for reporting and paying royalties on gas.Section202.152(a)One industry commenter recommended that the phrase ``if the Btu value isrequired pursuant to the lessee's contract'' be added to the end of thelast sentence of paragraph (a)(2). This commenter stated the Btu measurementis an expensive process and should not be required periodically unlessnecessary.One Federal agency commenter stated that the frequency of Btu measurementbe required quarterly, if not monthly, if not covered by the lessee's contract.This commenter stated that there are many situations which may requiremore frequent monitoring of the Btu heating value to assure proper assessmentof gas royalties.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: The Btu measurement is necessary in determiningthe proper value of the gas for royalty purposes. In addition, the BLMonshore and MMS OCS operations regulations require periodic Btu measurements.Section 202.152(b).One industry and one Federal agency commenter suggested that the words``where applicable'' be added at the end of paragraph (b)(2). They statedthat when the production is composed of carbon dioxide, nitrogen, or heliumthere will be no applicable Btu value.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: This regulation has been modified in the final ruleto read as follows: ``Carbon dioxide (CO<T2>2</T2>), nitrogen (N<T2>2</T2>), helium (He), residue gas, and any other gas marketed as aseparate product shall be reported by using the same standards specifiedin paragraph (a).'' The concern expressed regarding Btu values for nonhydrocarbongases is resolved by the inclusion of the words ``where applicable'' inthe final rule for paragraph (a).Regarding paragraph (b)(4), one Indian commenter stated that if sulfuris sold in a unit other than a long ton, the lessee should be allowed toreport it to MMS and to Indian lessors in that unit.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: The unit for reporting sulfur volumes must be standardizedfor reporting purposes. The most common unit used by industry for reportingsulfur is the long ton. A simple arithmetic formula can be used to converta unique sales unit to long tons.Section 206.150 Purpose and scope.Section 206.150(a).Several commenters suggested that Indian and Federal lands are dissimilarand deserve separate treatment when valuation and other gas productionmatters are under consideration. They recommend that separate regulationsbe promulgated for Indian leases.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: The MMS believes that because these regulationsprovide for a reasonable and appropriate value for royalty purposes, completelyseparate rules for Federal and Indian leases generally are unnecessary.The regulations in andSection; 206.150(b) recognize the primacy of termsof statutes, treaties, and oil and gas leases which provide special valuationrequirements for both Federal and Indian leases. In addition, certain additionalprovisions applicable only to Indian leases have been included in theseregulations.The MMS has added a general statement that the purpose of this subpartis to establish the value of production for royalty purposes consistentwith the mineral leasing laws and other applicable laws and lease terms.Section 206.150(b).One industry commenter suggested the addition of the phrase ``in the eventthat any term of an approved existing unit or communitization agreementis inconsistent with the final rule, then such agreement will govern tothe extent of the inconsistency.''<T3>MMS Response</T3>: Section 18 of the standard Federal form of a unitagreement states: ``The terms, conditions, and provisions of all leases,subleases, and other contracts relating to exploration, drilling, developmentor operation for oil or gas on lands committed to this agreement are herebyexpressly modified and amended to the extent necessary to make the sameconform to the provisions hereof * * *.'' Therefore, the offered languageis unnecessary owing to this existing unit agreement provision.One Indian commenter suggested the addition of the phrase ``provisionsof Title 25 of the Code of Federal Regulations will supersede the provisionsof this part, to the extent of any inconsistency.''<T3>MMS Response</T3>: The valuation regulations which were in Title 25of the Code of Federal Regulations are identical to the provisions of manyIndian leases. Therefore, these final regulations would cover any inconsistencieswith lease terms if there were any. Moreover, BIA currently intends toamend the valuation regulations in 25 CFR simply to refer to the MMS valuationregulations.Indian commenters recommended that, where provisions of any Indian lease,or any statute or treaty affecting Indian leases, as stated or as interpretedby the courts, are inconsistent with the regulations, the lease, statuteor treaty, or court interpretation would govern to the extent of the inconsistency.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: This suggestion was not adopted because it was notconsidered necessary. If the regulations are inconsistent with the requirementsof any court decision, the court decision would take precedence.One commenter suggested the MMS include in this section a reference tosettlement agreements resulting from administrative or judicial litigation.It was pointed out that some settlement agreement provisions may vary fromthe regulations.<T3>MMS Response</T3>: The MMS has made the suggested change in the finalrules because the terms of a settlement of administrative or judicial litigationwill govern. In response to a comment on the draft final rules, MMS hasincluded references to settlement agreements involving Indian lessors.<T3>Section 206.150(c).   </T3>A few industry commenters requested that consideration be given to theestablishment of a ``statute of limitations'' for MMS audit and adjustmentpurposes. This commenter suggested that a 6-year period be adopted whichwould commence with the filing of the lessee's royalty report. It was alsosuggested that a provision be included for the lessee and MMS to mutuallyagree to waive the limitation for specific incidents and items under appealor before the courts, but it should never apply in cases of fraud. Thiswould partially relieve both the lessee and MMS of records archival responsibilityand the associated costs, which are significant. Also, the limitation goeswell beyond the cost-effective period for conducting normal complianceand follow-up audits. The suggested statute of limitations could be similarin concept and language as that used by the Internal Revenue Service.  <T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS performs all audits in accordance with 30CFR 217.50. Any limitation such as that suggested would properly be includedin a rulemaking to amend that section of the regulations. Therefore, itis beyond the scope of this rulemaking. The MMS has modified the provisionin the final rule to make it clear that this provision applies to paymentsmade directly to Indian Tribes or allottees as well as those made to MMSeither for Federal or Indian leases. The MMS will address the issue ofaudit closure elsewhere.  <T3>Section 206.150(d).   </T3>The MMS received many comments from Indians that this section should specificallyreference the Secretary's trust responsibilities to the Indians.   <T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has incorporated the suggested change.  The MMS received a comment from an Alaska Native Corporation stating thatMMS should not make the new regulations applicable to the proportionateshare of production which corresponds to an Alaska Native Corporation'sproportionate share of leases acquired under section 14(g) of the AlaskaNative Claims Settlement Act, 43 U.S.C. 1613(g). Under section 14(g), anative corporation can acquire all or part of the lease. The commenter'spoint was that at the time a proportionate interest in a lease is acquired,the native corporation had an expectation of what royalties it would receive,and it would be inequitable for MMS to modify that expectation for leasesor portions of leases which MMS does not even own.   <T3>MMS Response: </T3>In the draft final rules accompanying the secondfurther notice of proposed rulemaking, MMS proposed to add a andSection;206.150(e)which provided that regulations, guidelines, and Notices to Lessees ineffect on the date that an Alaska Native Corporation acquired a proportionateinterest in a lease will continue to apply to that interest. The MMS receivedseveral comments that this provision is unfair and not supportable becausethe lease terms expressly recognize that regulations may change and thatthe lease will be subject to the new regulations. The MMS agrees with thecomments and has deleted this section from the final rules. However, itshould be clarified that these rules do not have any retroactive effect.MMS does not intend that any rules adopted in the rulemaking would applyto production involving Alaska Native Corporation lease interests whichoccurred prior to the effective date of this rulemaking.  MMS is including in the final rules a new subsection (e) to specify whichNotice to lessees are to be terminated by this rulemaking.  <T3>Section 206.151 Definitions.</T3>   ``Allowance''_One industry commenter suggested that the proposed definitionbe modified as follows: ``Processing allowance means an allowance for processinggas; i.e., an authorized or an MMS-accepted     or approved deduction forthe costs of processing gas determined pursuant to andSection;andSection;206.158and 206.159.'' The same commenter stated further that ``Transportationallowance means an allowance for moving unprocessed gas, residue gas, orgas plant production to a point of sale or point of delivery remote fromthe lease, unit area, communitized area, or processing plant; i.e., anauthorized or an MMS-accepted or -approved deduction for transportationcosts, determined pursuant to andSection;andSection;206.156 and 206.157.''This commenter recommended deleting the phrase ``for the reasonable, actualcosts incurred by the lessee.'' The method of determining the allowanceshould be addressed in the regulation setting forth the calculation method,not in the definition of allowance. If MMS adopts comparable arm's-lengthtransportation and processing costs as a benchmark for non-arm's lengthcontracts, the above cited phrase could be incorrect in certain instances.''A few industry and one Indian commenter stated that certain terms incorporatedin the definition are subjective in nature. One industry commenter stated:``The New Rules do not draw a clear, objective line between costs thatmay be deducted and costs that may not be deducted. What is `remote'? Whatis `field gathering'?'' Two industry commenters want the word ``reasonable''deleted in the definition of ``processing allowance and transportationallowance.'' They believe that the ``Lessee should be entitled to deductactual cost of processing and transportation. `Reasonable' implies thatthe deduction may be something less than actual.'' One Indian commenterstated: ``* * * the use of the terms accepted and approved call into questionimportant issues regarding the relationship of the acceptance or approvalwith later audit. We assume that acceptance would not preclude later auditreview and disallowance or modification when justified.'' One industrycommenter suggested deleting the words ``remote from'' and replacing themwith ``off.'' The commenter ``believes what is really intended by the phrase`remote from' is to cover transportation to sales and delivery points ofthe lease.''Finally, one Indian commenter, referring to ``allowance,'' pointed outthat: ``The definition should clearly specify that the transportation allowanceapplies only to transportation from <T3>the lease boundary</T3> to a point of sale remote from the lease andthat such costs be reasonable, actual, <T3>and necessary.''</T3><T3>MMS Response:</T3> The final rule includes some modifications to theproposed language. It should be noted that processing and transportationallowances are ``accepted'' subject to review and/or audit. The MMS alsohas deleted the phrase ``remote from the lease'' and replaced it with thephrase ``off the lease'' for clarification that any transportation offthe lease, except gathering (see definition below), is eligible for anallowance.``Area''_One industry commenter stated that `` `Area' should be more preciselydefined so that there are reasonable limits to how large an `area' is.In addition, for the sake of clarification, the words `or producing unit'should be inserted after `oil and/or gas field' * * *.''<T3>MMS Response:</T3> For royalty computation purposes, the definitionof ``area'' must remain flexible so that it may be applied to diverse situations.The size of an ``area'' may vary with each specific royalty valuation determinationfor gas.``Arm's-length Contract''_The proposed definition of ``arm's-length contract''was addressed by a large number of State, Indian, and industry commenters.Many commenters stated that the originally proposed definition of arm's-lengthcontract was so restrictive that many perfectly valid arm's-length transactionsmay fail to qualify, thus potentially rendering this key element of thebenchmark system meaningless. These commenters suggested that MMS shouldadopt a definition of ``affiliated person'' based on control versus mereownership of stock. They stated that in order to eliminate this problem,the underlying language should be deleted in favor of language alreadyadopted by BLM in its regulations implementing Section 2(a)(2)(A) of theMinerals Lands Leasing Act of 1920 (MLLA). The rule, 43 CFR 3400.0-5(rr)(3),added by 51 FR 43910, 43922 (1986), specifies that:Controlled by or under common control with, based on the instruments ofownership of the voting securities of an entity, means:(i) Ownership in excess of 50 percent constitutes control;(ii) Ownership of 20 through 50 percent creates a presumption of control;and(iii) Ownership of less than 20 percent creates a presumption of noncontrol.One industry commenter further recommended that ``* * * MMS also adopta 5% ownership threshold, below which there is an absolute presumptionof noncontrol which is not subject to rebuttal. The 5% threshold is takenfrom the Investment Companies Act [* * *] which establishes that thereis no effective affiliation between parties when direct or indirect ownershipof voting stock is below 5%.''One industry commenter stated: ``Additionally, for those companies in whichthere is a definite controlling interest, a transaction should still betreated as arm's-length if the controlling company is regulated by a regulatoryagency who approves rates or tariffs charged to third parties.''Many industry commenters recommended changing MMS's reference from ``persons''to ``parties.'' One of these commenters stated that ``Involvement in oneor more joint operations with a competitor should not be viewed as materiallyaffecting the arm's-length nature of transactions between the firms. However,the reference to `joint venture' in the definition of `person,' which isreferenced in the proposed definition of arm's-length contract, could beimproperly construed as including normal joint oil field operations conductedunder the terms of joint operating or similar agreements. Joint operationsclearly involve no interlocking ownership of the instruments of votingsecurities as between the firms. Joint operations are undertaken to accomplisheffective reservoir management, to satisfy spacing requirements, or toshare the enormous costs involved in certain OCS and frontier areas.''One industry commenter was concerned that: ``The proposed language doesnot clarify at what time affiliation is to be determined. Is it when thecontract is originally executed or some subsequent time during the termof the contract? In the current climate of mergers and acquisitions, affiliationmay change.'' Another industry commenter stated that although the definitionof ``arm's-length contract'' is well written, any additional language elaboratingon the state of being affiliated should be deleted because it would allowauditors to reject too many arm's-length contracts.One State commenter stated that ``The definition of `arm's-length contract'is clearly deficient because it is limited to formal affiliation or commonownership interests between the contracting parties. The assumption behindaccepting arm's-length contract prices is that those prices will reflectmarket value. The definition proposed by MMS ignores the fact that partiesmay have contractual or other relationships or understandings which wouldcause them to price gas below its value, especially if the benefit of thereduced royalty burden can be shared by means of the gas sales contract.''One Indian commenter questioned ``* * * whether there are any truly arm's-lengthrelationships in today's market which would make an arm's-length valuationmethod valid. We are particularly concerned that the arm's-length labelessentially forecloses any scrutiny by MMS of the value reported by thelessee.'' One State/Indian association stated that nonaffiliation doesnot guarantee arm's-length: ``For example, arrangements between families(via blood, kinship, heir, or marriage) offer similar conditions for influencingproceeds subject to royalty.''Two State commenters, one State/industry association, one Indian, and oneIndian trade group are of the opinion, as expressed by one commenter, that:``MMS's desire for an `almost purely objective' test provides a totallyinadequate justification for giving away the power to prevent manipulationof the public's royalties.'' These commenters conclude that: ``The definitionas proposed is not workable even though it is objective.'' They suggestthat MMS's definition in the draft regulations presented to the RMAC wouldallow more legally accurate results:<T3>``Arm's length contract''</T3> means a contract or agreement that hasbeen freely arrived at in the open marketplace between independent, nonaffiliatedparties of adverse economic interest not involving any consideration otherthan the sale, processing, and/or transportation of lease products, andprudently negotiated under the facts and circumstances existing at thattime.Some Indian and State commenters agreed that, as one commenter phrasedit: ``The adverse economic interest and open market requirements have longbeen standard criteria for determining the arm's-length nature of contracts.These criteria have allowed for an accurate line of demarcation betweenarm's-length and non-arm's-length.''One State commenter supplied the following questions to be asked to testthe arm's-length nature of a contract: ``(1) Is there an individual whois a board member, officer, partner or employee of one of the contractingparties, and also a board member, officer or employee of the other? (2)What, if any, other commercial relationships exist or are being proposedbetween the buyer and seller? (3) Is there any family relationship betweenthe buyer and seller? (4) Is there any other special relationship betweenthe parties to the gas sales contract?''Based on the numerous comments concerning the originally proposed definition,MMS included in the first draft final rule a definition which adopted the``control'' language found in the BLM's regulations at 43 CFR 3400.0-5(rr)(3) quoted above. In response to those commenters who believed thatparties to an arm's-length contract must have adverse economic interests,MMS included in the first draft final rule definition a provision whichrequired that, to be arm's-length, a contract must reflect the total considerationactually transferred from the buyer to the seller either directly or indirectly.For example, if the parties to the contract agreed that the price for gasfrom a Federal or Indian lease would be reduced in exchange for a bonusprice to be paid for other production from a fee lease, MMS would not treatthat contract as arm's-length.Many of the comments on the first draft final rule again focused on thedefinition of arm's-length contract. Most of the industry commenters thoughtthat the reference to ``reflects the total consideration actually transferreddirectly or indirectly from the buyer to the seller'' did not belong inthe definition of arm's-length contract. Rather, they stated that it properlyshould be dealt with as a ``gross proceeds'' issue. The States and Indianscommented that a reference to adverse economic interests still was necessary.They also thought that there must be a requirement of a free and open market.Finally, the States and Indians thought that MMS should lower the controlthreshold to 10 percent and that MMS should have more flexibility to rebutpresumptions of noncontrol. Many of these commenters also thought thatthe rules should state that the lessee has the burden of demonstratingthat its contract is arm's-length.The comments on the second draft final rule were similar to those alreadyreceived. Many commenters raised questions about possible audit difficulties.The American Petroleum Institute supported the definition in the seconddraft final rule.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS adopted many of the changes suggested forthe originally proposed definition. The MMS agrees that the ``total consideration''issue is properly a gross proceeds matter that does not reflect the affiliationof the parties. Thus, that phrase has been deleted from the arm's-lengthcontract definition and the matter dealt with under the definition of ``grossproceeds''. The MMS did not adopt the concept of ``free and open market''because that concept is highly subjective. However, MMS did include a requirementthat the contract be arrived at ``in the marketplace'' in support of theconcept that an arm's-length contract must be between nonaffiliated persons.Also, in furtherance of that concept, MMS included a provision that anarm's-length contract must be between persons with opposing economic interestsregarding that contract which means that the parties are acting in theireconomic self-interest. Thus, although the parties may have common interestselsewhere, their interests must be opposing with respect to the contractin issue. In response to many comments on the second draft final rule,MMS has reduced the control threshold to 10 percent. The MMS can rebutpresumptions of noncontrol between 0 and 10 percent and lessees can rebutpresumptions of control between 10 and 50 percent.Many commenters thought that MMS's inclusion of joint venture in the definitionof ``person'' improperly narrowed the definition of arm's-length contract.These commenters have misconstrued MMS's intent. The definition of ``person''includes joint ventures because there are instances where joint venturesare established as separate entities. In those situations, if a party witha controlling interest in the joint venture buys production from the jointventure entity, that contract is non-arm's-length. However, MMS is awarethat it also is common for companies to jointly contribute resources todevelop a lease and then share the production proportionately. In a situationwhere four totally unaffiliated companies share the production, if oneof the companies buys all of the production from the other three, thosethree contracts would be considered arm's-length. The company's purchasefrom its affiliate, of course, would be non-arm's-length.The MMS also has included in the arm's-length definition a provision wherebyif one person has less than a 10-percent interest in another person whichcreates a presumption of noncontrol, MMS can rebut that presumption ifit demonstrates actual or legal control, including the existence of interlockingdirectorates. For example, there may be situations where ownership of 5percent of a very large corporation could give a person sufficient controlto direct the activities of that corporation. Where there is evidence ofactual control, MMS can rebut the presumption of noncontrol.Finally, in response to those commenters who believed that the lessee hasthe burden of demonstrating that its contract is arm's-length, MMS hasincluded such a provision in the valuation sections. See andSection;andSection;206.152(b)(1)(i) and 206.153(b)(1)(i). The MMS also believes that thesesections satisfy the request that the rules prescribe that the lessee hasthe burden of proving nonaffiliation since one of the requirements fordemonstrating that a contract is an arm's-length contract is to demonstratethe degree of affiliation between the contracting parties.The MMS may require a lessee to certify ownership in certain situations.Documents that controllers or financial accounting departments of individualcompanies file with the Securities and Exchange Commission concerning significantchanges in ownership must be made available to MMS upon request.The final rule also provides that to be considered arm's-length for anyspecific production month, a contract must meet the definition's requirementsfor that production month as well as when the contract was executed. Someindustry commenters objected to this provision stating that if the contractwas arm's-length when executed, it should satisfy MMS.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> When the parties to a contract no longer have opposingeconomic interests, the reliability of that contract as an accurate indicatorof value becomes suspect. In such circumstances, MMS will not rely on acontract price to conclusively establish value.The MMS asked for comments on whether the term ``relatives'' needed furtherdefinition. Many useful comments were received. The MMS has decided, however,that further explanation of the meaning of relatives is better suited toguidelines which will be prepared after these rules are adopted.``Audit''_One industry commenter expressed concern over MMS's interpretationof what constitutes an audit: ``MMS's use of terms such as `review,' `examination,'rather than `audit,' arbitrarily eliminates the right of lessees to offsetoverpayments and underpayments discovered during the course of an audit.''This commenter believes that an account reconciliation by MMS should betermed an audit.One Indian commenter did not disagree with the definition but thought thatthe processed information available to MMS is not adequate to perform thoroughaudits. ``Our view of the definition of audit is academic because the MMSwill accept payment reports without review in the future as in the past,unless resources and personnel are provided by the Tribe to accomplishthe task.''One industry commenter stated that the review and resolution of exceptionsprocessed by MMS's automated systems constitutes auditing by mail. Theindustry takes exception to this procedure.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has simplified the definition of ``audit''as follows: ``Audit means a review, conducted in accordance with generallyaccepted accounting and auditing standards, of royalty payment complianceactivities of lessees or other interest holders who pay royalties, rents,or bonuses on Federal and Indian leases.''``Compression''_One industry commenter suggested deleting the definitionbecause the term does not require an explanation.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that the definition should be retainedbecause it clarifies a term used in the regulations.``Field''_One industry commenter suggested adding the underlined languageto clarify that this definition is for royalty purposes: ``Field means,<T3>for purposes of oil and gas royalty</T3>, a geographic region * * *.''<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The additional language proposed by the commenteris unnecessary because the underlying premise of all the definitions containedin andSection; 206.151 is that they are for royalty purposes.``Gas''_One industry commenter stated that ``The term should refer to unprocessedgas. The chemical definition is inappropriate in this context because itfails to distinguish between manufactured and raw gas.''<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that the definition adequatelyand correctly defines the term ``gas'' in language which is accepted bythe oil and gas industry.``Gas Plant Products''_One industry commenter stated that the phrase ``excludingresidue gas'' should be deleted from this paragraph. According to thiscommenter, ``Residue gas is a manufactured product as that term has beenused by Federal courts in the royalty context. See <T3>U.S. v. General Petroleum; California v. Seaton </T3>affirmed <T3>California v. Udall</T3> * * *. If gas is processed, or manufacturedthere is no rational basis for limiting the deduction of manufacturingcosts against the value of only gas plant products other than residue.''An Indian Tribe supported the exclusion of residue gas from the definition.One industry commenter suggested, ``* * * we think the word `nitrogen'should be excluded from the definition of `Gas Plant Products' since somenatural gas is high in this component, and there is currently a small ornonexistent market for small amounts of nitrogen. Purchasers have traditionallydowngraded the price for high nitrogen gas, and if producers have to bearadditional royalty as well, they may elect to shut in or plug wells dueto poor economics.''<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS does not agree that the phrase ``excludingresidue gas'' should be deleted from this paragraph. Historically, no processingallowance has been allowed to be applied against the residue gas, and MMSgenerally has retained this position in the final rule. The MMS has alsoconcluded that the definition should not be modified to exclude nitrogen.The MMS has, however, included in andSection; 206.158(d) a provision foran extraordinary processing allowance for atypical types of gas productionoperations.``Gathering''_MMS received numerous comments from industry concerning thephrase ``or to a central accumulation or treatment point off the lease,unit, or communitized area as approved by BLM or MMS OCS operations personnelfor onshore and OCS leases, respectively.'' These commenters stated thatthe phrase was unclear and that it should be removed from the definition.Several industry commenters recommended limiting gathering to the leaseor unit area so a transportation allowance may be obtained for all off-leasemovement.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The definition has been retained intact. The operationalregulation of both BLM and MMS require that a lessee place all productionin a marketable condition, if economically feasible, and that a lesseeproperly measure all production in a manner acceptable to the authorizedofficials of those agencies. Unless specifically approved otherwise, therequirements of the regulations must be met prior to the production leavingthe lease. Therefore, when approval has been granted for the removal ofproduction from a lease, unit, or communitized area for the purposes oftreating the production or accumulating production for delivery to a purchaserprior to the requirements of the operational regulations having been met,MMS does not believe that any allowances should be granted for costs incurredby a lessee in these instances.``Gross Proceeds''_MMS received a large number of comments on this definition.Three Indian commenters, one State commenter, and one State/Indian associationcommenter supported the definition and urged MMS to retain the entitlementconcept despite pressures to the contrary. A State commenter stated that``MMS has correctly resisted lessee efforts to exclude the royalty ownerfrom sharing in some kinds of consideration, such as severance tax reimbursementand take or pay payments.'' This commenter recommended clarifying the firstsentence by amending it as follows: ``Gross proceeds (for royalty purposes)means the total monies and <T3>the value of </T3>other consideration paid <T3>or given </T3>to [an oil] and gas lessee, or monies and <T3>the value of </T3>other consideration to which such lessee is entitled,for the disposition of gas.'' The commenter stated that ``These additionsare necessary because when `consideration' is not in the form of `monies'it is necessary to determine its value.''Many industry commenters opposed the definition of ``gross proceeds'' asproposed because they believed it is too expansive and contrary to theprovisions of the Mineral Lands Leasing Act and the OCS Lands Act. Instead,they propose the following: ``Gross proceeds (for royalty payment purposes)means the consideration accrued to the lessee for production removed orsold from Federal, Indian Tribal or Indian allotted leases.'' One commenterstated further that ``Such definition is unambiguous, furthering the MMS'sdesire for certainty in its regulations. Reimbursement for production-relatedcosts and take-or-pay payments are currently being litigated. If it iseventually determined that royalty is owed on such payments such definitionwill not have to be modified. On the other hand, the proposed definitionwill have to be amended if industry is successful in its claims that royaltyis not due on such amounts.'' One industry commenter proposed adoptingthe definition of ``gross proceeds'' endorsed by a majority of the RMACGas Panel. It reads: ``* * * all consideration due and payable to the lesseefor the sale of gas and processed gas products, less any applicable allowancesfor transportation, processing and other post production expenses.''Several of the industry commenters disagreed with the entitlement languagecontained in the originally proposed definition. Their concerns are representedby the following statement from one of the comments: ``Proceeds have longbeen defined and understood to mean the consideration, money or the monetaryequivalent of other nonmonetary consideration <T3>actually received by a lessee. </T3>The MMS' expansive definition ofproceeds, including monies to which a lessee is <T3>entitled, </T3>makes product valuation uncertain and subjective. Thisuncertainty and subjectivity arises because: (1) The meaning of entitlementis not clearly understood, nor is it a clearly defined legal term; (2)lessees do not know how either they or MMS will, or should, apply thisstandard; and (3) the required steps which a lessee must take to secureentitlements to consideration are unknown. It will put MMS into the businessof second guessing lessee's business transactions. To minimize this secondguessing problem of uncertainty we recommend the concept of entitlementbe eliminated from further consideration.'' One industry commenter wasconcerned that ``a lessee would be required to pay royalties on moniesto which it is entitled, not on what is received or on what is settledfor as a matter of compromise.'' In order to add more certainty to theconcept of ``entitlement,'' one commenter suggested ``a simple statementto the effect that MMS expects to be indemnified against the negative consequencesof a lessee sleeping on its <T3>clear cut uncontested </T3>contract rights should suffice.''Many industry commenters had the opinion, as one commenter phrased it,that ``Federal statutes, regulations, and leases do not require lesseesto pay royalty on reimbursements received for post-production services.''Several commenters believed that ``the claim for royalty on production-relatedcost reimbursements received by a lessee pursuant to the FERC's Order No.94 series is particularly inappropriate.'' One commenter stated that ``ademand for royalties on Order No. 94 violates the royalty clause of theMLA, the OCSLA, as well as MMS's own regulations implementing these statutes,for at least two reasons. First, these reimbursements do not result fromthe production of gas but from services performed by the producer subsequentto production. Second, such reimbursements are not consideration for productionthat is sold or removed and are thus outside the scope of the royalty clause.Consequently, the MMS' proposal to include production-related cost reimbursementsin the definition of gross proceeds is simply wrong.'' Another industrycommenter ``strongly asserts the producer's right to deduct all post-productioncosts involved in marketing gas. Further tax reimbursements should be exemptfrom royalty.'' Finally, one industry commenter stated that ``all post-productioncosts should be shared by lessor and lessee because such costs enhancethe value of the production for the benefit of both lessor and lessee.''Many industry and a few individual commenters responded to the inclusionof take-or-pay payments in the definition of ``gross proceeds.'' The consensusamong these commenters is that MMS has no lawful reason or authorizationto collect royalties on take-or-pay payments. One commenter stated that``the typical take-or-pay clause in a contract between the lessee and thegas purchaser requires the purchaser to pay for the specified minimum quantityof gas for each contract year. Whenever the gas purchaser takes less thanthe contract minimum for a particular year, the purchaser is required tomake a take-or-pay payment to the lessee. The purpose of take-or-pay paymentsis to guarantee the lessee a steady cash-flow, regardless of the levelof actual production, to meet its operation and maintenance costs. Thepayments are not for production; indeed, they are made in lieu of takingproduction. Consequently, to the extent the lessee receives take-or-paypayments there is no gas production or sale because the gas remains inthe ground.''Several industry commenters recommended the increased use of ``in-kind''royalty clauses to resolve good faith royalty disputes. One industry commenterstated ``indeed, the `in-kind' standard should be considered as the measureof product `value,' where a producer and the MMS, or a State auditor undera delegation of authority, disagree over whether a contract is `arm's-length,'or over contract `entitlements,' the gas should be taken `in-kind,' byvolume at the wellhead. This means that the royalty owner must assume allsubsequent costs or marketing the gas.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>In the draft final rule, MMS included a definitionwhich was only slightly different than the proposal. In the second draftfinal rule, MMS again made a slight modification, discussed below, whichhas been retained in the final rule. The MMS retained the intent of theproposed language because gross proceeds to which a lessee is ``entitled''means those prices and/or benefits to which it is legally entitled underthe terms of the contract. If a lessee fails to take proper or timely actionto receive prices or benefits to which it is entitled under the contract,it must pay royalty at a value based upon that legally obtainable priceor benefit, unless the contract is amended or revised. As is discussedmore fully below, gross proceeds under arm's-length contracts are a principaldeterminant of value. The MMS cannot adopt that standard and then not requirelessees to pay royalties in accordance with the express terms of thosecontracts. It is MMS's intent that the definition be expansive to includeall consideration flowing from the buyer to the seller for the gas, whetherthat consideration is in the form of money or any other form of value.Lessees cannot avoid their royalty obligations by keeping a part of theiragreement outside the four corners of the contract. Moreover, as notedearlier, many commenters stated that the ``total consideration'' conceptproperly belonged as part of gross proceeds, not in the definition of arm's-lenghtcontract. Therefore, MMS has purposefully drafted the gross proceeds definitionto be expansive and thus include all types of consideration flowing fromthe buyer to the seller. Toward that end, MMS has replaced the word ``paid''used in the first draft final rule with the term ``accruing.'' There maybe certain types of considerations which are not actually paid by the buyerto the seller, but from which the seller benefits. The term ``accruing''ensures that all such consideration is considered gross proceeds.Costs of production and post-production costs are lease obligations whichthe lessee must perform at no cost to the Federal Government or Indianowner. The services listed in the definition are all benefits that a lesseemay receive under the terms of the contract and are considered part ofthe value, for royalty purposes, for the production removed or sold fromthe lease.It is MMS's position that take-or-pay payments are part of the gross proceedsaccruing to a lessee upon which royalty is due.The MMS retains the exclusive right to determine when it will accept ``in-kind''production in fulfillment of a lessee's royalty obligation. Although MMSreceived many comments supporting a gas royalty-in-kind program, MMS receivedan equal number identifying significant problems with such a program. TheMMS does not anticipate adopting a gas royalty-in-kind program at thistime.``Lease''_One Indian commenter stated the following: ``Inclusion of anycontract profit-sharing arrangement, joint venture or other agreement inthe term `lease' as opposed to a more standardized BIA form lease may causeconfusion. Most joint ventures and profit-sharing arrangements containexplicit provisions on payment of expenses and division of revenues.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>This definition must be broad enough to cover anyagreement that may be issued or approved by the United States for eitherFederal or Indian lands.``Lease products''_One industry commenter stated: ``Lease products definitionshould be deleted as it eliminates the important and necessary distinctionbetween raw gas and manufactured products. Use of the phrase `gas' and`gas plant products' is preferable as it serves to make this distinction.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS believes that this definition is appropriateand correct and does not eliminate any distinction between raw gas andmanufactured products. The definition of the terms ``gas'' and ``gas plantproducts'' will be retained in the definitions paragraph.``Lessee''_Several industry representatives and trade groups commentedthat the originally proposed definition of ``lessee'' was too broad. Onecommenter stated that ``As drafted, it would include any person who paysroyalties, notwithstanding the fact that such payors may have no contractualobligation to the lessor to make royalty payments. Thus, under the proposeddefinition, the voluntary royalty remitter would become subject to allof the royalty valuation obligations imposed on lessees and would, consequently,become directly liable for any infractions of the application reportingand payment regulations, a result which is not sanctioned by existing statutorylaw.'' To be consistent with that law, industry suggests that MMS substitutefor its definition of ``lessee'' the one which is contained in section3(7) of the Federal Oil and Gas Royalty Management Act (FOGRMA), 30 U.S.C.1702(7):<ITAG tagnum="21">``Lessee'' means any person to whom the United States, an Indian Tribe,or an Indian allottee, issues a lease, or any person who has been assignedan obligation to make royalty or other payments required by the lease.</ITAG>Most of these commenters favored this definition because ``the statutorydefinition includes persons who have been issued a lease or who have been<T3>assigned </T3>an obligation to make royalty or other payments requiredby the lease. The gas proposal would wrongfully expand the definition toinclude any person who has <T3>assumed </T3>an obligation to make such payments.''One industry commenter recommended adding the phrase ``for royalty paymentpurposes'' directly after the word ``Lessee'' for the purpose of clarity.``We do not believe it is the intent of Congress that a lessee be ableto divest himself of all lease obligations by someone else merely assumingroyalty responsibility.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS agrees with the comments regarding consistencywith the definition found in FOGRMA and, therefore, has replaced the word``assumed'' with the word ``assigned.'' It should be specifically notedthat the term ``assigned,'' as used in this Part, is restricted to theassignment of an obligation to make royalty or other payments requiredby the lease. It is in no way related to lease ``assignments'' approvedthrough the MMS, BLM or BIA. It is MMS's intent that operators and otherswho pay royalties follow these regulations in determining the royaltiesdue. The lessee of record is ultimately responsible if the operator orother payor does not properly pay the royalties due the lessor.     ``Like-quality lease products''_Some Indian commenters recommended deletingany reference to legal characteristics from this definition. They believedthat by using legal characteristics of gas in defining like-quality gasmany elements would be used to differentiate gas in such a manner as tolower gas values. They were concerned that gas sold in intrastate commercewould not be considered as being like-quality to gas sold in interstatecommerce. They believed that such distinction would be contrary to courtrulings. Further, the Indian commenters believed that gas should be consideredonly on its chemical and physical characteristics. The Indians commentedthat inclusion of the term could lead to the possibility that State regulationscould influence the value of gas produced on Indian leases.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that legal characteristics of gasmust be considered in determining like-quality production. However, thelegal characteristics of gas intended to be considered under this definitionare limited to categories under NGPA and the price regulated or deregulatedstatus of the gas. The MMS does not believe that mixing NGPA categoriesof gas or comparing regulated to deregulated gas is reasonable when defininglike-quality gas for royalty purposes. Without such distinction, gas thatis price regulated at levels below $1.00 per MMBtu might be used to demonstratethe acceptability of a price for gas that should be compared to gas sellingfor prices in excess of $2.00 per MMBtu under market-sensitive contractprovisions free from Federal price controls. Similar problems could resultby mixing price regulated gas with price deregulated gas, even though thegas qualifies under the same provisions of NGPA. For example, between January1, 1985, and July 1, 1987, all wells qualifying under NGPA Section 103qualified under section 103(c). However, there were two different maximumlawful price ceilings prescribed by this section and a provision that deregulatedcertain section 103 gas. Regarding the distinction between intrastate andinterstate sales, it has not been MMS's practice, nor is it intended tobe under these final regulations, to incorporate the market chosen by alessee in the definition of like-quality gas (unless adopted as a requirementby NGPA in defining categories).``Marketable Condition''_One industry commenter suggested changing thedefinition to ``Marketable Condition means condition acceptable to thepurchaser under its sales contract.''One industry commenter suggested adding the words <T3>``and/or transporter''</T3> after the word ``purchaser'' in the definition.One industry commenter stated that phrases such as ``sufficiently freefrom impurities'' and ``a contract typical for the field or area'' aresubjective and ambiguous. The commenter stated that ``All references to`marketable condition' should be dropped in the final regulations. Instead,the regulations should reflect the distinction between production and post-productioncosts and clearly allow the lessee with an arm's-length contract to deductpost-production costs.''Several industry commenters expressed the view that the lessor should shareproportionately in all post-production costs including those costs incidentto placing production in a marketable condition.One commenter expressed the view that the regulations must define ``productioncosts'' and ``post-production costs.'' The commenter disagrees with MMS'sposition that these costs are costs associated with the obligation of thelessee to place production in a marketable condition, especially when costsare incurred downstream or off-lease. The commenter suggested that MMSshould reconsider its position and allow deductions for nonproduction-relatedor post-production costs.Another commenter believes that the costs of dehydration, separation, compression,and storage performed at a plant and incurred subsequent to the sales pointshould be deemed to have occurred for gas processing and not as a costnecessary to place the gas in marketable condition. This commenter alsostated that a reasonable amount of gas, residue or unprocessed, shouldbe allowed for fuel.One industry commenter stated that ``The proposed definition of `marketablecondition' is problematic because it seems to set up a normative standardfor the condition of a product when, in fact, products may be sold profitablyin a variety of conditions. We do not believe the lessee should be requiredto meet a specific set of processing criteria in all circumstances. Thelessee, for its own profit and for that of its lessor, must be able toevaluate potential benefits and costs under each circumstance without beingbound by what the lessor may consider `typical' for the field or area.Furthermore, regarding the term `typical', what was typical 20 years agoalmost certainly is not typical now; yet there is no reference in thisdefinition to the need for contracts to be fairly contemporaneous in orderto be comparable. The definition set forth in the report of RMAC's GasWorking Panel is far preferable to the proposed rule.''<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that the definition is clear, concise,and equitable. The definition is not subject to manipulation, as one commenterstated. Furthermore, the suggestion that a uniform standard be developedfor what is ``marketable'' is unrealistic because the gas marketplace isdynamic. The definition, as written, allows MMS the latitude to apply theconcept of ``marketable'' in a fair and correct manner, now and in futuregas markets. Also, MMS adheres to its long standing policy that costs incurredto place production in a marketable condition are to be borne solely bythe lessee. Therefore, the MMS has not made any changes to the proposeddefinition.``Marketing affiliate''_The MMS received several comments that sales tomarketing affiliates who then resell the gas to third persons should notbe treated under the rules as non-arm's-length sales. The MMS has addressedthis issue in the valuation rules, discussed below, and is including adefinition of marketing affiliate as an affiliate of the lessee whose functionis to acquire <T3>only</T3> the lessee's production and to market that production. Someindustry commenters stated that the term ``only'' should be deleted toinclude affiliates that purchase gas from other sources including othersellers in the same field.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS is retaining the term ``only''. If the affiliateof the lessee also purchases gas from other sources, then that affiliatepresumably will have comparable arm's-length contracts with the other partieswhich should demonstrate the acceptability of the gross proceeds accruingto the lessee from its affiliate. Also, deleting the term ``only'' fromthe definition may require the lessee to track the production to a salespoint much farther downstream than the point at which it can be valuedbased upon the comparable arm's-length contracts of its affiliate.``Net-back Method''_One industry commenter recommended deleting the secondsentence of the definition because the procedure for performing a net-backcalculation cannot be adequately explained in one sentence. Another industrycommenter believed that the reference to net-back method needs clarification.A net-back is simply a means for reconstructing the value of gas to thewell and has nothing to do with valuing the disposition of the gas at apoint remote from the well. Consequently, a net-back procedure can be employedsimultaneously with another valuation criterion to arrive at the valueat the well.''One industry commenter stated the following about the definition: ``Itis vague because there is no explanation of what `working back' means;it is overly broad because the first `use' of virtually all gas is downstreamfrom the lease. In addition, exclusive reliance on costs, however `costs'are determined, may well understate the value added to production by downstreamvalue-enhancement activities.''One State commenter stated that ``the definition is internally inconsistentbecause it declares the `net-back method' to be a method for valuing `unprocessedgas' which is first sold downstream of, among other things, `processingplants.' One of these references must be deleted to preserve consistency.The concept is vague because no standard is provided for determining whatis meant by the phrase `first alternative point which can be used for valuedetermination.' ''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>Upon review, MMS determined that the proposed definitionof net-back was too broad_it applied to any situation where lease productionis sold at a point remote from the lease. The MMS's intent is that a net-backmethod be used for valuation primarily where the form of the lease producthas changed, and it is necessary to start with the sales prices of thechanged product and deduct transportation and processing costs. An examplewould be where gas production from a Federal lease is used on lease togenerate electricity which is then sold. If the value of the gas cannotbe determined through application of the first three benchmarks in theregulations (see andSection; 206.152(c)), then a net-back method would involvebeginning with the sale price of the electricity and deducting the costsof generation and transportation, thus working back to a value at the lease.In the draft final rule, MMS used the phrase ``ultimate proceeds'' to tryand refer to the downstream product. Many commenters thought the term wouldresult in MMS doing a net-back from the farthest downstream product, evento the point of ``Stainmaster Carpet'' or ``model airplanes.'' This wasnot MMS's intent. Therefore, the term ``ultimate'' was deleted and a referenceincluded to starting the net-back at the first point at which reasonablevalues for any product may be determined by a sale pursuant to an arm's-lengthcontract or by comparison to other sales of such products. Thus, if thereare five different stages of chemical or fiber products between raw gasproduction and ``Stainmaster Carpet,'' if the value of the second productcan be determined through comparisons with sales of other such productsin the same market, MMS would begin the net-back from that product, notfrom the carpet.``Net Output''_One industry commenter recommends ``substituting the phrase`actually extracts' for `produces'. Net output of a plant is that whichis <T3>actually extracted, </T3>not theoretically extractable.'' Another industrycommenter suggested that the language be amended to clarify that gas producedat a plant but determined to have been unavoidably lost be excluded fromthe term.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS disagrees with the commenter's recommendedaddition. The phrase ``actually extracts'' could be interpreted as meaningsomething different than ``is produced.'' The MMS also disagrees that theterm should be amended to exclude volumes determined to have been unavoidablylost. It has long been an established practice that incidental losses occurringfrom the plant be excluded from royalty computations. Also, if the gasproduced from the plant is determined by BLM or MMS, as appropriate, tohave been unavoidably lost, the regulations when taken as a whole wouldexclude such volumes.``Person''_One industry commenter recommended replacing the word ``firm''with ``company'' in the interest of clarity.Several industry commenters expressed the opinion that if the definitionis not altered ``then inclusion of joint venture in the definition of personcould be extended to oil and gas joint venture operations and further narrowthe definition of an arm's-length transaction by clouding the issues ofcontrol and affiliation. The sale of hydrocarbons produced through jointventure operations should not be presumed to be other than arm's-lengthbecause the individual parties and not the `joint venture' are responsiblefor making their own sales of their share of the production.'' One industrycommenter stated that the solution to the problem is to delete the term``joint venture'' from the definition. Another industry commenter proposedthe following definition: ``Person means any individual, firm, corporation,association, partnership, consortium, or joint venture. For purposes ofthis definition, association, partnership, consortium or joint ventureshall not include any relationship or arrangement resulting from personsentering into any joint operating agreement, production sharing agreement,farm-out or farm-in agreement, or any similar agreement or contracts generallyfound in the oil and gas industry for the cooperative exploration of mineralresources.'' Another industry commenter recommended adding the phrase ``whenestablished as a separate entity'' after the term joint venture. <T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has adopted the addition of the suggestedphrase concerning joint ventures in the final definition. The MMS agreesthat two unaffiliated parties jointly developing and producing a leaseshould not be viewed as one entity unless those parties have formally establisheda separate entity that involves them both.``Posted Price''_One industry commenter stated that the word ``posted''is an outdated term which should be deleted and that the following underlinedlanguage should be added to the definition. ``Posted price means the pricein the field, net of all deductions, as specified in a publicly available* * * price bulletin <T3>or price notices available as part of normal business operations toan operator desiring to do business with specific purchasers,</T3> thata buyer is willing to pay for quantities of unprocessed gas, residue gas,or gas plant products of marketable condition * * *.'' The commenter alsostated that, ``if gas price bulletins become generally circulated, it maybe that some buyers may not publish a price bulletin as that term is normallyused in the industry, but will provide and make available price quotationsor notices to any operator (seller) desiring to do business with the buyer.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has revised the definition in the finalrule. For clarification purposes, the word ``condition'' replaces the word``quality'' which follows the word ``marketable'' in the first sentence.The phrase ``net of all deductions'' has been modified to read ``net ofall adjustments.'' As used in this definition, the term ``adjustments''refers to deductions from the price of gas or gas plant products for qualityadjustments. Adjustments for location also may be taken into account whereappropriate.``Processing''_Two industry commenters recommended ``that a clarifyingstatement be included to recognize that a plant may be located on the lessee'sFederal/Indian lease. If a gas plant is located on a lease, then any ofthe `field processes', as set out in the definition may well be an integralpart of the plant process and consequently must be considered elementsof processing.'' One industry commenter suggested that the following sentencebe inserted between the proposed second and third sentences: ``However,these processes will be considered as processing if they are included asan inherent part of the process to separate the produced gas into gas plantproducts and residue gas.'' Two industry commenters recommended ``The additionof the word `fractionation' at the end of the first sentence. Fractionationis a plant process and an allowance should be granted as is currently allowedby MMS.''One Federal agency commenter stated that some confusion may arise whencomparing proposed andSection; 206.151(bb) to proposed andSection; 206.158(d).``Once the gas reaches the gas plant it would be arguable that any processassociated with treating the gas, such as dehydration or mechanical separation,is generating a gas plant product that would be eligible for a processingcost deduction.''One industry commenter suggested changing the definition of ``processing''to: <T3>`` `Manufacturing:' </T3>The transformation of a raw gas stream intoone or more saleable products by processes other than dehydration, standardfield conditioning and separation techniques. Manufacturing includes gasprocessing, sweetening, purification, desulfurization, gas separation,adsorption, absorption, liquefaction and other extraction techniques. Furthermore,gas processing should be defined as: <T3>Gas Processing: </T3>The manufacturing technique whereby wet gas istreated to remove natural gas liquids such that the natural gas liquidsand dry residue gas are separately marketable.'' This commenter thinksthat ``manufacturing also includes the physical operation attendant tothe specific manufacturing process such as the dehydration and compressionsteps which occur within a gas plant. The MMS has instead attempted tolimit its attention to `gas processing' and thus provides an allowanceonly to such operations. The position of the MMS is based upon a clearmisapplication of the <T3>Udall </T3>case, namely, that all operations for placing gas in marketablecondition, <T3>including manufacturing operations, </T3>are not deductible. Compoundingits error, the MMS ignores the <T3>General Petroleum </T3>holding, not affected by <T3>Udall, </T3>that residue gas is a manufactured product, and so proposesthat no manufacturing cost be deducted against the residue gas.''One State commenter stated that the definition of ``processing'' is veryvague. According to this commenter, the distinction between ``field processing''and other ``processing'' is not clearly drawn. The commenter asserted that``The ambiguity of the definition of `processing' would not be so troublingexcept for the fact that it seems to control the meaning of the term `unprocessedgas,' which is not defined in the proposed regulations despite its criticalimportance. One would think that regulations aimed at providing certaintywould present clear guidelines for identifying the `processing' costs inwhich the royalty owner must share.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has considered the comments carefully butdisagrees that the proposed definition is confusing and vague. Therefore,it will be retained unchanged in the final rule.``Residue Gas''_One industry commenter suggested that ``Residue gas mayalso include ethane.'' Another industry commenter recommends deleting thisdefinition but states: ``Nevertheless, if this definition is maintainedresidue gas should be restricted to residue gas resulting from processingsweet gas containing hydrocarbons.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has not adopted the suggestions made bythe commenters and the definition remains unchanged. The definition recognizesthat residue gas may include ethane.``Spot Sales''_One industry commenter suggested deleting all language inthe proposed definition that follows the word ``duration.'' According tothis commenter, ``The additional language is not necessary to define aspot sales agreement as it defines what is <T3>not </T3>required, versus what <T3>is </T3>required.''One industry commenter suggested deleting the clause ``* * * which doesnot require a cancellation notice to terminate * * *'' ``Many spot salesagreements require ten (10), thirty (30), or sixty (60) days notices ofcancellation * * *. The MMS purpose of including only those contracts whichdo not imply an intent to continue in subsequent periods is adequatelyserved by the balance of the definition.''Three industry/trade group commenters recommended that this paragraph shouldbe retitled as ```spot/direct sales agreements' and a definition for directsales be added as follows: A direct sale (which generally does not containa reserve dedication) is a similar agreement but is usually made with anend user or local distribution company <T3>and can be a short or long term contract.''</T3>One industry commenter recommended adding the following sentence to thedefinition: ``A spot or direct sale which meets all of the criteria ofan arm's-length contract as defined in andSection; 206.151(d) of these regulationsshall be treated as an arm's-length contract according to these regulations.''The commenter believes that the proposed definition must clearly statethat a spot sales agreement will be treated as arm's-length if it meetsall the requirements of an arm's-length agreement.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>In the final rule, MMS has inserted the word ``normally''immediately preceding the phrase ``require a cancellation notice to terminate.''The MMS also agrees that there are spot sales which constitute arm's-lengthcontracts. However, to be considered as a comparable arm's-length contractin the valuation of gas which is not sold pursuant to an arm's-length contract,these contracts also must meet other standards. See, for example, andSection;206.152(c)(1).``Take-or-pay payment''_Several industry comments were received on thisdefinition and all recommended its deletion. The comments are reflectedby the following statement of one of the commenters: ``While the definitionproposed is technically correct, it should be deleted from the proposedrule because, as stated in the discussion of andSection; 206.151(m) above,take-or-pay payments are not consideration for the sale of production.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has decided that the definition of take-or-paypayment is unnecessary. Take-or-pay payments have a generally understoodmeaning in the industry and may take different forms. MMS has decided toremove any definition from the final rules since a regulatory definitionmay not correspond with all types of payments which fall within the conceptof take-or-pay payments which should be royalty bearing. The MMS alreadyaddressed above the issue of whether take-or-pay payments should be includedin gross proceeds.``Warranty Contract''_One industry commenter stated that ``the exclusionof warranty contracts from the valuation of gross proceeds under an arm's-lengthcontract is intended to exclude those low-value warranty contracts thatwere entered into prior to the mid 1970's. However, the proposed definitionis so broad that it will encompass future negotiated selling arrangements.''To clearly express the MMS's intent, the commenter ``proposes that thedefinition be restricted to those contracts entered into before a specificdate.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has modified the definition to refer onlyto long-term contracts entered into prior to 1970. This also includes contractsentered into prior to 1970 that may have been amended either before orafter 1970.Proposed New DefinitionsCommenters have proposed adding the following definitions to the list ofexisting definitions: natural gas liquids; post-production costs; production;production costs; royalty; and unavoidably lost gas.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has decided not to include any of the suggestedadditional definitions. The terms either have a recognized meaning (suchas ``royalty'') or are not used in the regulations (such as ``post-productioncosts'').Section 206.152 Valuation standards_unprocessed gas.Section 206.152(a).Paragraph (a)(1) provides that the provisions of andSection; 206.152 applyonly to gas that is sold or otherwise disposed of by the lessee pursuantto an arm's-length contract prior to processing. The section expresslydoes not apply to contracts where the lessee reserves the right to processthe gas or to percent-of-proceeds contracts. Several industry commentersstated that the proposal to exclude percent-of-proceeds contracts fromthis section is unreasonable and unfair to the lessee. They stated thatthe percentage of proceeds mechanism is a means of arriving at the wellheadvalue and is not a sale of processed gas. The commenters also stated thatthe requirement to submit allowances forms to MMS in these cases wouldbe burdensome and, with the provision for exceeding the processing allowancelimitations, such treatment is unnecessary. All industry commenters recommendedclassifying percent-of-proceeds contracts under unprocessed gas.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS still believes that the percentage-of-proceedscontracts should be treated as processed gas as proposed. Without suchtreatment, lessees would be free to avoid many requirements and limitationsof the valuation regulations simply by the manner in which they structuretheir contracts. In many cases the lessee will agree to any terms dictatedby the processing plant owner to be able to realize revenue from the oilproduction from its wells. Under some cases MMS is familiar with, lesseeshave agreed to provide fuel to run compressors off the lease without compensationand lessees have given all or a substantial portion of any condensate recoveredbetween the point of title transfer and the inlet of the plant to the plantoperator without compensation. Further, in some cases, the lessee may allowitself to be paid based upon prices received by the plant operator undera non-arm's-length contract without the lessee being able to ensure thatthose prices reflect market value. Finally, MMS does not believe that anypercentage-of-proceeds contracts, even being arm's-length contracts, wouldbe an acceptable benchmark for determining values under non-arm's-lengthpercentage-of-proceeds contracts. However, the final rule includes provisionsfor an exception from processing allowance limitations (see andSection; 206.158(c)(3)),which should address many of the commenters' concerns).An Indian commenter stated that this section is inconsistent with the rulingin <T3>Jicarilla Apache Tribe v. Supron, </T3>which held that under the termsof the Indian leases in dispute, wet gas had to be valued as the higherof the value at the lease or as the value of all products at the tailgateof the plant, less transportation and processing costs.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS's regulations recognize the primacy of statutes,treaties, and oil and gas leases, thus providing a means for determiningspecial valuation requirements not only for Indian leases, but also forFederal leases. Many Indian leases have provisions that require dual accountingfor processed Indian gas production.Section 206.152(a)(2).One Indian commenter stated that this proposed rule authorizes alterationsin dealings between the Indian lessor and the industry lessee. The commenterfurther stated that this provision will result in royalties which are adjustedfor transportation costs not contemplated by either party to the lease.The commenter recommended that all references to transportation allowancesbe deleted and that value be defined, for royalty purposes, to be the fair-marketvalue of the gas at the lease in marketable condition. One industry commenter objected to the concept of determining royalty onthe value of gas and the associated products after completion of the manufacturingor processing phase. The commenter recommended that royalty be due onlyon the market value of the product as it is produced at the wellhead.Industry commenters recommended that the phrase ``less applicable transportation''should be expanded to include other cost allowances such as productioncosts.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has modified the final rule to refer to``applicable allowances''. In response to the comments, transportationallowances generally are appropriate for most Indian leases. The regulationrefers to ``applicable'' allowances and does not imply that any and alltransportation costs can be deducted. If transportation allowances arenot appropriate, the word ``applicable'' restricts application only tothose leases where they can be applied.The MMS is including in the final rule a new paragraph (a)(3) which statesthat for any Indian leases which provide that the Secretary may considerthe highest price paid or offered for a major portion (major portion) indetermining value, MMS will, where data are available and where it is practicable,compare the value determined in accordance with the prescribed standardswith the major portion. The rule provides that the royalty value, for royaltypurposes, will be the higher of those two values. The draft final ruleincluded a provision that if MMS determines that the major portion resultsin an unreasonably high value, then it will not be used for royalty purposes.Many Indian commenters thought that, for their leases which include a specificreference to the major portion, value should establish a minimum value,and a major portion value in most cases will be reasonable because at leasthalf the gas is sold at or above that price. The MMS agrees and has madethe change to the final rule.Many Indian commenters raised concerns about the qualifications includedin this paragraph. These commenters must recognize that if data are notavailable, it is impossible to do a major portion analysis.The MMS is also including in paragraph (a)(3) a description of how themajor portion is computed. It will be determined using like quality gas,which includes legal characteristics (generally, the specific NGPA category).Only gas sales under arm's-length contracts will be used because non-arm's-lengthcontracts may not reflect market value. The production will be arrayedfrom highest price to lowest price (at the bottom). The major portion isthat price at which 50 percent (by volume) plus one mcf of the gas (startingfrom the bottom up) is sold. An industry commenter recommended deletionof the reference to ``area''. However, because only arm's-length contractsare used in the analysis, the field may not yield a sufficiently reasonablesample in all cases. Generally, it will not be necessary to look beyondthe field.The MMS believes that for these Indian leases, by comparing the major portionto values determined using arm's-length-contract prices or the benchmarksfor non-arm's-length-contracts, and using the higher of the two, the Indianswill be receiving royalties in accordance with their contract with thelessee.Section 206.152(b).Several industry commenters stated that they supported the concept of relyingon gross proceeds in an arm's-length transaction as the principal determinantof value. Some industry commenters also endorsed the overall approach tovaluation determination procedures and eliminating the requirement thata lessee obtain preapproval. Industry commenters supported the acceptanceof the gross proceeds received by their marketing affiliates under arm's-lengthcontracts as value rather than treating the initial transfer to the marketingaffiliate as a non-arm's-length transaction subject to valuation underthe benchmark system. Industry also suggested that the regulations be amendedto provide that, when the marketing affiliate sells commingled productionfrom many leases to many parties and the sales contracts do not specifythe source of the gas, the value of the gas sold from all contributingleases be defined as the weighted average price at which the productionwas sold.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS agrees with the commenter that the valueof gas sold in the manner described by the commenter is properly definedby the weighted average price at which the commingled stream was sold,but believes that guidelines to be prepared for inclusion in the MMS oiland Gas Payor Handbook would be the proper place to specifically addressthe issue.One Indian commenter recommended that a definition of gas value, for royaltypurposes, be based on the highest price paid or offered for similar gasin the same field or area, and requested MMS to adopt the following approach:<T3>Section 206.102 (sic) Valuation Standards.</T3>(a) Remains the same.(b) The value of gas which is sold pursuant to a contract shall be thegross proceeds accruing, or which could accrue, to the lessee, <T3>provided that </T3>such proceeds do not fall more than 10 percent belowthe greater of the highest price paid or posted for similar gas in thesame field or area. If such proceeds fall more than 10 percent below suchprices, the value of gas in that case shall be 10 percent below the greaterof the highest price paid or posted for similar gas in the same field orarea. A State commenter stated that the proposed regulations would allow substantialmanipulation and undervaluation of the royalty amount because it is unacceptableto allow lessees to use contract prices as the royalty value without adequatesafeguards to assure a fair valuation. They recommended at a minimum, onlyprices under ``genuine'' arm's-length contracts should be acceptable forroyalty purposes and urged MMS to at least impose a floor value, such as80 percent of the value of production as determined under the ``value''criteria applicable to gas not sold under arm's-length contracts. One Indian commenter recommended the inclusion of provisions specificallyreserving to MMS the right to review and audit ``arm's-length'' contractsand that the proceeds under all contracts should be subject to price checks_marketvalue analysis_before being accepted as value. Another Indian commenterrequested that all arm's-length contracts be filed with MMS and that MMSrequire that agreements for the sale or disposition of gas within differentbranches of the same company be in writing and on file.One Indian commenter stated that ``if MMS is to properly undertake itsresponsibilities, a predetermination of value on which royalty is to bebased should be made <T3>before </T3>production value is reported.'' In addition, it was recommendedthat the Secretary should determine whether each contract is arm's-lengthor non-arm's-length instead of allowing the lessee to make this determination.Also, it was suggested that the Secretary should have all benchmarks availableto him and MMS should have the flexibility to set benchmark minimum pricesestablished by the highest price paid or offered for a major portion ofgas produced from the field or area.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The suggestions to predetermine the value on whichroyalty is to be based were not adopted because of the increase in administrativeburden which would be very costly for MMS (and, in some instances, to industry).An internal sales agreement cannot be considered to be arm's-length.In response to a large number of comments from the States, Indians, andindustry, MMS has modified the regulations which govern the valuation ofgas production sold pursuant to arm's-length contracts. For almost allsuch sales, the value for royalty purposes will continue to be the grossproceeds accruing to the lessee. Under MMS's existing regulations, thelessee's gross proceeds pursuant to an arm's-length contract are acceptable,though not conclusively, as the value for royalty purposes. The MMS believesthat the gross proceeds standard should be applied to arm's-length salesfor several reasons. The MMS typically accepts this value because it iswell grounded in the realities of the marketplace where, in most cases,the 7/8ths or 5/6ths owner will be striving to obtain the highest attainableprice for the gas production for the benefit of itself. The royalty ownerbenefits from this incentive. It also adds more certainty to the valuation process for payors and providesthem with a clear and logical value on which to base royalties. Under thefinal regulations, in most instances the lessee will not have to be concernedthat several years after the production has been sold MMS will establishroyalty value in excess of the arm's-length contract proceeds, therebyimposing a potential hardship on the lessee. This is particularly a concernfor lessees who have long-term arm's-length contracts where sales pricesunder newer contracts may be higher. If MMS were to establish royalty valuebased on prices under those newer contracts, (<T3>i.e., </T3>prices which the lessee cannot obtain under its contract),the resulting royalty obligation could, in some instances, consume thelessee's entire proceeds.Establishing gross proceeds under an arm's-length contract as the royaltyvalue also has benefits for MMS and those States which assist MMS in theaudit and enforcement efforts. The gross proceeds standard will give auditorsan objective basis for measuring lessee compliance. It will reduce auditworkload and reduce the administrative appeal burden which results whenvaluation standards are too subjective, particularly when values are determinedto be in excess of a lessee's arm's-length contract gross proceeds.The MMS recognizes, however, that there must be exceptions to the generalrule that the lessee's arm's-length contract price should be accepted withoutquestion as the value for royalty purposes. One such situation is wherethe contract does not reflect all of the consideration flowing either directlyor indirectly from the buyer to the seller. For example, in return forSeller's reduced price for gas production from a Federal lease, Buyer mayagree to reduce the price of oil it sells to the Seller from a non-Federallease. This agreement is not reflected in the gas sales contract. In theevent that MMS becomes aware of consideration that exists outside the fourcorners of the contract, MMS could accept the lessee's gross proceeds asvalue, adjusted to reflect the additional consideration. However, in somecircumstances the additional consideration may not be easily calculable.Thus, even if the parties are not affiliated and the contract is ``arm's-length,''MMS may require in paragraph (b)(1)(ii) that the gas production be valuedin accordance with paragraph (c), the standards used to value gas disposedof under non-arm's-length contracts. Under these standards, the lessee'sgross proceeds still may determine value, but the lessee will be requiredto demonstrate comparability to other arm's-length contracts. Thus, despitemany industry comments suggesting that this section be deleted, MMS isretaining it in the final rules.The MMS recognizes that some parties may have multiple contracts with oneanother. This fact alone would not cause a contract to be treated as non-arm's-length.Rather, there must be some indication that the contract in question doesnot reflect the full agreement between the parties. Although many commentersdisagreed with the requirement, the final regulations also include a provisionwhereby MMS may require a lessee to certify that the terms of its arm's-lengthcontract reflect all the consideration flowing from the buyer to the sellerfor the gas. The commenters believed that values already were subject toaudit and that was a sufficient safeguard. The MMS is retaining this provisionbecause there may be circumstances where an auditor could not reasonablybe expected to find other consideration, yet there is good reason to believeit exists. Because of the potentially severe penalties for a false certification,this will assure that no other consideration exists when the certificationis received.In other situations it may not be apparent why an arm's-length contractprice is unusually low, yet the lessor should not accept the arm's-lengthcontract proceeds as value. It may be because of collusion between thebuyer and seller or improper conduct by the seller, or it could be theresult of a patently imprudent contract. Even if the contract is betweenunaffiliated persons and thus ``arm's-length,'' pursuant to paragraph (b)(1)(iii),if MMS determines that the gross proceeds do not reflect the reasonablevalue of the production because of misconduct by the contracting partiesor because the lessee otherwise has breached its duty to the lessor tomarket the production for the mutual benefit of the lessee and the lessor,then MMS may require that the gas production be valued pursuant to paragraph(c)(2) or (c)(3). Thus, MMS first must determine that a price is unreasonable;for example, by looking at comparable contracts and sales. Then MMS mustdetermine that the unreasonably low price was the result of misconductor a breach by the lessee of its duty to market its production for themutual benefit of itself and the lessor.A breach of the lessee's duty to market production to the mutual benefitof the lessor includes, but is not limited to, collusion between the producer/sellerand buyer, pricing practices found by a court or regulatory authority tobe incorrect or fraudently manipulated, or negligence in negotiating contracts.The MMS believes that new andSection; 206.152(b) establishes a more definablestandard than subsection (b) of the first draft final rule at 52 FR 30813(``whether there may be factors which would cause the contract not to bearm's-length''). Although MMS retains the discretion under this sectionnot to accept an arm's-length contract price as value, which many commentersthought was a necessary provision in these regulations, there are limitson the exercise of that discretion.Some commenters requested that the rules require MMS to give a lessee anopportunity to respond before making a finding under subsection (b)(iii).As a general matter, the appeals regulations in 30 CFR Part 290 give thelessee such an opportunity before a final MMS decision is made. However,MMS will give a lessee an informal opportunity to comment when it determinesthe lessee has breached its duty to market the gas for the mutual benefitof the lessee and the lessor. If valuation in accordance with the second and third benchmarks in paragraph(c) is required, then the lessee also must follow the notification requirementsof paragraph (e)(3).The suggestion that the Secretary should determine whether each contractis arm's-length or non-arm's-length was implied in the rules. However,the MMS has added a clarifying provision to the final rule which providesthat the lessee will have the burden of demonstrating that its contractis arm's-length. This includes overcoming presumptions of control wheretwo parties are possibly affiliated.Section 206.152(b)(2) of the proposed rules excepted warranty contractsfrom the general acceptance of gross proceeds as value for arm's-lengthcontracts. One industry commenter recommended that advance MMS approvalnot be required for the value of gas sold pursuant to a warranty contractsince all activities are subject to audit. Two industry commenters stated that this section should be deleted andthat the gross proceeds received by the producer under a warranty contractshould be used for determining royalty just as it is for other arm's-lengthcontracts.Two industry commenters recommended that MMS consider limiting the warrantycontracts exception to those contracts entered into before a specific date,such as prior to the mid-1970's.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has adopted the rule that the value of gassold pursuant to a warranty contract will be determined by MMS. The issueof limiting the definition of warranty contracts to those executed priorto 1970 was discussed above in the definition of warranty contract.Most industry commenters strongly disagreed with the language ``or whichcould accrue'' contained throughout the regulations. Most companies recommendedthat the language be deleted. Most commenters stated that the languageis too speculative and appears to provide for a second-guess mechanismunder which a lessee's sale today can be reviewed in light of knowledgegained at a later date.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has determined that the phrase ``or whichcould accrue'' will be deleted in reference to gross proceeds. Many commentersthought that this phrase would allow MMS to second guess the price whichthe lessee agreed to in its contract by arguing that other persons sellinggas may have received higher prices_thus, more proceeds ``could have accrued''to the lessee. This was not MMS's purpose in including the ``or which couldaccrue'' language in the proposed rule. Rather, MMS's intent is to ensurethat royalties are paid on the full amount to which the lessee is entitledunder its contract, not just on the amount of money it may actually receivefrom its purchaser. However, MMS is satisfied that the phrase ``the grossproceeds accruing to the lessee'' properly includes all consideration towhich the lessee is entitled under its contract, not necessarily just whatit actually receives from the buyer. Therefore, the ``or which could accrue''phrase was unnecessary. Because it caused confusion as to MMS's intent,it was deleted from the final rule.One Indian commenter stated that ``acceptance of gross proceeds as conclusiveevidence of value is an abrogation of the Secretary's fiduciary duties,''and that they do not believe ``gross proceeds accruing or which could haveaccrued in an arm's-length transaction should be determinative of valuefor gas produced from Indian and Federal leases.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>As discussed previously, these rules do not providefor conclusive acceptance of gross proceeds except in well-defined andappropriate circumstances. The MMS believes that the rules as adopted withthe changes discussed earlier will result in appropriate values for Indianleases, in accordance with the Secretary's responsibilities.Section 206.152(c).Gas which is not sold pursuant to an arm's-length contract is requiredby the regulations to be valued in accordance with a series of benchmarks.Several State, Indian, and industry commenters disagree with various aspectsof the proposed benchmark system because they think that it is vague andsubjective. Two State commenters stated that because the majority of gascontracts are not arm's-length, the benchmark system proposed by MMS maybe too complex. They recommend that ``* * * MMS should study the numerouspricing provisions related to gas sales, and on the basis of the studyestablish Federal floor values which could be used by lessees to computea minimum royalty and which would be publicly available.''One State commenter believes that the appropriateness of using the benchmarksystem depends upon whether the benchmarks are fair and reliable. Accordingto this commenter, ``The proposed system would not be fair to the royaltyowner because it would lead to the potential for abuse and would certainlyresult in the diminution of royalties. It would be unreliable because thestandards are vague, subjective, and subject to abuse. Unlike the proposedbenchmarks for oil valuation, we do not believe that the proposed gas valuationbenchmarks can be developed into a fair and workable system. Instead, webelieve all the factors listed in paragraphs (c)(1) through (c)(4) shouldbe combined into a single valuation standard.'' One industry commenterstated that although the proposed benchmark system gives producers moreconfidence in arriving at value, it falls short of providing a method todetermine an exact royalty amount when royalty is due.Many industry representatives and trade groups and one Indian trade group,with minor changes, support the benchmarks and giving them priorities becauseboth will add certainty to valuation determinations. They commend MMS forthe recognition of market forces as the principal determinant of value.One commenter stated that ``The truest representation of the value of aproduct is what it can be sold for on the open market, at arm's-length.The proposed benchmarks for valuation of gas under arm's-length contract,non-arm's-length contract, and no contract transactions promote accuratevaluation according to the marketplace, and provide rational standardsfor MMS to follow in monitoring establishment of gas value.''Some commenters stated that the benchmarks should not be prioritized. Rather,value should be determined using the most applicable benchmark. These samecommenters recommended combining the first two benchmarks. Other commenterssuggested a different ordering of the benchmarks.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS believes that a prioritized benchmark systemis a valid and usable system for determining the value of gas not soldpursuant to an arm's-length contract. The system allows the lessee somecertainty in determining its own value without dependence upon MMS to establishthe value. The suggestion that MMS develop Federal floor values is notfeasible or equitable and would be difficult to administer. Therefore,other than some minor modifications, the benchmarks have been adopted asproposed. The MMS believes that the proposed ordering of the benchmarksbasically is correct and equitable to both the lessee and lessor. The MMSagrees that the net-back method will not be used frequently. The net-backanalysis should only be used where less complex procedures are not feasible.For purposes of this section, MMS does not consider a situation where eithertransportation or processing allowances are deducted from an arm's-lengthdelivered sales price for gas as a net back. Such procedures will typicallybe used for royalty valuation. See the discussion of the net-back methodabove.In the draft final rule, MMS combined the first two benchmarks. The standardstill was the lessee's gross proceeds, but the lessee was determining comparabilityagainst a broader sample which helps ensure that the lessee's gross proceedsreflect the value of the gas in the market, not just what that lessee considersto be the market value.MMS received many industry comments suggesting that the first two benchmarksbe separated again because the lessee's own sales data are a good measureof value and are determinable. Sales data of other persons often are notavailable, according to these commenters.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS believes that the benchmarks will be retainedas revised in the second draft final rule. These benchmarks best ensurethat the lessee's non-arm's-length prices are reasonable determinants ofvalue.Some States and Indian lessors stated that when applying benchmarks, itshould not be necessary in all circumstances to consider all other salesin the field. In other instances, it may be necessary to look beyond thefield. The MMS agrees that the size of any sample cannot be predeterminedbut must be based upon the actual circumstances in the field or area.Three Indian commenters stated that MMS's failure to recognize its obligationto maximize tribal royalties is evidenced in the proposed benchmark system.One commenter stated that ``MMS, however, relies on lessee-generated informationfor that determination and, moreover, relies upon the truthfulness of thatinformation. For example, under alternative number one, MMS proposes tolook at the lessee's comparable contracts in the same field or area, notwithstandingpossible underselling during the same period. Plainly, this benchmark isso riddled with potential conflicts of interest that it cannot possiblybe urged as consistent with the Federal fiduciary duty to maximize Indianoil and gas resources.'' Another commenter stated that the proposed benchmarksystem is based on the premise that gross proceeds represents market valueand ``Gross proceeds have always been considered as the minimum value ofproduction because it has long been recognized that price does not alwaysindicate value. The proposed benchmarks appear to treat gross proceedsas the maximum value.'' This commenter ``believes that gas production shouldbe valued at the highest price posted or paid in the field regardless ofwhether the contract is arm's-length or non-arm's-length * * *.'' Finally,one Indian commenter stated that ``The lease provisions should prevailand should require the Secretary to formulate and implement proceduresfor the majority portion analysis. These provisions of the regulationsshould include a statement which indicates that it will not be appliedto Indian Tribal and allottee leases. If, however, these provisions willbe applied to Indian tribal and allottee leases, then each benchmark shouldbe considered a reasonable option that the Secretary can utilize to determinevalue and the Secretary should use the reasonable option which brings thehighest revenue to the Indian Tribe or allottee.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS believes that the regulations adopted willpermit the Secretary to discharge his responsibilities to the Tribes andallottees because the value determined in accordance with the benchmarkswill be compared to the major portion, with royalties due on the highervalue. This process is required by paragraph (a)(3), discussed above.One industry commenter recommended that ``the last benchmark of net-backpricing be eliminated from the list because we believe that it would notbe routinely used and would be administratively impractical to implement.The reference to any other reasonable method to determine value shouldbe retained.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS disagrees that the net-back method shouldbe deleted. The net-back method is a viable valuation procedure, even thoughit will not be routinely used. One industry commenter stated that ``* * * depending upon how one treats`spot sales', the hierarchy of measures which they establish could resultin a substitution of a poorer measure for one that represents the bestmeasure of gas value.'' This commenter recommended placing spot-sale agreementshigher in the hierarchy of benchmarks.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS believes that the position of ``spot sales''in the benchmark system is appropriate. The first two proposed benchmarks,combined as one in the final rule, are a better measure of establishingvalue for royalty purposes than spot sales. The rule has been modifiedto reference ``arm's-length'' spot sales.One industry commenter suggests that the wording of the criteria shouldbe amended to avoid ambiguity in their application: ``As currently written,these provisions are unclear as to how royalty should be valued if theproceeds under the non-arm's-length contract is not `equivalent' to theproceeds of the lessee's arm's-length contracts (first criterion) or thearm's-length contracts of other lessees in the field (second criterion).''This commenter ``* * * understands the intent of the proposed regulationsis that the proceeds under the referenced arm's-length contracts wouldbe used to set royalties, but the regulation does not expressly so state.Indeed, as presently worded, the regulation would suggest that if the non-arm's-lengthcontract was not `equivalent', then the next criterion in the hierarchywould apply. This ambiguity should be removed.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS disagrees that these provisions are unclear.Under the benchmark system, value will be determined through applicationof criteria in a prescribed order. In other words, the second criterionwould not be considered unless the first criterion could not be reasonablyapplied. Therefore, if the proceeds under comparable arm's-length contractsin the field are not ``equivalent'' to the proceeds under the non-arm's-lengthcontract, then the first benchmark does not apply and the lessee shouldtry to apply the second benchmark. If that one also does not apply, thenthe lessee must apply the third benchmark.One industry commenter stated that ``for making comparisons to arm's-lengthcontracts, when the producer is selling gas to an affiliate and that affiliateis also purchasing gas in the same field or area under an arm's-lengthcontract, the marketing experiences of the parties to the arm's-lengthcontract should be a primary consideration (not just of the volume of gassold, for example). If the producer under a comparable arm's-length contractis active in the marketplace, it is only reasonable that he would neitheraccept less nor pay more than the market price for gas. In addition, largervolumes of gas do not always attract a better price than a smaller volume.In some cases, the larger volume is harder to move because it has to besold in pieces.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The rules, as adopted, require that there be numerousfactors considered before an arm's-length contract could be deemed comparable.The purpose for consideration of these factors is to prevent abuses throughapplication of only a few factors so that contracts containing unusuallylow or high prices could be used.Many industry commenters recommended that legal characteristics of thegas be included in the comparability criteria in paragraph (c)(1).<T3>MMS Response: </T3>This addition is unnecessary as the section alreadyrefers to like-quality gas, which is defined as including legal characteristics.One industry commenter suggested ``an alteration to the proposed regulationsunder andSection;andSection; 206.152 and 206.153 to validate any intracompanyor affiliate intercompany `sale', if that transaction is monitored by aregulatory body to determine the market responsiveness of the transaction.Specifically, the commenter suggests that MMS's proposed regulations recognizethe FERC's right to determine the justness and reasonableness of (producer)`first sale' market rates, where those costs are `passed on' to interstatepipeline sale-for-resale customers via Purchased Gas Cost Adjustment Clausesfiled by interstate pipelines as part of their FERC Gas Tariff.''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS and FERC have different statutory responsibilities.It is MMS's responsibility to determine the value of production from Federaland Indian leases. Although FERC's actions may be one criterion to considerin determining value, MMS cannot accept them as conclusive.One industry commenter stated that under the benchmark system it is difficultfor an affiliated producer to prove its determination of value, especiallywith respect to those properties it does not operate. According to thiscommenter, ``The MMS is in the unique position of having access to data,facts, and information that are not readily available to an individualproducer. Indeed, attempts to gather such information might violate antitrustlaws. Without access to this information on a continuing basis, applicationof these benchmarks becomes difficult, if not impossible.'' This commenterrecommended ``that the burden of proof be shifted to the MMS such thata rebuttable presumption exists that the gross proceeds accrued to an affiliatedproducer is reasonable value absent a clear showing to the contrary bythe MMS using these benchmarks.'' Other commenters also suggested thatMMS gather and make available sales data in certain fields.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>Obviously, a lessee will be able to obtain the necessarydata on its sales for application of the first benchmark. The MMS alsobelieves that in most fields or areas lessees will be able to obtain dataon third-party transactions. If those data are unavailable, the lesseewill have to use one of the succeeding benchmarks, but in no event canthe lessee use a value which is less than its gross proceeds. Because valuesdetermined under the second and third benchmarks must be the subject ofa notice to MMS (see andSection; 206.152(e)(3) of the final rules), and becausea lessee may seek a value determination from MMS (see andSection; 206.152(g)of the final rules), MMS is satisfied that ultimately the lessee will beable to determine the proper royalty value for its gas.One State commenter noted that it is inappropriate to put the valuationprocess into a benchmark straight jacket. In addition, this commenter statedthat this paragraph permits a lessee to deliberately price its non-arm's-lengthdisposition at the lowest price it can argue to be ``comparable'' in thefield, even where much higher values may be obtained in other dispositionsfrom the field.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>A lessee will have many factors to consider in establishinga price under its non-arm's-length contracts, including tax consequencesand regulatory concerns. If the price selected is equivalent to the priceunder comparable arm's-length contracts which must meet the standards inparagraph (c)(1), MMS is satisfied that the price reflects market valueand is acceptable for royalty purposes.One Indian commenter was concerned that the lessee would apparently makethe determination as to whether the ``arm's-length'' contract under whichthe comparison is made is, in fact, arm's-length. Also, although the dataare subject to monitoring, review, and audit by MMS, the commenter believesthat in view of the past experience with audits by MMS, the lessees' reportingof gross proceeds under non-arm's-length contracts would remain on thehonor system.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>Under most valuation procedures MMS considered forthese regulations, it would be up to the lessee in the first instance toapply those procedures and report royalties each month. The MMS has adoptedrules which it hopes are clear and comprehensible. It must be assumed thatlessees will apply the rules properly considering the likelihood of auditand the possibility of significant interest and perhaps penalties for intentionalunderpayment of royalties.One industry commenter interpreted the regulations to require that gassold pursuant to spot-sales contracts would be valued under the first benchmark,even though ``spot sales'' are mentioned in a later benchmark. In addition,the commenter stated that the best measure of value for gas sold pursuantto arm's-length spot sale contracts are those contracts and not other long-termcontracts which are not comparable.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>If a spot-sales contract is arm's-length, the valueof the gas sold under it would be determined pursuant to paragraph (b),not by application of the benchmarks.Two industry commenters stated that the net-back method should be strickenfrom this section because the net-back method is to be used as a benchmarkonly when the preceding benchmarks are inapplicable; therefore, to thesecommenters it seems inappropriate to include it as a presumed prioritywhen any other reasonable method is what is actually intended.One industry commenter stated that the reference to net-back method needsclarification. Further, the commenter stated that net-back method is simplya means for reconstructing the value of gas to the well and has nothingto do with valuing the disposition of the production at a point remotefrom the well.One State commenter noted that there is no logical basis for favoring valuationon the basis of ``gross proceeds'' less allowable deductions while disfavoring``net-back method''. Also, the net-back method is essentially the samething as ``gross proceeds'' with allowable deductions.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS believes that the benchmark priority systemis appropriate. As explained above in regard to the definition of net-backmethod, MMS does not anticipate that this method will be used frequently.It generally will be used where the nature of the product has changed (i.e.,gas to electricity) and it is necessary to work back from the sales priceof the electricity to get a value for the gas.Section 206.152(d).Two industry commenters supported the premise that ``if the maximum lawfulprice permitted by Federal law is less than the value determined pursuantto the valuation regulations, MMS would accept such maximum price as value.''One industry commenter recommended deleting the last sentence of this paragraphbecause gas sold under a warranty contract is valued in the same manneras gas sold pursuant to any other arm's-length contract.The MMS also received several comments from the Indians and States statingthat the rules should specify that State and local price ceilings willnot operate to limit the value for royalty purposes. The MMS proposed toinclude such a provision in the second draft final rule. Some commenterssupported this provision. Others, including mostly industry and one Statecommenter, objected to the provision on the grounds that it is unfair toproducers who must be bound by these ceilings when selling their production.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The final rulemaking adopts this paragraph withthe addition of a provision that price limitations set by any State orlocal government will not be considered to be a maximum price permittedby Federal law. Therefore, in some situations, value for royalty purposesmay exceed a State or local price limitation. The MMS agrees with thosecommenters who argued that States and local governments should not be ableto limit royalty values, particularly for Indian leases.The last sentence, which is now paragraph (d)(2), was not deleted becausethe MMS believes that warranty contracts must be viewed differently thanother arm's-length contracts for purposes of value. Unlike arm's-lengthcontracts for gas production which is committed to the contract, the sellerunder a warranty contract often had the sole authority to determine theorigin of the gas production to be delivered. Therefore, the seller hadthe option not to sell particular production from a Federal or Indian leaseunder the warranty contract and to sell it at a higher price. Thus, althoughin some NGPA categories the warranty contract price is the maximum pricepermitted by law for gas sold <T3>under that contract, </T3>it is the sole decision of the lessee todedicate gas from Federal or Indian leases to that contract.Section 206.152(e).Several industry and State commenters supported establishing a valuationprocedure which does not require the prior approval of MMS because it willexpedite and simplify the valuation process. Two industry commenters statedthat ``the time during which the MMS may direct a lessee to pay royaltyat a different value should be limited to a specific period so that thelessee is not required to indefinitely retain the records it relies uponto support the value determination.'' A State commenter noted that ``Also,the lessee should be required to retain `all data relevant to determinationof royalty value', not simply the evidence supporting the lessee's claimedvalue. A lessee should not be allowed to destroy relevant evidence supportinga different royalty valuation, and to retain only that which is self-serving.Also, the regulation should specify that MMS `will' order compliance whenincorrect payments are discovered.''Many industry commenters stated that the provision is too broad and shouldbe limited to fee lands within the boundaries of approved Federal unitor communitized areas. They argued that lessees should not be requiredto provide information on their other sales prices or volumes.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has adopted in the final rule a valuationprocedure that generally does not require MMS's prior approval. The secondsentence has been modified to read as follows: ``* * * the lessee shallretain all available data relevant to the determination of value.'' Lesseesare required to retain all records to support value determinations fora period of 6 years, unless an audit is ongoing, as mandated by section103 of FOGRMA, 30 U.S.C. 1713. The lessee is responsible for complyingfully with the regulations by properly valuing lease products, for royaltypurposes, in accordance with the appropriate benchmark and to retain allrelevant data. The MMS believes that the adopted language clearly statesthis requirement. The MMS also has adopted in paragraph (e)(2) of the finalregulations a requirement that lessees make available to authorized MMSState and Indian representatives, or to the Department's Office of theInspector General, arm's-length sales and volume data which it has availablefor like-quality production sold from the same field or area or nearbyfields or areas. Because lessees in many instances will be determiningvalue for Federal or Indian production by reference to other sales in thefield or area, MMS must have access to the data to the same extent as thelessee to determine whether the lessee's valuation was in accordance withthe regulations.Several industry commenters recommended that MMS delete the requirementof proposed paragraph (e)(2) that a lessee must notify MMS if it uses thethird or fourth (now second or third) benchmarks because it is not consistentwith MMS's self-implementing concept and current MMS auditing and monitoringrights are adequate to allow the MMS to verify royalty compliance.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that what is now paragraph (e)(3)in the final rule is consistent with its self-implementing policy becauselessees that determine value pursuant to paragraphs (c)(2) or (c)(3) ofthis section must notify MMS of their determination after the fact andnot before the fact. In every instance, value for royalty purposes is subjectto future audit. This section has been modified so that the notice is duethe end of the month following the month the lessee first reports royaltieson the Form MMS-2014 using paragraph (c)(2) or (c)(3).Section 206.152(f).One State commenter suggested that a ``provision should be made for penaltiesfor willful violations and violations made in reckless disregard of royaltyobligations.'' Industry representatives commented that if the lessee must pay any differenceplus interest, MMS should also pay, when applicable, any difference plusany interest statutorily authorized.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> If a lessee knowingly or willfully underpays royalty,it may be subject to civil penalties in accordance with FOGRMA, 30 U.S.C.1719, and MMS regulations at 30 CFR Part 241. With regard to the secondcomment, MMS is barred by law from paying interest on royalty overpaymentsbut is required by law (i.e. FOGRMA) to collect interest on late payments.Section 206.152(g).This paragraph provides that the lessee may request a value determinationfrom MMS. One State commenter noted that ``the lessee should be requiredto submit `all data relevant to determination of royalty value'. Again,a lessee should not be able to limit its documentary submittal to evidencewhich `supports' its claimed royalty value. Also, because of the impactupon the States and Indians, and in light of the existing cooperative andState audit programs, an opportunity should be given for review and commenton royalty determination requests by the potentially impacted State, AlaskaNative Corporation, Indian Tribe or Indian allottee.'' One Indian commentersuggested that in addition to a lessee, a lessor should at any time beable to request a royalty value determination from MMS. This commenteralso stated that ``this paragraph should require MMS to notify the Tribeor allottee involved of any change in value determinations.''Several industry commenters stated that ``the MMS should impose a timelimitation on itself to respond to requests for valuations from a lessee,in the absence of which the lessee should not be held liable for interestor penalties for underpayment of royalty.'' Further, one industry commenterstated that this section should be used to allow a value determinationto be made by MMS which would accommodate the circumstances of a particularlessee when its circumstances do not allow for a definitive value determinationunder the applicable benchmark. As an example, the commenter stated that,although its gas sales are made under arm's-length contracts, the mannerin which the gas is marketed (bundled sales of gas from many leases onthe spot market to many purchasers) prevents the tracing of the gas producedfrom any one lease to a particular sales outlet and, thus, the definingof the gross proceeds received from the sale of the gas produced from thatone lease.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The proposed language has been modified to requirethat a lessee submit all available data relevant to its valuation proposal.The MMS does not consider it practical to include in the regulations arequirement for review by the State or Indian lessor when a value determinationis made. This does not make the cooperative audit program in accordancewith FOGRMA less effective because MMS will make every effort to assistand consult with States and Indian lessors in valuation matters. The MMSalso will make every effort to respond timely to requests by lessees, butthis is necessarily dependent upon available resources; thus, MMS cannotagree to a regulatory time limit. The MMS has added a sentence to accommodatethe requested flexibility. Therefore, this section now provides that MMSmay use any of the valuation criteria authorized by the regulations whenissuing a value determination. The MMS has adopted this change becauseof the continuing changes in the way gas is marketed.Section 206.152(h).This paragraph provides generally that the value of production, for royaltypurposes, cannot be less than the lessee's gross proceeds less applicableallowances. One industry commenter recommended that the last sentence bereplaced with ``* * * allowance determined pursuant to these <T3>regulations.</T3>'' Another industry commenter recommended that thephrase ``less applicable transportation and processing allowances'' beexpanded to include ``and other cost allowances.'' Some industry commentersrecommended deleting these paragraphs entirely.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> For reasons discussed earlier in this preamble,MMS has determined that the phrase ``or which could accrue'' should bedeleted from the final rule. The MMS also has modified this section torefer to all applicable allowances, not just transportation allowances.<T3>Section 206.152(i).</T3>This paragraph addresses the lessee's obligation to place lease productionin marketable condition. Several State, Indian, and individual commentersagree with the MMS's proposed provision that costs such as those for compressionto meet pipeline pressure requirements to place the gas in marketable conditionshould be borne by the lessee.One industry commenter was concerned that ``marketable condition'' is nota constant, but acknowledges the lessee should act as a reasonably prudentoperator in marketing its products. Many industry commenters believed thatthe statutory framework and lease terms provide that royalty is due onlyon the market value of gas as it is produced at the wellhead and any obligationthe lessee may have to render the gas marketable does not entitle the lessorto a free ride on those expenses incurred by the lessee subsequent to production.These commenters also believed the lessee is entitled to deduct all reasonablepost-production expenses, including any costs incurred by the lessee tomake the product marketable.Some industry commenters recommended deleting this provision because ofthe changes occurring in the marketplace. They stated that these costsare subject to negotiation and may be incurred by either party. They believedthat it is incorrect to assume that costs incurred by a purchaser havea direct effect on the price to be paid and suggested that the price paidby the purchaser should be used for royalty valuation unless stated specificallyin the contract that it was adjusted to cover the subject costs. One industry commenter noted that the Federal Energy Regulatory Commissionhas rejected imposition of any national quality standards for gas soldin first sales and has left to each producer-purchaser contract the resolutionof which downstream-of-the-wellhead services are to be provided by whichparty to the contract. Reference was made to FERC Order No. 94A, 22 FERC61,055 (1983).Most industry commenters essentially believed that the lessor should proportionatelyshare in all costs subsequent to production, including the costs of placingproduction in marketable condition. They believed that all so-called ``postproduction'' costs should be shared because such costs are incurred toenhance the value of the production from the lease for the benefit of boththe lessee and the lessor; proportionate sharing of those costs would yielda value of production that is equal for both lessee and lessor. These commentersbelieved that royalty is due on the market value of production at the leaseor well, and that proportionate sharing of any post-production costs incurredto enhance the value of production is necessary to meet this requirement.They stated that, under the proposed rules, no allowance is made for thecosts of processing residue gas to place it in marketable condition orfor any other post-production costs incurred to dehydrate, compress, orgather the product. They further stated that MMS has abandoned the definitionof ``associated'' and ``principal'' products but the unjustified conceptunderlying these terms has apparently been retained. The industry commenters generally argued that MMS improperly sweeps allpost-production operations under the holding of the <T3>California </T3>v. <T3>Udall </T3>case. They stated that MMS goes so far as to say that evenif a buyer willingly buys raw, unconditioned gas (i.e., if there is anactual market for such gas in the field), any of the costs the buyer incursto place the gas in ``marketable'' condition will be added to the purchaseprice of the gas. They believed that this approach totally distorts theconcept of market value at the lease, ignores the holding in <T3>Udall, </T3>and exceeds the reasonable and legal limits of the Secretary'sdiscretion. They further stated that the Secretary should recognize therealities of today's onshore leasing and production and that all post-productioncosts should be deductible but, at the very least, they believed that off-leasepost-production and unusual or extraordinary on-lease post-production costsshould be shared proportionately. The industry commenters stated that the MMS should recognize that manufacturing/processing,transportation, and other post-production costs are legitimate deductionsnecessary to arrive at the value of production, for royalty purposes, atthe lease or well and that such costs should be deductible from the valueof all marketable products when necessary to reflect the actual expendituresthat enhanced the value of the gas after production. They further statedthat if MMS continues to rely on the <T3>Udall </T3>holding, its proper application requires a considerationof the purpose served by a particular facility to distinguish between costs``incidental to marketing'' and manufacturing or transportation costs.The MMS specifically requested comment on a provision in the draft finalrules which would provide an allowance for certain production related costsin extraordinary situations. Many comments were received from industrysupporting this provision and suggesting that it be broadened.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>Historically, the policy and practice of MMS isthat the lessee is responsible for placing the lease product in marketablecondition at no cost to the lessor. This practice has been upheld by courtdecision. The MMS has adopted the suggestion that the language ``unlessotherwise provided in the lease agreement'' be added at the end of thefirst sentence because there are a few leases in which the lessor sharesin such costs. Also, as noted earlier, MMS received many comments thatso-called post-production costs should be allowed as a deduction in determiningvalue for royalty purposes. Generally, these costs are not allowed as adeduction because they are necessary to make production marketable.The MMS received many comments on the section added to the draft finalrules that provided for certain extraordinary cost allowances. State andsome Indian commenters thought that this section was an unwarranted exceptionfrom the requirement that the lessee is obligated to bear the costs ofplacing gas in marketable condition or that further restrictions shouldbe included, while one Indian commenter endorsed the principle introducedby this new section. Industry commenters generally thought that the newsection was a step in the right direction, but thought that the dual qualificationprocess was too rigid. They suggested that the extraordinary allowancebe granted if a lessee could meet the requirements of either paragraph(i) or (ii). Industry commenters also suggested that the reference to 400meters be changed to 400 feet because that is the point at which costsbegin to escalate significantly. They also thought that use of the term``unique'' was inappropriate because it would limit the applicability toonly the first lessee with a particular type of extraordinary operation.Some commenters also requested that, when approved, the allowance extendbeyond one year.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>After carefully considering all of the commentson this issue, MMS has decided not to retain the extraordinary cost allowanceprovision in the final rules. It was concluded that the burdens placedon the lessee by the environment in which it must operate were matterstaken into account at the time the lease was issued, affecting the amountsof bonus bids and, in some instances, the royalty rate. The MMS has concludedthat if a lessee is entitled to further economic relief, it is inappropriateto provide that relief by adjusting the value of the production by methodswhich are inconsistent with MMS's historical practice and interpretationof the lessee's express obligation to place production in marketable conditionat no cost to the lessor. Rather, the more appropriate mechanism is forthe Department to consider royalty rate relief in circumstances where itis warranted for existing leases, and for lessees to consider such factorswhen entering leases in the future under royalty reduction procedures whichcan be adjusted to the price and cost circumstances prevailing on a particularlease and at a particular time.Section 206.152(j).One industry commenter stated that this provision, as proposed, goes againstthe firm notion of gross proceeds and grants an exception only in situationswhere the lessee is entitled to a contractual price increase. Accordingto the commenter, this ignores the reality of the existing situation inthe gas marketplace where many purchasers have unilaterally suspended contractuallyobligated takes and payments under the pretext of ``force majeure.'' Thecommenter believed that it may be more prudent in many instances to diligentlyrenegotiate contracts which would be in the best interest of the lesseeand lessor. The commenter further stated that such renegotiations may takeplace over an extended period of time during which the lessee may be receivingless than its contract price for its gas; therefore, under these circumstances,where the lessee is taking documented, reasonable measures to force purchasercompliance and to favorably renegotiate its contract, the lessee shouldonly be required to pay royalty on the gross proceeds it receives fromthe purchaser for its gas. The industry commenter also stated that rapid deterioration of purchasers'markets has caused unilateral price actions; further, difficult and protractednegotiations have ensued during which proceeds are less than the contractuallyagreed-to price. The commenter mentioned that lengthy litigation is a lastresort. The lessor benefits from continued production at market pricespending final resolution and, therefore, a more realistic approach wouldbe to accept proceeds if proceeds were not less than the prevailing marketprice in the field or area.One Indian commenter foresaw the ability of willing parties to amend contractsto compromise payments that have accrued to or would accrue to the lesseeunder its existing contract. The commenter believed that, of course, suchcontract revisions cannot be avoided in all instances but, if they aremade, the lessee should not be able to compromise the lessor's right toreceive royalty payments pursuant to the original contract and not underany amendments that have compromised the price.One industry commenter argued that MMS has neither the authority nor theexpertise to determine ``the highest price a prudent lessee can receivethrough legally enforceable claims under its contract.'' The commenteralso suggested deleting most of this section with the exception of thethird sentence (of the second draft final rule) and the requirement thatthe lessee must pay royalties on all volumes of production which are sold.One State commenter expressed that, by freely allowing contract revisions(even retroactive ones), MMS would provide a gaping loophole in the requirementthat a lessee seek to enforce its contract ``entitlements.'' The commenterbelieved that when a lessee is challenged by the MMS about not enforcingits contract rights, there are few buyers who will not agree to assisttheir sellers by retroactively amending their contracts to the lower amountactually paid.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has adopted this provision with only minorchanges from the original proposal. However, the paragraph does not precludethe approach suggested by the commenters. This section requires a lesseeto pay royalty in accordance with the contract price, but also expresslyrecognizes that contract prices may be amended retroactively. The MMS isaware that often there is a process of negotiation that occurs before thecontract is formally amended and that lower payments may be received inthe interim. Royalties may be paid on the gross proceeds received by thelessee until all attempts to force the purchaser to renegotiate the contractor to comply with the existing contract are exhausted, provided the lesseetakes proper or timely action to receive prices or benefits to which itis entitled, or to revise the contract retroactively. Thus, the MMS willaccept a renegotiated or a revised contract price if the main reason forrenegotiating or revising the contract is not solely to reduce royalties.However, if a higher price can be legally enforceable under a contractand the lessee is not diligent in obtaining that price, royalties willbe due on that higher price.Two industry commenters suggested that the phrase ``the lessee will oweno additional royalty until monies are * * * received'' be reworded toinsert the phrase ``unless or'' before the word ``until''. They believedthat it is contrary to the concept of ``proceeds received'' to attemptto assess royalty on proceeds which have never been received when onlypart payment is made to the lessee in contract disputes.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS adopted the suggested change in the finalregulation.One commenter stated that retroactive application of contract revisionsmay be inconsistent with FOGRMA because it requires that royalties be keyedto production and not to sales. The commenter further stated that timelyapplication by a lessee for a price increase should not be sufficient toallow a lessee to defer payment of royalties until monies or considerationresulting from the price increase are received. The commenter stated thata lessee should be required to go further in pressing its claim for benefitsaccruing or which could accrue to the lessee under the contract beforenonpayment of additional royalties is allowed, perhaps even to the pointof instituting litigation.Two industry commenters stated that the ``prudent operator'' clause isunnecessary because it is in the lessee's own best interest to obtain themaximum amount of revenue possible under the terms of the applicable contract.They believed that the inclusion of a ``prudent operator'' standard inthe regulations contradicts the concept of using market proceeds and merelyserves to impose an obligation on MMS auditors to evaluate and second-guessthe prudency of the actions of lessees. They also believed the ``prudentoperator'' clause opens the door to regulatory uncertainty and the basingof royalties on amounts in excess of the market value of gas. They believethe provision should be eliminated.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>Although most lessees will try to maximize the amountof revenue possible under the terms of the applicable contract, not allwill be diligent. Therefore, MMS must protect the Federal Government'sand Indian's interests by using the ``prudent operator'' clause.Two industry commenters stated that they disagreed with MMS's attempt toenforce contract entitlements. They believed that, as proposed, royaltieswould be based on the highest price obtainable and would serve to encouragethe pursuit of price increases, rather than the proper payment of royaltiesbased on the prices received. They also believed that this provision iscontrary to MMS's own statement that ``value is best determined by theinteraction of competing market forces, the 7/8ths or 4/5ths owner is goingto negotiate the best deal he/she can to further his/her own interest,advancing those of the royalty owners as well;'' therefore, they recommendedthis provision be deleted. <T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS does not view this provision as contraryto the approach it has taken to determine values. It would be inconsistentwith the theme of these regulations for MMS to not require full compliancewith its principal value determinant.Section 206.152(k).The MMS has added a new paragraph (k) to the draft final rules which providesthat in those situations where MMS may make a preliminary value determinationin the course of monitoring compliance with these regulations, that determinationwill not be binding until MMS has done an audit and the audit formallyis closed. The MMS intends to issue further guidelines on when an auditis closed.Several industry commenters thought that any determinations by MMS shouldbe binding.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS is adopting this section. The MMS cannotbe bound by a preliminary determination which may not be based on a fullarray of information as would be available during an audit.Section 206.152(l).Two individual commenters stated that this paragraph, which was proposedas paragraph (k), appears to preclude the lessor or overriding royaltyinterest owner from obtaining any information to substantiate the transportationand processing costs he is being charged. Therefore, they are opposed tothis provision.One Indian commenter stated that this provision perpetuates restrictionsupon disclosure of data required in reviewing a lessee's computation ofroyalty. The commenter believed that Indian Tribes should be provided copiesof all reports submitted by their lessees to MMS, upon request. The commenteralso stated that the Tribes need this information to monitor lessees aswell as responsible Federal agencies, and requested that the informationprovisions be revised to ease release of this information to Tribes subjectto reasonable restrictions upon disclosure to third parties.One Indian commenter stated that this provision should make it clear thatall information will be available to Indian lessors and States withoutgoing through the Freedom of Information Act procedures. The commenteralso stated that to place such a burden on Indian Tribes and States whoare the beneficiaries of the production would not be reasonable.One Indian commenter stated that the scope of this provision is so broadthat it effectively denies Indian Tribes and allottees and States accessto the information required to assure that valuations are properly determined.The commenter reminded MMS that the intent of the FOGRMA is to provideall interested parties, including Indian Tribes and allottees and States,the data necessary to conduct audits, oversee the audits performed by MMS,and in the case of Indian Tribes, to manage their mineral resources andto plan for governmental operations. The commenter stated that it couldnot understand why the MMS included this provision inasmuch as the almostunanimous vote of the Royalty Management Advisory Committee on a resolutionrecommending that the regulations provide Indian Tribes access to datademonstrates that industry also understands that Indian Tribes requireand should have access to such data.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The intent of this paragraph is not to precludeaccess to information for those who are working in concert with the MMSto the extent allowed by law, but rather to ensure the lessee that disclosureof proprietary information is in accordance with established procedures.There are statutory restrictions on providing certain types of informationto persons outside the Department of the Interior, and MMS must act inaccordance with those limitations. States and Indians with FOGRMA delegationsand cooperative agreements will have broader access to information whichotherwise could not be released. This section is not intended to limitin any manner an Indian lessor's right to obtain information directly fromthe lessee or from MMS to the extent provided in lease terms or applicablelaw. In the draft final rule, MMS changed the phrase ``will be maintained''to ``may be maintained.'' Many industry commenters were concerned thatthis change would allow MMS to release proprietary information. This wasnot MMS's intent, and to avoid any confusion the term ``will'' has beensubstituted for ``may.''Section 206.153 Valuation standards_processed gas.This section is almost identical to andSection; 206.152 and the commentsreceived were also similar. Therefore, MMS will not repeat the section-by-sectionanalysis or response to comments for this section. Interested persons shouldrefer to the corresponding part of andSection; 206.152.Section 206.154 Determination of quantities and qualities for computingroyalties.Paragraph 206.154(a) establishes procedures for determining the volumesand quality of unprocessed gas that must be used in computing royalties.Three industry commenters were opposed to MMS or BLM assigning a pointof royalty settlement that is different from the lessee's sales point wherethe transfer of title occurs, as stipulated in the lessee's arm's-lengthgas sales contract.One industry commenter stated that MMS must recognize that the proper pointof royalty valuation is the lease and that MMS cannot confiscate the entrepreneurialprofits which are added by downstream activities of the lessee and arenot part of the value of the production in which the lessor is entitledto share.Two industry commenters stated that this provision is inconsistent withthe statutes, lease terms, and the proposed gross proceeds valuation methodology.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>Historically, MMS has required that royalties becomputed on the basis of the quantity and quality of unprocessed gas inmarketable condition as measured on the lease unless prior approval tomeasure off-lease is obtained from BLM or MMS, for onshore and offshoreleases, respectively. This will assure the lessor that the total productionfrom the lease is accounted for. This provision is consistent with thestatutes, lease terms, and the gross proceeds valuation methodology becausethis provision establishes a point of royalty measurement upon which aquantity, at a quality, is valued for royalty purposes.One industry commenter stated that paragraph (a)(2) would adjust the pricereceived under an arm's-length contract in the event that there were someline loss between the point of royalty settlement and the point of sale.The commenter stated that the arm's-length contract whose quantity provisionsMMS would modify requires the purchaser to pay only for production whichis actually received but, by adjusting the quantity figures, MMS is, ineffect, amending, solely for royalty purposes, the deal between the lesseeand the purchaser.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS must structure its royalty accounting programto be in concert with the administration of oil and gas leases by the othercomponents of the Department of Interior's full mineral leasing program.As such, this provision simply recognizes that it is the measured production,as required by BLM or MMS operations personnel, that must be valued forroyalty purposes. Paragraph 206.154(b) establishes the procedures for determining the quantityof residue gas and gas plant products on which royalty must be paid. Oneindustry commenter suggested that this provision be reworded to indicatethat ``net output'' means the production from the plant and not tailgatedeliveries. The commenter stated that net monthly output could be interpretedto mean plant tailgate deliveries. The commenter said that if this werethe case, royalty would not be paid on plant products until they were sold.Another commenter stated that, in current marketing situations, it is impossibleto avoid temporary storage of gas plant products. The commenter said thatpurchasers are nominating volumes they will purchase which may or may notcoincide with production. The commenter also stated that royalties shouldnot be paid on production stored until it is sold because, in that manner,value can be properly determined. The commenter said that residue gas mustbe delivered as produced because there will normally be no means by whichthe lessee can store it.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> As adopted at andSection; 206.151, net output meansthe quantity of residue gas and each gas plant product that a processingplant produces. Therefore, royalty is due on residue gas and gas plantproducts at the time they are produced.One industry commenter stated that this <T3>methodology</T3> of net output is contrary to the MMS concept of grossproceeds accruing from the <T3>sale</T3> under an arm's-length contract. The commenter said that manygas plants place the net output in temporary storage awaiting sales andthat the net output of gas plant products is not valued until removal fromtemporary storage and sale. The commenter stated that, if this paragraphis implemented, it is probable that there would be many MMS audit exceptionsas a result of the valuation of net output rather than actual sales fromtemporary storage facilities.One industry commenter stated that it may be difficult to establish thevalue of the product that remains in storage. The commenter also statedthat, if the lessee is forced to compute a value, then the concept of ``grossproceeds'' becomes meaningless because the lessee, in effect, becomes thepurchaser of the product. The commenter claims that when the product isdisposed of at a later date, MMS would have no basis on which to reviewthe proceeds eventually realized by the lessee for sale of the production.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that there is no conflict betweenthe gross proceeds methodology and these provisions. It must be recognizedthat it is the volume of gas leaving the lease which must be valued, forroyalty purposes, and the use of the cumulative value of any condensaterecovered downstream of the point of royalty settlement without resortingto a manufacturing process, plus the residue gas and gas plant products,less applicable allowances, is the method by which this is done when gasis processed. Therefore, all such condensate, residue gas, and gas plantproducts attributable to this production must be used in determining value.Adjusting the gross proceeds to reflect the net output attributable tothe lease would be accomplished by applying the unit value establishedby the actual product sales to the portion of the net output attributableto the lease, which was not sold in the month produced. Likewise, if thequantity of any product sold during a month is greater than the net outputattributable to a lease because of sales of a quantity of product whichwas previously placed in storage, the gross proceeds would be reduced.If proper documentation is maintained by the lessee and made availableto MMS during an audit, no audit exceptions should result.Paragraph 206.154(c) establishes the procedure to allocate the net outputof a processing plant back to the leases. One industry commenter proposedthat the language be modified to reflect the view that any lease allocationmethod agreed to between a seller and purchaser and/or processor will bedeemed acceptable, including methods where the parties are affiliates,subject to review by MMS.One industry commenter suggested that any contractually prescribed methodshould be deemed acceptable in preference to ``a generally accepted leaseallocation method'', which may be a contention in the future.An industry group recommended that MMS recognize the validity of allocationmethods approved by BLM.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has adopted a specific procedure for allocatingthe net output of a processing plant back to leases. The method adoptedis the method prescribed by the current regulations. The MMS believes thatthis procedure is the predominant method used by industry. However, MMShas adopted a provision in the final rule whereby a lessee may requestapproval of other allocation methods.One industry commenter suggested the addition of the sentence ``This samemethodology shall also apply to allocations among unitized and communitizedareas.'' The commenter believed that this inclusion of units and communitizedareas was intended.One Federal agency commenter suggested the modification of the proposedrule to include a tight definition of the term ``generally accepted.''The commenter said this term should be defined as an allocation methodused consistently by a majority of gas plant operators and this methodmust be in accordance with the method promulgated by an industry groupsuch as COPAS.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The final rule adopted limits the use of methodsother than the one prescribed, as outlined above. Therefore, the term ``generallyaccepted'' has been eliminated from the final rule. Unitized and communitizedareas will be covered under this provision and MMS does not deem it necessaryto add a specific reference.Paragraph (d) prohibits deductions from royalty volume or royalty valuefor actual or theoretical losses. Indian and State commenters agreed withthis provision, stating that no deductions should be allowed for actualor theoretical losses prior to the point of royalty settlement.Many industry commenters stated that line losses are attributable to severalfactors. They stated that line losses are partially attributable to meteringdifferences and partially attributable to physical factors, and they area part of the reality of oil and gas field operations. They believed thatthe provision should be amended for both valuation and allowance purposesto provide a credit for line loss not attributable to negligence, becausesuch a change in the regulations would be in conformance with FOGRMA. Theystated that allowing losses would also make the allowance regulations conformto the overall market orientation underlying the valuation proposal, becausecosts associated with line loss are commonly explicit components of arm's-lengthcontracts and tariffs.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> When a volume of gas, upon which royalty is due,has been determined in accordance with the requirements of MMS's offshoreoperations and BLM's onshore operations personnel, MMS must collect royaltyupon its value. Likewise, it is imperative that the quantities of residuegas and gas plant products attributable to a lease be determined once,and only once, and royalty paid on those volumes. This is consistent withthe historical practice of the Department. The treatment of line lossesas a cost of transportation is addressed later in this preamble.Section 206.155 Accounting for comparison.In the proposed rule, MMS required so-called dual accounting only in situationswhere the lessee (or a person to whom the lessee transferred gas pursuantto a non-arm's-length contract) processes the lessee's gas and, after processing,the residue gas is not sold pursuant to an arm's-length contract.Some industry commenters stated that the removal of the requirement toperform dual accounting for OCS gas sales where the residue is sold pursuantto an arm's-length contract is a substantial improvement in the regulationswhich will reduce paperwork for both MMS and lessees.Another industry commenter endorsed the MMS's decision to abolish ``accountingfor comparison'' (more commonly known as dual accounting) for processedgas except where the lessee has no arm's-length contract for the sale ofresidue gas or where dictated by lease terms. The commenter had no objectionto such value comparison if the gas is processed in a lessee-owned plant,and the residue gas is not sold under an arm's-length contract.Several industry commenters stated that they believed the continuationof dual accounting for most processed gas in non-arm's-length residue salesis unnecessary. They said that because the residue gas will be valued pursuantto MMS's guidelines in both arm's-length and non-arm's-length situations,the elimination of dual accounting for one and not the other will createsubstantial administrative effort when both arm's-length and non-arm's-lengthresidue sales occur at the same plant. They also stated that as long asa substantial portion of sales from a plant continue to be arm's-length,which they propose to be set at 25 percent or higher, elimination of thedual accounting requirement for the remainder of that plant will not resultin any lesser degree of accuracy in determining market value. One industry commenter stated that this provision stops short of beingtotally consistent with other MMS proposals on gas valuation. The commentersaid that inasmuch as MMS has determined that there is an acceptable methodto value residue gas sales under non-arm's-length or no-contract situations,there is justification for eliminating dual accounting for residue gasvalued in accordance with this provision, regardless of the types of salescontracts.Another industry commenter believes that royalty is due only on the marketvalue of gas, associated products, and oil because they are produced atthe wellhead. The commenter stated that the concept of dual accountingunder which MMS assesses royalty on either the value of the principal andassociated products after processing or the value of the unprocessed gas,whichever is higher, is fundamentally unfair.Two industry commenters recommended that this paragraph be deleted becausedual accounting results in higher value to the lessor than the lessee.They believed that the value should be based upon the value of the unprocessedgas at the lease if the gas is not processed, or upon net realization (grossproceeds minus allowances) if gas is processed, and not the higher of thetwo. They stated that, because the proposed method is applied after thefact, only the lessee bears any losses. Another commenter stated that itwould be unfair and inequitable to require the payment of royalty on abasis higher than the value of the processed gas when the value differentialis not because of the negligence or imprudent actions on the part of thelessee but instead represents the current market fluctuations for the gasplant products and residue gas. The commenter also suggested the additionof the word ``applicable'' before the word allowances in paragraph (a)(1).<T3>MMS Response:</T3> To ensure that the Federal and Indian lessors receivethe proper royalties, MMS continues to believe that dual accounting mustbe used where the lessee, or a person to whom the lessee has transferredgas pursuant to a non-arm's-length contract or no-contract situation, processesthe lessee's gas and, after processing the gas, the residue gas is notsold pursuant to an arm's-length contract. This provision will encouragethe producer under a non-arm's-length contract to obtain the highest pricefor the gas produced whether that higher price comes from processing thegas or whether it comes from selling the unprocessed gas.One industry commenter stated that dual accounting imposes an unreasonableaccounting burden on both the lessee and the Department and allows theDepartment to effectively second-guess the lessee each month on the decisionto process the gas.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS's current policy is to require dual accountingfor all offshore gas processed by the lessee, including affiliates, andfor onshore gas processed by the lessee in a lessee-owned plant or onshoregas sold to an affiliate of the lessee and that affiliate processes thegas. Because the requirement for dual accounting adopted in the final ruleeliminates some of the current requirements, the accounting and administrativeburden should be reduced for both industry and MMS.Proposed paragraph (b) specifically provided for dual accounting whererequired by the terms of a Federal or Indian lease. Industry commentersagreed with this provision provided that the lease terms, whether Indianor Federal, specifically require dual accounting.Three Indian commenters stated that dual accounting should be requiredfor all Indian leases whether specifically stated in the lease terms ornot. They stated that this is needed for the Secretary to fulfill his trustresponsibilities to the Indians.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has adopted this provision essentially asproposed.Section 206.156 Transportation allowances_general.The MMS received a large number of comments from the States, Indians, andindustry on this section of the regulations. Comments on transportationallowances which did not relate to any specific section of the regulationswere considered to be addressed to the General section of the transportationregulations, andSection; 206.156. These comments addressed four broad issues_validityissues, adequacy/inadequacy issues, post-production costs and other costissues, and issues relating to the definition of terms.1. One issue concerned the validity of any transportation allowances whatsoeverand proposed that MMS should not consider transportation allowances asvalid deductions from royalty computations, or only consider such allowancesif transportation is necessary for lease development or results in a higherroyalty.Some State and Indian commenters stated that transportation allowancesshould only be granted when necessary (1) to market the product, (2) topromote development of the lease, (3) to obtain a higher royalty value,(4) to enhance offshore development, or (5) if the royalty revenue increasesenough to offset the allowance. The key word in these comments was ``necessary.''None of the parties believed that any transportation allowance should begiven if it was not necessary. A State representative suggested approvingthe transportation allowances on the basis of individual cases only ifnecessary.One Indian commenter stated that only the reasonable, actual, and necessarytransportation costs from a lease boundary to a point of sale should beallowed and the costs should not include any profit or allocated overheadfrom the regional or home office.One Indian commenter stated that the regulations should establish transportationallowances as an exception, not as a rule.Several Indian commenters stated that MMS should not grant any transportationallowances as a deduction against Indian royalties. The commenters opposedthe transportation allowance for Indian leases for such reasons as (1)Indian leases do not provide for transportation as a deduction from royalty,and (2) transportation allowances have never been granted for Indian leases.The Indian commenters emphasized that MMS must take into account its trustresponsibility to the Tribes and allottees in preparing valuation regulations.These commenters advised that MMS must protect the Indians' interests.The MMS received comments from Tribes and State representatives assertingthat the royalty interest should be cost-free. These comments all stressedthat royalties have always been and should always remain free of costs.All commenters believed that the costs of making lease production marketable,including transportation, are the responsibility of the lessee. A Staterepresentative suggested that MMS ``* * * keep the door closed on all presalecosts. Once it's opened, it's hard to let only the chosen ones in.''<T3>MMS Response:</T3> Based on Interior Board of Land Appeals decisions,Solicitor opinions, and judicial decisions, it has been DOI policy since1961 to grant transportation allowances when production is moved to a salespoint off the lease in order to calculate the value of the product at thelease. Furthermore, the IBLA has specifically ruled that transportationallowances must be granted for Indian leases. <T3>Kerr-McGee Corp., </T3>22 IBLA 124 (1975). Therefore, the transportationallowance regulations being adopted are consistent with past practice andconsistent with the Secretary's responsibility to the Indians. The MMSbelieves generally that royalty should be free of cost. However, valuesmay need to be adjusted for transportation and/or processing to determinevalue at the lease. The MMS believes that the policy of granting transportationallowances to properly value lease production is appropriate and shouldcontinue.2. Another issue concerned the adequacy or inadequacy of the proposed gastransportation regulations in general. Some commenters believed that theregulations were generally deficient, while others pointed to specificinstances where changes should be made to improve their specific applicability.Following is a brief summary of these types of comments.Some industry and State respondents commented on the flexibility of theregulations. One industry commenter stated that the regulations shouldbe modified to embrace both traditional and nontraditional transportationarrangements. Another industry commenter suggested that the regulationsshould accommodate changes in transportation and marketing. One State representativeexpressed concern that the regulations do not address new marketing opportunitiesrelated to the unbundling of pipeline services and market area gas storagewhich allow for greater sales levels in higher priced periods.The MMS received comments from Tribes regarding the relationship betweenthe lease terms and the regulations. One commenter requested that the regulationsnot be allowed to change the lease terms. Another commenter stated thatthe regulations should be consistent with the lease terms. A third commenterstated that, where the lease is silent, the regulations should not allowthe gross proceeds received under an arm's-length contract to be reducedfor transportation costs.The MMS received comments regarding the effect of transportation allowanceson revenues. A State organization stated that MMS should develop simpleand concise rules that do not adversely affect Western States' revenues,and which will allow for more effective auditing. One Tribe requested thatthe royalty rate not be decreased in effect by redefining the rate basis.One local community commenter stated that the proposed regulations shouldnot be issued without assessing the impact on the school or other localsubdivision budgets. Five local community commenters opposed the proposalson the grounds that deductions would be taken too liberally, or perhapsroyalty payments would be eliminated completely.One Tribe stated that the regulations should apply only to new leases.One industry party and one Tribe recommended that a separate set of regulationsbe developed for Indian lands only. <T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that the regulations are completeand are sufficiently flexible to apply to the different types of gas transportationarrangements that might arise in the future. MMS is aware of nothing inthe transportation allowance regulations that would change the terms ofany Indian mineral lease. The MMS agrees that the procedure for determininga transportation allowance places initial reliance on the gas industry.However, this program will be under continuous review and oversight byMMS. Thus, the ability to effectively review, evaluate, and audit transportationallowances has been maintained under the new regulations. The MMS believesthat the consideration of transportation costs is necessary to determinethe value of lease production at the lease.3. One broad issue discussed by commenters was the deduction of post-productioncosts and other costs from royalty payments.The MMS received many comments concerning the issue of post-productioncosts as an allowable deduction from royalty. Many industry commenterscommented in favor of allowing all post-production costs to be deductedfrom the royalty portion.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> This section of the regulations addresses only transportationallowances. The issue of post-production cost allowances is properly addressedin other sections of the regulations.4. One issue commented on by several commenters concerns the definitionof terms used in the regulations.Some industry respondents commented that the term ``reasonable'' shouldbe deleted from this section. One industry concern was that this term willonly result in a wide diversity of opinion as to what a reasonable costis.One industry representative suggested that the term ``actual'' should bedeleted for clarification purposes.The MMS received several comments from the States, Indians, and industrysuggesting that the term ``remote from the lease'' should be defined orchanged. An industry representative stated that many terms, such as ``remote''and ``field gathering'' beg for definition. This commenter requested thata distinction between ``gathering'' and ``transportation'' be delineated,for royalty purposes, and also suggested that the term ``remote'' shouldmean anything outside the lease boundary. Two industry commenters identicallyrecommended changing this phrase to ``first available market.''<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The term ``reasonable'' is defined by the Merriam-WebsterNew Collegiate Dictionary as ``moderate, fair.'' The MMS intends that thissame definition apply in the determination of a transportation allowance.The MMS agrees that the term ``gathering'' should be defined. The definitionof ``gathering'' has been included in andSection; 206.151 and was discussedabove. The phrase ``remote from the lease'' has been deleted from the finalrule which uses the phrase ``off the lease.''Section 206.156(b)The MMS received several comments on paragraph (b), proposed as paragraph(c), which requires that transportation costs be allocated among all productstransported. The proposed paragraph also provided that no allowance maybe taken for transporting products which are not royalty-bearing.Industry commenters recommended deletion of this paragraph. One industryrepresentative stated that transportation costs represent the rate formoving the aggregate product stream. The industry commenters stated thatallocation is an administrative burden and is unfair and inequitable, andit is inequitable to require allocation of transportation costs for theincidental movement of nonroyalty-bearing products.One industry representative recommended that transportation costs be takenas an aggregate charge against the value of the full product stream.One industry representative stated that this paragraph adapts an unrealistictransportation deduction exception by not allowing a transportation deductionfor nonroyalty-bearing products. According to this commenter, practicalrealities dictate that nonroyalty-bearing products entrained with gas betransported.Other industry commenters recommended that allowances be granted for nonroyalty-bearingsubstances up to 30 percent of the volume of the transported stream.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS does not agree with the commenters' proposalthat the cost of transporting nonroyalty-bearing substances should be sharedby the lessor in all instances. However, upon review, MMS has recognizedthat it is appropriate to provide an allowance which includes the costsof transporting certain nonroyalty-bearing substances such as waste products,including water. For example, there may be circumstances where transportationof water along with the royalty-bearing portion of the production is necessary.For other than waste products, the final rule provides, however, that priorMMS approval is required before an allowance may be taken for the costsof transporting non-royalty-bearing substances.The MMS is aware that the allocation of transportation costs in situationswhere more than one product is involved could be burdensome. However, itis MMS's experience that the allocation requirement would only be burdensomein a few instances where the products being transported are not all inthe same physical state.Section 206.156(c).Paragraph 206.156(c) was proposed as paragraph (b). The MMS received alarge number of comments on this provision which limited the transportationallowance to 50 percent of the value of the product transported. The commentson this paragraph related to one major topic: Whether the limitation shouldbe eliminated or retained.Industry commenters and trade group representatives stated that MMS shouldabolish the 50-percent limitation for one or more of the following reasons:(1) If the proposed limit is retained, the exception to the 50-percentlimitation may not be exercised freely enough; (2) The 50-percent limitcould impose a serious economic deterrent to the development of frontierareas; (3) The limitation figure is strictly arbitrary and totally unjustto the lessee/working interest owners; (4) It would be a rare case whena natural gas transportation cost would come close to the proposed 50-percentcap, much less exceed it; and (5) The proposed 50-percent cap is a deviationfrom the stated intent of MMS to base royalty valuation on ``gross proceeds.''Several commenters stated that MMS should approve requests for transportationallowances exceeding the 50-percent limitation upon submission of adequatedocumentation by the lessee.Many industry commenters and trade groups stated that MMS should allowlessees to carry forward transportation costs otherwise allowable (exceptfor the 50-percent limitation) from the current year to subsequent years.According to the commenters, this procedure should be applied to all transportationsystems, but it would be especially important in the frontier areas. Onecommenter from industry stated that MMS should not permit roll forwardsbecause it would create paperwork and allow the lessees to use the 50-percentlimit permanently.Industry commenters and trade groups stated that the 50-percent limit couldbe a disincentive for exploration and for building transportation systemswhen costs exceeding the cap may not be recovered.One State representative stated that the 50-percent limitation providesincentive to keep costs under control while allowing some relief for legitimatehardship conditions.Several industry commenters suggested that MMS should specify the conditionsfor which MMS will approve an allowance in excess of 50 percent. ThreeIndian commenters and one Congressman recommended that the standard shouldbe whether the allowance in excess of 50 percent is in the best interestsof the lessor.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has decided generally to retain the 50-percentlimit on transportation in the final rule. For unprocessed gas valued pursuantto andSection; 206.152, the transportation allowance deduction based on aselling arrangement is limited to 50 percent of the value of the unprocessedgas determined in accordance with andSection; 206.152. For processed gas,the transportation allowance for gas plant products or residue gas basedon a selling arrangement is limited to 50 percent of the value of the residuegas or gas plant product determined in accordance with andSection; 206.153.Natural gas liquids are considered one product. A lessee may request, and MMS may approve, a transportation allowance inexcess of 50 percent if the lessee demonstrates that the costs incurredwere reasonable, actual, and necessary. Thus, the 50-percent thresholdmerely gives MMS the ability to monitor more closely the situation wherethe allowance based on reasonable actual costs will exceed that limit.In no event may the allowance for any lease product equal 100 percent ofthe value of that product. MMS received comments that the transportationallowance in excess of 50-percent should be allowed only when it is inthe ``best interests of the lessor.'' MMS did not include this standardbecause it is too subjective. The requirement that the costs be ``reasonable,actual, and necessary'' is sufficient to protect the lessor's interests.The MMS is not including in the final rule any specific standard as towhen the 50-percent limit may be exceeded. This will require a case-by-casedetermination. Section 206.156(d).The MMS received comments from industry representatives on this paragraph(d), which recommended that MMS should be required to pay interest on overpaymentsby lessees to the extent permitted by law.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has no legal authority to pay interest tolessees on their overpayments.Section 206.157 Determination of Transportation Allowances.Paragraph (a) of the regulations addresses transportation allowances wherethe lessee has an arm's-length contract for transportation services. TheMMS received many comments on this paragraph of the regulations. Althoughthere were comments on a wide variety of subjects, 11 principal issueswere addressed: Acceptance of arm's-length transportation agreements; excessivepenalty and retroactive approvals; MMS's approval of the transportationallowances; acceptance of transportation reduced prices; status of currentlyapproved allowances; required filing every 12 months; allowance on nonroyaltybearing production; allocation of transportation costs; suggested deletionto regulations; period for filing a proposed allocation; MMS payment ofinterest on lease overpayments; and clarification of the conversion process.1. Acceptance of arm's-length transportation agreements as an accurateindicator of reasonable, actual costs.Industry commenters supported the proposal to accept arm's-length contractcosts as a reasonable transportation allowance. These commenters explainedthat arm's-length contracts provide an accurate indicator of ``reasonableactual costs'' because they reflect the true costs to the lessee for transportingproduction to a sales point downstream of the lease.Some Tribes expressed serious concern about the validity of using arm's-lengthcontracts as an indicator of value. One Tribe stated that arm's-lengthcontracts are not a bona fide indicator of reasonable, actual costs. OneTribe expressed doubt that there can ever be an arm's-length contract betweencompanies in the gas industry. Another Tribe stated that arm's-length contractsshould not be accepted unless a thorough analysis of lessee/purchaser affiliationsis undertaken. One Tribe also expressed considerable doubt that the criteriaused by MMS would assure that an arm's-length contract is present in anygiven case. An Indian trade organization stated that MMS should establishappropriate criteria to determine the accuracy and reasonableness of allowancesgranted under arm's-length contracts (and non-arm's-length contract situations).<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS currently uses the payments made by a lesseeunder an arm's-length transportation agreement as an accurate indicatorof reasonable, actual costs. The MMS has determined that payments madeunder arm's-length contracts are the best available indicator of reasonable,actual costs incurred by the lessee. MMS has added a sentence clarifyingthat the lessee has the burden of demonstrating that its contract is arm's-length.MMS also has added two new paragraphs to address situations where a contract,though arm's-length, should be treated as non-arm's-length pursuant toparagraph (b). The first situation is where MMS determines that the transportationcontract reflects more than the consideration transferred from the lesseeto the transporter for the transportation; i.e., the transportation costhas been inflated. The second situation is where the MMS determines thatthere has been misconduct by or between the contracting parties, or becausethe lessee otherwise has breached its duty to the lessor to market theproduction for the mutual benefit of the lessee and the lessor. The typesof misconduct or breach of duty which would trigger application of theseprovisions are essentially the same as those discussed above in the valuationsection.2. Disallowance of a transportation allowance for a reporting period notcovered by a Form MMS-4295.The MMS received responses from several industry commenters and industrytrade groups stating that the disallowance of a transportation allowancefor a reporting period not covered by a Form MMS-4295 is an excessive penaltyfor what was considered by the commenters to be such a minor infractionof the rules. The point was also made that the lessee does not always havethe data to timely file a Form MMS-4295 before the Form MMS-2014 is filed.Many commenters stated that the regulations should have a provision allowingtransportation allowances on a retroactive basis because a lessee doesnot always have the details on transportation worked out before productionbegins. Thus, it sometimes is necessary to go back and revise data relatedto an allowance after agreements are reached because of the fast changingcurrent oil and gas markets.It was suggested that MMS should consider a monetary fine for failure tofile, or disallow the deduction for any period until Form MMS-4295 is filed.The lessee would not lose a deduction, but would be precluded from takingthe deduction until the proper forms are submitted to MMS for the periodscovered.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>After careful consideration of the comments, MMShas determined that the reporting penalties included in the proposed regulationswere excessive. The MMS has also considered the comments on retroactiveapprovals and has revised the final regulations to allow lessees to requesttransportation allowances retroactively for a period of not more than 3months prior to the first day of the month that Form MMS-4295 is filedwith MMS, unless MMS approves a longer period upon a showing of good causeby the lessee. Also, paragraph (d) of the final rules provides that ifa lessee deducts a transportation allowance on a Form MMS-2014 withoutcomplying with the requirements of this section, the lessee will owe intereston the amount of the deductions until the date proper forms are filed.However, the lessee will be required to repay the amount of any deductiondisallowed because of the limitation on retroactivity.3. The MMS's preapproval of transportation allowances.The proposed rule provided that prior MMS approval was not required beforea lessee could deduct a transportation allowance based on an arm's-lengthcontract. Representatives of trade organizations, oil and gas companies,and one business expressed approval of the self-implementing concept fortransportation allowance regulations. This was seen as a method of relievinga considerable administrative burden on both industry and MMS. Tribes disagreedwith the self-implementing nature of the regulations because it was seenas a method of establishing the 50-percent limitation as a floor for transportationallowances.One Tribe stated that MMS should preapprove all transportation allowancesand should do so only on a showing of necessity to promote developmentor a showing that a higher value could be obtained for the gas at a pointof sale away from the lease. It was also pointed out by this commenterthat neither the MMS nor Indian Tribes have the resources to audit allleases and, if these allowances are not monitored ``up front,'' they willnever be audited.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS considers arm's-length contracts a validindicator of reasonable, actual costs. Thus, it is not necessary to preapprovetransportation allowances based on such contracts. The MMS will monitorthe transportation allowances, and they are subject to later audit.4. Acceptance of transportation-reduced prices without requiring the filingof Form MMS-4295 for both arm's-length and non-arm's-length situations.Representatives of oil and gas companies and trade organizations commentedthat MMS should accept transportation-reduced prices without requiringthe filing of Form MMS-4295 for both arm's-length and non-arm's-lengthsituations. It was believed that this policy would reduce the administrativeburden on industry and MMS. However, one commenter disagreed with thisproposal because it was considered a potential technique to exceed the50-percent limitation provisions of the regulation.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has determined that the regulations shouldbe revised to provide that transportation factors which reduce arm's-lengthsales contract or posted prices are to be considered as reductions in valuerather than transportation allowances. This provision is included in paragraph(a)(5). However, so as not to provide a means of avoiding the 50-percentlimit on transportation allowances, the final rules provide that the transportationfactor may not exceed 50 percent of the base price of the product withoutMMS's approval.5. Should current approved transportation allowances remain in effect untilthey expire?Industry respondents stated that the transportation allowance reportedon Form MMS-4295 should continue until the applicable contract or rateterminates, or is modified or amended. State respondents stated that, becausesome allowances are currently being taken without specific, written MMSapproval, only those with documented approval should be allowed to continuewithout the submission of Form MMS-4295.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has revised the regulations in paragraphs(c)(1)(v) and (c)(2)(v) to provide that any transportation allowances ineffect on the date these regulations become effective will be allowed tocontinue until such allowances terminate subject to later audit. However,MMS is limiting this provision only to those allowances that have writtenMMS approval. Because the regulations are being revised to remove any priorapproval by MMS before a deduction may be taken, and the submission ofForm MMS-4295 is to increase MMS's ability to monitor the allowances beingtaken, MMS believes that the intent of the final rules will be best servedby having all allowances to be deducted under the new rules documentedas of the effective date.6. Should MMS require the filing of Form MMS-4295 every 12 months?Industry representatives stated that there is no benefit to MMS in submittinga form that duplicates information on file when a change has not occurred,and there is no apparent reason for MMS to require the filing of Form MMS-4295every 12 months. One industry representative recommended that this sectionbe deleted.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS requires the annual filing of Form MMS-4295for use as a control and monitoring mechanism even when there is no changein the applicable contract or rate.7. Should MMS allow transportation allowances for production which is notroyalty-bearing.Several industry representatives suggested deleting this section and proposedthat transportation costs be taken as an aggregate charge against the valueof lease production or that MMS cover cost allocation methodology in theMMS Royalty Management Program Oil and Gas Payor Handbook. One industryrespondent recommended deleting any references concerning the disallowancefor transporting lease production which is not royalty-bearing.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>As discussed earlier, MMS will allow transportationallowances that include costs of transporting certain production whichis not royalty-bearing, such as waste products.8. Allocation of a cost applicable to more than one product.One industry representative stated that allocation of costs presents aburdensome administrative task, but if allocation of costs is deemed necessary,it should be allocated on the basis of relative value rather than on relativevolume. One business representative suggested that MMS provide an alternativeallocation procedure for situations which would require a variance fromthe proposed allocation method.Another industry representative recommended that allocation be based onthe weighted average value of each product having a commercial value inthat area. According to this commenter, transportation costs should notbe allocated to by-products or products with no commercial value.An industry representative suggested using an allocation procedure onlywhen substantial volumes of nonroyalty-bearing products are being transportedbecause of the considerable costs and reporting burdens involved in allocatingcosts.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has added a new paragraph which providesthat, upon request by the lessee, MMS will approve the allocation of costson the basis of the values of the products transported unless such allocationmethod is not consistent with the purposes of the regulations in Part 206.In situations involving the transportation of both gaseous and liquid products,it is difficult for MMS to provide guidance on acceptable methods of allocationbecause of the many different circumstances that exist. The MMS believesit would be advantageous to have the lessee submit an allocation proposalto MMS in these situations.9. Should MMS extend the period in which to submit a proposed allocationmethod?Representatives from industry suggested periods of 90-180 days, insteadof the proposed 60-day period, to submit a proposed allocation method wherean arm's-length contract includes both gaseous and liquid products andthe transportation costs attributable to each cannot be determined fromthe contract.Representatives from oil and gas companies and one trade organization statedthat the requirement to submit a proposed allocation method within 60 dayswill create a significant workload burden, and a more reasonable provisionof time would be from 90 to 180 days.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has modified andSection; 206.157 (a)(3) ofthe final rule to provide a 3-month period. 10. Should MMS pay interest on lease overpayments?One industry commenter stated that MMS should pay interest on overpaymentsconsistent with statutory authority.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has no legal authority to pay interest tolessees on their overpayments. 11. Clarification of the conversion process. Two respondents from the oil and gas industry commented that proposed paragraph(a)(5), concerning the conversion of payment to a dollar-value equivalent,should not be adopted because it is too complicated. If it is retained,it should be clarified with guidelines.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The value of production upon which royalty is dueis reported to MMS as a dollar value; therefore, MMS believes that anydeduction from that value when determining the royalty due also must beexpressed as a dollar value. The MMS does not consider the conversion toa dollar-value equivalent to be complicated. This requirement is includedin andSection; 206.157(a)(4) of the final rules.Paragraph (b) establishes the procedures for claiming a transportationallowance where the lessee has a non-arm's-length transportation contractor has no contract. The comments received under this section addressedeight principal issues: Acceptance of State or FERC tariffs, use of thebenchmark system, penalties, prior approval, allowable costs, rate of return,retaining Alternatives 1 and/or 2, and allocation of costs.1. Should MMS accept published State or FERC tariffs instead of using actualcosts as the basis for approving transportation allowances?Many industry commenters and trade groups stated that MMS should acceptpublished State or FERC tariffs as the transportation allowance in non-arm's-lengthand no-contract situations. These commenters believed that MMS should relyon the expertise of FERC and State agencies that set pipeline tariffs todetermine fair and reasonable transportation charges. Several industryrepresentatives stated that if MMS does not rely on FERC and/or State tariffs,there would be a wasteful duplication of effort between FERC, State agencies,and MMS.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>After careful consideration, MMS has decided thatgenerally the fairest and best way to determine transportation allowancesfor non-arm's-length or no-contract situations is to allow actual, reasonablecosts plus an acceptable rate of return on the lessee's undepreciated capitalinvestment. However, MMS has concluded that where a lessee has a tariffapproved by FERC or a state regulatory agency, it is unnecessarily burdensomeand duplicative to recompute costs. Therefore, MMS will recognize FERCtariffs (for both Federal and Indian leases) and tariffs approved by aState regulatory agency (for Federal leases) as a valid cost in computinga transportation allowance when it is an actual (out-of-pocket) expensepursuant to an arm's-length transportation contract. Existence of suchtariffs for a transportation system also will authorize MMS to grant anexception to the requirement to use actual costs for non-arm's-length orno-contract situations. See discussion below.2. Should the transportation allowance be based on the market value oftransportation service as determined under a benchmark system?Several industry commenters and trade groups stated that MMS should allowthe market value of the transportation service based on a benchmark system.For those commenters recommending a benchmark system for determining thetransportation allowance, the commenters suggested that MMS allow the lesseethe market value of the transportation service based on a benchmark systemfeaturing arm's-length contracts and tariffs and cost accounting to beused only as a last resort. It was suggested that this procedure was inkeeping with the market-based concept and objective of bringing certaintyto the regulations.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>It is MMS's past and present practice generallyto allow only those costs which are directly related to the transportationof lease production. Costs incurred under ``comparable arm's-length contracts''or any other benchmark criterion may include costs such as Federal andState income taxes, or socioeconomic costs incurred by the lessee in orderto obtain State or county land access, such as the construction of schoolsor city sewer facilities. The MMS considered these comments in revisingthe regulations and decided that it was in the best interests of the Government,States, and Indians to base gas transportation allowances on actual, reasonablecosts plus a return on investment.However, in an effort to simplify procedures for both the lessee and MMS,the regulations at andSection; 206.157(b)(5) will provide an exception tothe requirement to compute actual costs where the lessor's interest isadequately protected. The lessee must apply to MMS for the exception, andMMS will grant the exception only if the lessee has a tariff for the systemapproved by FERC (for both Federal and Indian leases) or a State regulatoryagency (for Federal leases). However, the rules contain protection fromunreasonably high tariffs. The MMS will deny the exception request if itdetermines that the tariff is excessive as compared to arm's-length transportationcharges by pipelines owned by the lessee or others, providing similar transportationservices in that area. If there are no such arm's-length transportationcharges to use for comparison, MMS will deny the exception request if noFERC or State regulatory agency cost analysis exists and the FERC or Stateregulatory agency has declined to investigate pursuant to MMS timely objectionsupon filing, and the tariff significantly exceeds the lessee's actual costsfor transportation as determined under the regulations in subsection (b)(2).3. Should a penalty be imposed for late submission of the Form MMS-4295?One industry commenter objected to the penalty of disallowing a transportationallowance for failure to file the applicable Form MMS-4295.One industry spokesperson stated that the lessee should be assessed a feeof $10.00 per day for each day the Form MMS-4295 is not received.One industry commenter suggested 120 days as a reasonable time in whichto submit a completed page one of Form MMS-4295.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> MMS has determined that the reporting penaltiesincluded in the proposed rule were excessive. MMS also has considered thecomments on retroactive approvals and has revised the final regulationsin andSection; 206.157(b)(1) to allow lessees to request transportation allowancesretroactively for a period of not more than 3 months prior to the firstday of the month that the Form MMS-4295 is filed with MMS, unless MMS approvesa longer period upon a showing of good cause by the lessee. Also, (d) providesan interest assessment for taking a transportation allowance without complyingwith the reporting requirements of the regulations, as well as a requirementthat a lessee repay the amount of any deduction disallowed because of thelimitation on retroactivity.4. Should MMS require prior approval for allowances?Several industry commenters and one trade group commented that they werein support of the self-implementing feature of the regulations which wouldnot require prior approval of each allowance by MMS before the allowancecould be claimed.States and Indians stated that prior approval of allowances should be required.Because of the numbers of selling arrangements involving costs, these commenterswere concerned that as a practical matter MMS will not question or auditthe majority of deductions.One Indian Tribe commenter stated that prior approval should be requiredbefore overhead expenses and depreciation are allowed; otherwise, transportationallowances will be subject to abuse and Indian royalties will suffer.One Indian Tribe representative stated it was not proper to allow depreciation,unless prior approval and prior audit is required.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS currently reviews and approves all transportationallowance requests and has considered preapproval and preaudit of transportationallowances. It has been decided that a more effective use of resourcescan be attained by doing exceptional processing on allowances and selectivelyreviewing certain allowances in depth to determine the propriety of theallowance reported by lessees on Form MMS-4295. Therefore, with limitedexceptions, no prior MMS approval will be required. However, the lesseewill be required to file a completed Form MMS-4295 before taking the allowance.5. Should costs other than actual, reasonable costs be considered in calculatingthe transportation allowance?Industry commenters stated that State and Federal income taxes are legitimateexpense items and should be allowed.One industry spokesperson recommended that dismantling costs be includedin the calculation of transportation allowances because this is a realcost of doing business.One trade group representative recommended that MMS reformulate the transportationprovisions to allow a firm or entity providing necessary transportationservices a complete recovery of costs plus an acceptable profit for assumingthe risks involved in providing transportation service.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS views income taxes to be an apportionmentof profit rather than a valid operating expense. However, interest on moneyborrowed for operations would be considered as a valid operating expense.Interest on money borrowed to build a transportation facility is not consideredallowable. A return on investment is given in lieu of interest on capitalinvestments.6. What rate of return should be used to calculate return on capital investment?Industry commenters, trade groups, private businesses, one city mayor,and Indian Tribes stated that the use of the Moody Aaa corporate bond rateproposed by MMS in paragraph (b) is inequitable for the rate of return.Following are some of the reasons provided by the respondents for thisviewpoint:a. The prime rate represents a nearly risk-free return on short-term borrowing.b. The use of Moody's Aaa bond rate assumes minimal risk and 100-percentdebt financing.c. For fairness, a rate of return must consider both cost of credit andequity capital.d. A rate of return based solely on a prime lending rate would not makethe investment in the transportation system a competitive project whencompared with other projects.e. The choice of Moody's Aaa rated debt is very conservative and arbitrary.Industry commenters and trade groups recommended various alternatives tothe Moody Aaa corporate bond rate:a. A rate equal to 150 percent of the 20-year T-bill rate.b. The prime rate plus 5 percent.c. One and onehalf times the average 30-year T-bill rate.d. The 20-year corporate industrial bond rated Baa.e. A yearly average of the monthly rate for 20-year T-bills.f. The 20-year corporate industrial bond rated Baa plus 9 percentage points.g. One and one-half times the prime rate.h. The FERC tariff rate of return.i. The before-tax rate of return of double the Moody's Aaa bond rate.j. A specific rate of return should be determined for each lessee.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has examined several options relating torate of return and decided that a rate of return should be closely associatedwith the cost of money necessary to build a transportation system. TheMMS is not persuaded that a rate of return should include a profitabilityfactor as a part of the transportation allowance. The MMS has examinedthe use of the corporate bond rate very carefully and has concluded thatthe use of such a rate would be feasible and would be appropriate for useas a rate of return considering the risks associated with the transportationof gas and gas plant products. There is no doubt that there are some veryhigh risks involved with some oil and gas ventures, such as wildcat drilling.However, the risk associated with building and developing a pipeline tomove gas that has already been discovered is a much different risk (anda risk that can reasonably be insured against) than the risk associatedwith the drilling of a well. Considering the risks related to transportationsystems, a rate of return based on an applicable corporate bond rate wouldbe appropriate for transportation systems.The MMS has considered the prime rate, the prime rate plus 5 points, oneand one-half times the average 20-year Treasury Bill rate, the Moody'sbond rate, Standard and Poor's bond rate, and the other rates suggestedby the commenters. The MMS believes that the use of an appropriate rateof return based on the corporate bond rate adequately considers the riskassociated with a transportation system and that there is no rational basisfor increasing a rate of return by arbitrarily adding percentage pointssimply to increase the allowance granted to a lessee. After carefully consideringthe comments and the options available, MMS determined that the rate ofreturn should be based on Standard and Poor's BBB industrial bond rate.Section 206.157 (b)(2)(v) has been revised accordingly in the final rule.However, because of the substantial and diverse comments received on thisissue, including comments on both the draft final rules that the BBB bondrate is not much better than the first proposal, MMS will issue a noticeof proposed rulemaking to consider further modifications to this section.7. Should MMS retain the provisions of Alternative 1 and/or Alternative2?Some industry commenters recommended that MMS retain both alternativesof depreciation and return on initial depreciable capital investment. Oneindustry commenter and one trade group stated that both alternatives shouldbe included in any cost-based methodology for determination of a transportationallowance. One industry commenter recommended that both methods be madeavailable for use at the lessee's election on the basis of an individualtransportation arrangement because adoption of this approach would assurethe flexibility necessary to adapt to unforeseen changes in the businessand transportation environments.Two industry commenters and one trade group stated that MMS should retainAlternative 1. One industry spokesperson sought clarification on Alternative1 to ensure both depreciation and return on depreciated investments areallowed.One trade group representative endorsed Alternative 2, provided that itsuse is an option for the lessee. One industry commenter supported Alternative2, suggesting that the initial capital investment should be the basis fordepreciation of any newly acquired transmission facility or gas plant.One trade group representative stated that Alternative 2 should be applicableto instances where a lessee has purchased a transportation system thathas previously been depreciated to some extent. One private business representativestated that Alternative 2 should be available without the limitation onnew or newly acquired transportation systems because it provides a viablesubstitute where original cost records no longer exist.One industry commenter recommended not adopting Alternative 2 because itprovides a significantly lower rate of return to the lessee.Two commenters stated that MMS should not tie the rate of return to a diminishingvalue. Both commenters stated that if the intention is to provide the lesseewith a rate of return for his invested capital, the lessee should not bepenalized by a diminishing return caused by tying the return into a depreciationoption. One industry representative stated that, based on the current Moody'sbond rate, Alternative 2 should only be advantageous for projects withover 30 years of life. One industry commenter stated an inequity could result in the case of transferringtransportation facilities from one party to another because it may be impossibleto allocate specific capital costs to particular segments for purposesof determining the depreciation cost allowance and the return on undepreciatedcapital investment cost allowances. One industry commenter stated thatMMS should accept a depreciation method recognized by FERC whether or notthe method is one of the two suggested. According to the commenter, thiswould eliminate the administrative burden of maintaining another set ofdepreciation records. One Federal agency commenter suggested there be norestriction on the depreciation method used.Several industry commenters stated that disallowing recapitalization isinequitable. One industry representative stated that the rule, as proposed,prohibits a new owner from recovering his costs because those costs wouldbe based on the present market value of the pipeline. One industry commenterstated that it would be administratively burdensome to disallow recapitalizationbecause it would require the lessee to maintain two separate sets of bookson depreciation, one for normal business and one for royalty purposes.One industry representative stated that prohibiting establishment of anew capital cost based upon the sale or transfer of a pipeline is inconsistentwith both the philosophy of arm's-length transactions and of approvingan allowance based on actual costs.Two industry commenters stated that the regulation should be more specificon how the lessee must adjust for continuing changes in reserves. For example,the continued development of different unitized depths in complex geologicareas or in areas with multiple leases will result in the continued redeterminationof reserves.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has reviewed the comments received regardingboth Alternative 1 and Alternative 2 and concluded that both alternativesshould be retained. However, under the final rule, andSection; 206.157(b)(2)(iv)(B),Alternative 2 can only be used for transportation facilities first placedin service after the effective date of these regulations.The MMS has considered the issue of recapitalization and decided that itwas appropriate for the Government to pay its share for the depreciationof a system transporting royalty-bearing gas only once.The MMS has carefully considered the issue of basing the rate of returnon a diminishing value and has decided that this procedure is consistentwith longstanding Government policy on allowances and that MMS should continuethis policy for transportation facilities in operation on the effectivedate of these regulations.The use of reserve life as a depreciation method is at the election ofthe lessee. If the method does not serve the lessee's needs, then a differentdepreciation method may be chosen. If the reserve life method of depreciationis chosen, it would be entirely appropriate for the lessee to adjust thereserve life when changes in reserves occur.The MMS has determined that a transportation system may be depreciatedonly once, and that the depreciation schedule established by the originaltransporter/lessee cannot be altered by a change in ownership.8. Should costs be allocated among lease products?Two industry commenters and one trade group suggested deletion of the sectionsrequiring allocation of costs (andSection; 206.157 (b)(3) and (b)(4) of thefinal rule). Two industry representatives stated that requiring allocationof transportation costs is an unjustified expense to the lessee and a burdensomeadministrative task for both industry and MMS.One industry commenter stated that allocation of costs among products isat odds with the basic valuation equation.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> MMS believes that the cost to transport a productshould correspond with the product transported. MMS recognizes that accountabilityis difficult and allocation may be a burdensome task but there is no acceptableway to avoid this responsibility.Section 206.157(c).The MMS received many comments from industry, States, and Indians on paragraph(c), which establishes reporting requirements for transportation allowances.The comments received addressed the following issues: General commentspertaining to the requirement to file for allowances, comments on the initial90-day submittal period, the subsequent annual requirement to submit FormMMS-4295, Gas Transportation Allowance Report, establishment of alternatereporting dates, and miscellaneous comments.1. The requirement to submit a Form MMS-4295 in order to claim a transportationallowance.Two industry commenters commend the MMS for proposing an allowance thatdoes not require prior approval. One industry commenter and one trade groupdisagree with proposed Form MMS-4295 because it requires too much informationand puts a burden on industry. One trade group representative stated thatMMS should substitute a form entitled ``Intent to Take a TransportationAllowance'' in lieu of the complicated annual filings proposed. One Staterepresentative stated that the reporting scheme would demand a major commitmentof resources and would be difficult to administer. One trade group commenterstated that submission of Form MMS-4295 will greatly increase the paperworkof both industry and MMS. Two industry commenters stated that, withoutproper public review and comment, they cannot endorse the use of Form MMS-4295.Ten commenters_seven industry and three trade groups_stated that provisionshould be made for allowances currently in effect on the effective dateof the regulations to continue until the allowance expires to avoid anundue administrative burden on MMS and lessees. Some commenters also pointedout that flexibility is needed to deal with special circumstances suchas spot sales contracts.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> Form MMS-4295 is required in order for MMS to monitorthe transportation allowance program. The MMS believes it can monitor thetransportation allowance deductions more effectively than with the preapprovalof the allowances. The MMS has made the information on Form MMS-4295 asclear and uncomplicated as possible considering the complex nature of transportationallowances. The filing of a Form MMS-4295 equates to an ``intent to deducttransportation.''For arm's-length contracts, paragraph (c)(1) requires the filing only ofpage one of the Form MMS-4295. Pursuant to paragraph (c)(2), for most non-arm's-lengthcontracts, the lessee must submit the entire form. Lessees who receivean exception under subsection (b)(5) and are authorized to use their FERCtariff will be required to file only the first page of Form MMS-4295. SeeandSection;andSection; 206.157 (c)(2)(i) and (c)(2)(viii).For transportation allowances in effect on the effective date of theserules (which includes only those approvals from MMS which are in writing),no form needs to be filed until the allowance terminates. See andSection;206.157 (c)(1)(v) and (c)(2)(v). These continued allowances will be subjectto audit.The MMS has also included in paragraphs (c)(1)(vi) and (c)(2)(vii) of thissection authority to establish reporting requirements different from thosein the regulations where necessary to accommodate special circumstances.2. Requirement to file a Form MMS-4295 within 90 days after the end ofthe reporting period.One industry commenter stated that a 120-day filing period should be permittedfor filing Form MMS-4295 to ease the administrative burden. This commentersuggested that if the form is not received within the prescribed 120 days,the lessee could be assessed a fee of $10.00 per day for each day the formis not received. One industry representative suggested that a minimum 180-dayconversion should be allowed from the date of publication of the finalregulations. One trade group representative agreed that a 12-month term should be endorsedfor both onshore and offshore allowances. One industry representative recommendedthat allowances be based on data from a full calendar year and be reportedto MMS by April 1 for the preceding year. Nine commenters, seven industryand two trade groups, stated that an annual reporting request is undulyburdensome and that lessees should only be required to file Form MMS-4295when there is a change in the allowance amount.Industry representatives stated that failure to file a completed Form MMS-4295should not result in a denial of allowances because this constitutes asubstantial penalty. One industry spokesperson stated that to ease MMS's workload, each lesseeshould be assigned a particular due date for filing all forms. One Indiantrade group was concerned over the provision establishing different reportingdates from those specified in order to provide more effective administration.One industry commenter on the second draft final rule stated that a 90-dayfiling deadline is unacceptable.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The final regulations in andSection; 206.157(c)(1)(iii)and (c)(2)(iii) give the lessee 3 months after the end of the previousreporting period to file the required forms. The lessee will continue touse the previous allowance during that three-month period. Also, as describedearlier, the final regulations allow for transportation allowances to beclaimed retroactively for a period of not more than 3 months prior to thefirst day of the month that Form MMS-4295 is filed with MMS. Therefore,even if the lessee is not able to timely file the Form MMS-4295, the lesseecould file the Form MMS-4295 and claim the transportation allowance ona corrected Form MMS2014 at a later date.The MMS concurs with a 12-month term and the final regulations requirethat a Form MMS-4295 will be filed on the basis of a calendar year.3. Miscellaneous comments received.One industry representative stated that MMS should continue its policyof not requiring reporting or approval of reduction in sales prices whichreflect transportation. One industry commenter recommended that deductionstaken as an offset against price should be accepted by MMS without thenecessity of filing Form MMS-4295.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> In situations where the purchaser is reducing thecontract price for a transportation cost and the lessee is incurring noout-of-pocket expense, a Form MMS-4295 is not required. In these situations,because the reduction in price represents a cost incurred past the pointof first sale, a transportation allowance would not be allowed by the regulations.However, in determining the value of the gas, the reduction in price forthe transportation costs past the point of sale would be considered. Asexplained above, MMS has placed some limits on the reduction before MMSapproval is required.Section 206.157(d).MMS has added a new andSection; 206.157(d) to the final regulations. Thisparagraph requires a lessee that deducts a transportation allowance fromits royalty payments before complying with the requirements of this paragraph(i.e. filing the proper forms) to pay interest from the date it improperlytook the deduction until the form is filed. As noted above, pursuant toparagraph (c), the lessee also will be required to pay back any allowancededucted more than 3 months prior to the first day of the month the properforms are filed, plus interest.Section 206.157(e).This section was proposed as paragraph (d) and provides an adjustment procedurewhere the estimated allowance differs from the actual allowance.Industry representatives commented that the MMS proposal for handling interestpayments is unfair, and stated that ``It is equitable that, if the lesseemust pay any difference in royalty owed plus interest, MMS should alsopay any difference plus interest statutorily authorized.''<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has no legal authority to pay interest tolessees on their overpayments. Several industry commenters recommended that positive or negative differencesbetween estimated and actual costs should be rolled forward into the transportationrate for the subsequent period because this would relieve the immense administrativeburden on MMS and industry. One oil and gas company recommended that actualdata from one period be used as the allowance for the following period,thus requiring no adjustments.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS considered alternatives such as (1) rollingforward differences into subsequent periods or (2) using actual data fromone period to be used as the next period's allowance, but determined thatsuch procedures could be inequitable to lessees, MMS, Indian Tribes, andIndian allottees. Consequently, MMS has decided to retain the estimatedand actual cost procedure.Two oil and gas companies commented that refunds for estimates tenderedin excess of actual costs should not be classified as refunds of a royaltypayment under Section 10 of the OCS Lands Act because estimates are not``actual'' payments of royalty. Overpayments could then be treated as lineitem adjustments not subject to the refund process. It was the firms' positionthat the OCS Lands Act, Section 10, does not require requests for refundswhen estimated costs are less than actual costs and stated that the conceptof estimate versus payment is clearly discernible. ``Payment'' is definedas a discharge of indebtedness, while ``estimate'' is a rough or approximatecalculation, not an overpayment.One oil and gas company commented that the current extensive review andaudit process is causing lessees to lose the time value of money in therefunds which are due them under section 10 of the OCS Lands Act. Auditson such refunds were described as fruitless and wasteful, and it was suggestedthat MMS consider transportation allowance adjustments to be exceptionsto the refund requirements. Overpayments could then be recovered by lineitemadjustments on Form MMS-2014.Two oil and gas companies strongly emphasized that the requirement to submitwritten requests for refunds for under-deducted transportation costs inaccordance with Section 10 of the OCS Lands Act will be an extraordinarilydifficult financial and reporting burden for industry and the MMS.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> It would not be proper for these rules to prescribethe refund procedures. MMS is reviewing the issue and will provide guidanceto lessees.Three oil and gas companies and one trade organization representative rejectedusing prior year actual costs for the current reporting period, statingthat it automatically requires retroactive adjustment. They recommend thatlessees be allowed to use forecast rates based on their knowledge and experiencewith the operations. Three oil and gas companies proposed that MMS establishan allowable range and not require retroactive adjustments if performanceis within the allowable range. One oil and gas company recommended using market-based allowances, requiringa single entry and resulting in fewer adjustments and fewer transportationrecords to be reviewed. One oil and gas company recommended that, to reducecosts, adjustments should be made by a single entry each year, not monthly.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS was unable to develop an acceptable accountingmethodology that would eliminate retroactive adjustments of prior periodtentative transportation allowances for non-arm's-length and no-contractsituations. The final regulations do, however, permit a lessee to adjustits estimates in the succeeding period based on forecasted rates. Moreover,because MMS now will accept FERC tariffs for most non-arm's-length transportationsituations where they exist, fewer adjustments will be necessary becausefewer lessees will be required to use the actual cost methodology.Section 206.157(f).Paragraph (f) of this section was proposed as paragraph (e) and, as proposed,provided that no cost is allowed for transportation which results frompayments for actual or theoretical losses. The MMS received many differentcomments on this paragraph from industry, trade groups, and one U.S. Senatorand an Indian tribal organization. Generally, the commenters stated thatline losses are actual costs of doing business, should be allowable, andthat this paragraph of the regulations should be deleted. The Indian commenter,however, said such deductions are not justifiable.Industry commenters and the U.S. Senator commented that line losses areactual transportation costs which should be allowed by MMS. One industrycommenter stated that line losses occur beyond the control of the lesseeand are practical and legitimate occurrences. Another industry commenterstated that such allowances are real transportation costs borne by thelessee. Seven industry commenters stated that MMS should allow line lossesnot attributable to negligence.Three commenters-two industry and one trade group representative_commentedthat line losses in arm's-length contracts and FERC tariffs should be allowed.One industry commenter stated that if a loss provision is a part of anarm's-length contract or a FERC tariff, MMS should accept such a provision,just as it accepts the dollars-and-cents rates in the contract or tariffbecause the losses are part of the total cost of the transportation arrangement.One industry representative stated that producer-owned pipelines shouldinclude transportation losses as part of operating expenses in the formulationof an allowance. Other commenters recommended deletion of this paragraph.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> All of the issues of theoretical and actual linelosses have been considered at length by MMS. Because of the difficultyof demonstrating that losses are valid and not the result of meter erroror other difficult-to-measure causes, MMS has decided not to treat linelosses as valid costs for purposes of computing transportation allowancesin non-arm's-length and no-contract situations. However, the final ruleprovides that costs associated with payments for losses under arm's-lengthtransportation agreements should be allowed because the payment is an out-of-pocketexpense to the lessee. Also, the final rule provides that when a tariffapproved by FERC or a State regulatory agency is authorized to be usedby the lessee as its transportation allowance, any component of that tariffrepresenting such losses will be allowed.Section 206.157(g).The MMS received comments on andSection; 206.157(g), which was proposed asparagraph (f). This paragraph allows use of the transportation allowancerules where transportation is a component of a valuation procedure suchas a net-back method.The industry respondents stated that use of cost-based transportation allowancesis inequitable when using net-back valuation because actual costs incurredshould be recognized. According to these comments, if MMS collects royaltyon the enhanced downstream value, MMS should bear its share of actual costsincurred to move the hydrocarbon for sale downstream.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS remains convinced that the cost-based allowanceprocedure for determining gas transportation allowances is appropriatefor determining value under a net-back procedure. If there is an applicabletariff, upon application, that could be used instead.Section 206.158 Processing allowances_general.The processing allowance regulations are almost the same as the transportationallowance regulations. As expected, therefore, most of the comments werethe same. Because responding to the same comments and explaining the sameregulatory section is duplicative and unnecessary, in this section MMSgenerally will respond only to comments and explain regulatory provisionswhich are unique to gas processing allowances.Section 206.158(a).The MMS received many different comments from Indians, industry, and States,as well as from some other persons, on paragraph (a) of this section ofthe regulations, which generally provide for a processing allowance. Commentson gas processing allowances, which did not relate to any specific sectionof the regulations, are addressed in this paragraph of the gas processingregulations. One industry representative cautioned that, although the final processingregulations must contain certainty, they should also be flexible enoughto encourage innovative marketing of the gas plant products. Similarly,one State agency said that the proposed regulations must reflect the changingnature of industry, serve to encourage rather than discourage new projects,and allow existing operations to identify new markets.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS believes that the regulations are completeand sufficiently flexible to accommodate different types of gas processingarrangements that might arise in the future. The MMS further believes thatthe regulations are reasonable. To not discourage new development, MMShas provided an exception process whereby a lessee may be able to justifya processing allowance in excess of the 66\2/3\-percent limitation andhas provided the lessee with broad latitude to deduct processing costsunder arm's-length contracts. For processing under non-arm's-length andno-contract situations, MMS has provided the lessee with several alternativesfor depreciation and return on investment. MMS also has provided for anextraordinary cost allowance for processing gas production. The MMS doesnot believe that the objectives of certainty and flexibility should replacethe Federal Government's responsibility to properly account for the removalof minerals from a Federal or Indian lease.One industry commenter and one industry trade organization thought thatthis section should incorporate a provision to include the deduction offractionation costs.One industry commenter and one industry trade representative recommendedthat processing allowances continue to be granted on the basis of percentageof value.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The regulations, as adopted, accommodate fractionationcosts as part of the processing allowance cost. Therefore, a specific provisionis not necessary. The MMS has determined that an allowance based on a costper unit is more equitable and will result in less difference between actualand estimated allowances than an allowance based on percentage, especiallyin times of rapid price fluctuations.Section 206.158(b).Paragraph (b) of this section requires allocation of processing costs amonggas plant products. Comments were received principally from industry.There was general opposition from industry to the allocation of processingallowances by gas plant product. They recommended either to delete thisparagraph or to rewrite it in such a manner as to allow all processingcosts in full to be deducted from the value of both the residue gas andgas plant products. One industry representative proposed a change whichwould allow the allocation of processing costs to both the value of gasplant products and residue gas.One industry representative stated that the cost of processing should notbe allocated to one product when it benefits all products. One industrytrade group stated that the allocation of costs among products is contraryto the valuation principle that the value of production should equal thesum of all gross proceeds less the sum of all post-production costs.Two industry representatives plus one industry trade group recommendedthat, if allocation of costs are necessary, allocation should be basedon percentage of sales rather than on a cost per unit; that is, based onvalue rather than volume. Two industry representatives and one trade groupthought that the allocation of costs presents an administrative burdenfor both industry and MMS.Two industry commenters recommended the addition of the phrase ``(fractionatedor unfractionated)'' between the words ``liquids'' and ``shall'' in thelast sentence of this subsection.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>It has been a longstanding MMS policy and regulatoryrequirement that no processing allowance be granted against the value ofresidue gas. Among the reasons for this is that processing is viewed asnecessary to place the residue gas in marketable condition and that processingdoes not generally enhance the value of residue gas. Thus, generally noprocessing allowance is authorized against the value of the residue gasin the final rule. The MMS believes that allocating processing costs basedon relative volume rather than on relative value is more equitable becausethe costs of extracting any given product may be unrelated to that product'svalue. Also, MMS will not include the addition of the phrase ``(fractionatedor unfractionated)'' in the last sentence because it does not clarify themeaning of the sentence.Section 206.158(c).As proposed, paragraph (c) of this section generally limited the processingallowance deduction to two-thirds of the value of each gas plant product.The MMS received a large number of comments on this paragraph. Most industry-related commenters expressed their objection to the 66\2/3\-percentlimitation on the processing allowance, and the exclusion of residue gasvalue from the allowance determination. Other commenters supported thisposition.One State representative suggested that the limitation creates a floorand feared that a 66\2/3\-percent processing allowance will be taken asan automatic deduction.An industry trade organization commented that in processing a sour, lowquality gas stream, the 66\2/3\-percent limitation does not reflect actualcosts to industry. This trade group plus four industry commenters statedthat in high-cost or lowquality areas, the limitation will discourage development.Many industry commenters recommended, in lieu of a strict limitation, thatthe 66 2/3-percent level be a threshold above which an allowance will begranted according to specific criteria. For example, one industry commenterrecommended a higher allowance upon MMS approval. Another industry commenterrequested that a higher allowance be approved on the basis of ``nationalinterest'' criteria.Some industry commenters stated that MMS should allow lessees to carryforward processing costs otherwise allowable (except for the 66\2/3\-percentlimitation) from the current year to subsequent years. The MMS also received several comments from parties who supported the proposed66\2/3\-percent limitation on the processing allowance, including two oilproducers, one interest owner, one State representative, and one Stateand Tribal organization. Another oil producer added that it opposed increasingthe limitation. One interest owner stated that the limitation should belowered.An additional comment from a State and Tribal organization stated thatit favors the exclusion of residue gas from the allowance determination.An Indian trade group stated its objection to the Director approving anallowance in excess of 66\2/3\-percent.Six parties (one oil producer, one State representative, one interest owner,two industry parties, and one State and Tribal organization) stated theiropposition to a ``carry forward'' provision for costs exceeding the 66\2/3\-percentlimitation. One industry commenter stated that such a process would be``impractical.''One industry commenter suggested that the 66\2/3\-percent limitation shouldnot apply to arm's-length processing contracts. It also was recommendedthat the 66\2/3\-percent calculation should be done before deducting transportationallowances.Two industry commenters and three industry groups recommended that therules should specify the conditions for which an allowance in excess oftwo-thirds would be approved.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS has devoted considerable time and effortin evaluating the 66\2/3\-percent limitation on the processing allowance,and the exclusion of the value of residue gas from the allowance computation.Section 206.158(c)(2) of the final rule provides that the processing allowancededuction on the basis of an individual product cannot exceed 66\2/3\-percentof the value of each gas plant product at the point of sale determinedin accordance with andSection; 206.153. No processing allowance may be takenagainst the value of the residue gas, except for certain extraordinaryallowances specifically approved by MMS in accordance with paragraph (d),discussed below.The 66\2/3\-percent limit is to be applied against the value of the productalready reduced by any transportation allowance for transportation costsincurred after the gas is processed. Transportation allowances relatedto transportation from the field to the processing plant would not be deductedbefore applying the 66\2/3\-percent limitation.The MMS has retained in the final rule a procedure whereby the lessee mayrequest an exception from the 66\2/3\-percent limitation. The lessee mustdemonstrate that any costs in excess of the limitation are reasonable,actual, and necessary. This procedure will allow MMS to monitor more closelythose situations where the allowance based on reasonable, actual costswill be in excess of the 66\2/3\-percent limitations. Under no circumstancesmay the processing allowance equal 100 percent of the value of any product.As with transportation allowances, many commenters suggested that any additionalallowance must be in the ``best interests of the lessor.'' As stated earlier,MMS believes that this standard is too subjective and that the standardincluded in the rules will protect the lessors' interests.The MMS will not include any specific standards in the rule for when thetwo thirds limit may be exceeded. This will require case-by-case review.Industry respondents and industry trade groups stated their objection tothe requirement regarding substitution of other products for residue gasin situations where residue gas is absent. One industry trade group statedthat, in this situation, the lessee should be able to deduct the processingcosts against the sum of all marketable products. Industry commenters recommendedthat this sentence be deleted. Industry commenters were also concernedthat this paragraph would prohibit an allowance from being taken againstall gas plant products if the residue gas was returned to the lease forreinjection or other uses.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS did not intend, where residue gas was returnedto the lease, that this provision would require the lessee to designateat least one gas plant product as being placed in marketable conditionas a result of processing. The provision was intended to cover those situationswhere no residue gas was produced at the plant at all owing to the absenceof, or very low levels of, hydrocarbons in the gas when produced from thewell. However, because the extraordinary processing allowance procedurediscussed below would most likely be applicable in these situations, MMShas modified the final rule to eliminate the requirement that the lesseedesignate a gas plant product against which no allowance would be granted.Instead, the final rule provides that MMS may designate a gas plant productagainst which no allowance would be applied if circumstances warrant.Section 206.158(d)The MMS received many comments on paragraph (d) of this section, whichprovides generally that no processing cost deduction will be allowed forthe costs of placing lease production in marketable condition. Commentswere received from industry, Indian Tribes, local businesses, a town mayor,a Federal agency, and individuals. The major issue raised in this paragraph was whether or not costs associatedwith placing a product in marketable condition, generally referred to bythe commenters as post-production costs, should be deductible from royalty.All industry-related commenters, the local businesses, and one town mayorsupported the concept that all post-production costs be allowable deductionsfrom royalty.Industry commenters expressed their view that certain post-production costsshould be deductible from royalty. One industry trade group stated thatthe costs related to the manufacture and sale of separately marketableproducts are extraordinary and should be allowed. One industry commenterstated that ``. . . other off-lease post-production costs and certain 'extraordinary'on-lease costs'' should be deductible. <T3>MMS Response: </T3>MMS already has addressed the post-production costissue with regard to other sections of these regulations. Post-productioncosts, excluding those for transportation and processing, are not allowabledeductions from royalty. Post-production costs for the services of gathering,separation, measurement, dehydration, compression, and sweetening are consideredto be a requirement to place the lease production into marketable condition,at no cost to the lessor. These costs are not considered part of the processingcosts and, therefore, are not deductible in a processing allowance. MMS has included in the final regulations a new andSection; 206.158(d)(2)which was included in the second draft final rule. Pursuant to this paragraph,if a lessee incurs extraordinary costs for processing gas production, itmay apply to MMS for an extra allowance above that to which it otherwisewould be entitled pursuant to these regulations. The allowance is discretionarywith MMS, but may be granted only if the lessee can demonstrate that thecosts are, by reference to standard industry conditions, extraordinary,unusual, or unconventional. Under this paragraph, an allowance could beprovided against the value of the residue gas. The MMS has removed anyreference to ``unique'' processing operations. It is not MMS's intent tolimit the allowance to one-of-a-kind plants. MMS also has included flexibilityfor longer approval periods.Section 206.159. Determination of processing allowances.Section 206.159(a).The MMS received a large number of comments from States, Indians, and industry.Again, most of the issues raised in the comments were the same as for thecorresponding section of the transportation allowance regulations and willnot be repeated.Two industry commenters responded in favor of the provision in andSection;206.159(a)(1) whereby MMS would accept costs incurred under arm's-lengthprocessing agreements as the reasonable, actual costs incurred by the lesseebecause they thought these arrangements reflect true processing costs experiencedby the lessee. One Indian Tribal trade group opposed this proposal becauseof the concern that, under these procedures, the Indian lessor's royaltycould be reduced to virtually nothing.One industry commenter suggested changing section (a)(1) to read ``If alessee has an arm's-length contract or a negotiated Products Purchase Agreement(PPA) to process gas, the processing cost deduction shall be the reasonableactual cost incurred * * *''<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS believes that processing costs incurredby a lessee under arm's-length agreements represent actual costs to thelessee and should be appropriate as a processing allowance. The suggestionthat a negotiated Products Purchase Agreement be recognized as properlydefining the actual cost incurred is not adopted. A Products Purchase Agreementmay not be an arm's-length contract. However, where the lessee's arm's-lengthprocessing agreement specifies that the costs are to be those containedin the Products Purchase Agreement, then those costs would be acceptableowing to the arm's-length processing agreement of the lessee. MMS has addeda provision clarifying that the lessee has the burden of demonstratingthat its contract is arm's-length. Under the provisions of these regulations,the lessor's royalty cannot be reduced to zero. Also, as with transportationallowances, MMS has added two paragraphs which provide that MMS will treatas non-arm's-length any processing contracts which reflect more than theconsideration actually transferred from the lessee to the processor (i.e.,the cost is inflated) or where there is misconduct by or between the contractingparties or the lessee otherwise breaches its duty to the lessor to marketthe production for the mutual benefit of the lessee and the lessor. With regard to the requirement of andSection; 206.159(a)(2) that processingcosts be allocated among all products, one industry commenter was criticalof the proposal to treat all NGL's (but no other plant products) as oneproduct. The commenter thought this was discriminatory toward the lesseesin favor of processors of wet gas, not only because some lessees typicallywill be able to recover total processing costs from the value of the NGL's,but if other products are produced, costs would need to be allocated tothem, with the possibility that some of these costs would not be totallyrecovered. This industry representative stated that all of the marketableproducts should be treated as one product, including residue gas, for purposesof allocating processing costs. Another industry representative made proposalswhich would make the allocation procedure unnecessary.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The NGL's, historically, have been considered oneplant product, for royalty purposes, because they are commonly extractedfirst as raw make at an extraction facility. MMS has determined that allother individual plant products must be evaluated separately for processingallowances for the reasons stated previously.Section 206.159(b).The MMS received a very large number of comments on andSection; 206.159(b),which provides for a processing allowance determination where the lesseehas a non-arm's-length contract for processing or no contract. Commentswere from industry commenters, industry trade organizations, State representatives,a Federal agency, an interest owner, local businesses, and from a townmayor.The major issues addressed regarding this paragraph were (1) the requirementof a lessee's actual costs versus use of a benchmark system, (2) the useof ``Alternative 1'' or ``Alternative 2'' for depreciation or a returnon capital investment, and (3) the rate of return on capital investment.These issues are basically the same as for the transportation allowanceand have been responded to. However, some comments were specific to processingcosts. Industry comments disagreed with the proposal under this paragraph to baseallowances on cost accounting procedures.Industry commenters explicitly voiced their support for a market valueconcept; i.e., MMS should accept the market value of service for the allowancedetermination. One industry commenter added that, under the proposed methodology,MMS ignores ``competitive market forces.'' Another industry commenter requestedthat MMS adopt a ``market-oriented'' approach. Still another industry commenterstated that, if a non-arm's-length contract for processing reflects themarket value for that service, it should be acceptable.The industry commenters specifically recommended that MMS should adopta benchmark system for allowance determinations under this section. Thesecommenters suggested that comparable arm's-length contracts be used todetermine the allowance for non-arm's-length processing arrangements inthe same facility. One of the industry commenters added that the use ofcomparable arm's-length contracts will reduce the number of adjustmentsand other records to be filed.One State representative opposed a benchmark system.Four industry commenters and one industry trade group complained that costaccounting is a departure from the valuation requirements and that it discriminatesagainst lessee affiliates.Another industry commenter recommended that, if plant ownership interestis sufficiently small, it should be treated as an arm's-length arrangement.<T3>MMS Response: </T3>The MMS considered a benchmark valuation systemfeaturing comparable arm's-length contracts to determine processing allowances,with cost accounting being used as a last resort. MMS concluded that sucha procedure is not the fairest and best way to determine gas processingallowances considering the overall interests of industry, the Federal Government,States, and Indian Tribes. The MMS does not believe that allowances generallyshould be valued on a ``market-based system'' the way products are valuedfor royalty determination purposes for several reasons.First, the determination of an allowance on a ``market-based system'' wouldnot be representative of a lessee's actual, reasonable costs. Second, ifone lessee bases its allowance on actual costs, and another lessee processinggas in the same facility bases its allowance on market value, an inequitywill result.For these reasons, MMS has decided that generally the gas processing allowanceis best determined on actual, reasonable costs plus a return on undepreciatedcapital investment, or its initial capital investment. However, MMS hasincluded in andSection; 206.159(b)(4) of the final rules a provision wherebya lessee may apply to MMS for an exception from the requirement to useactual costs. MMS may grant such an exception, at its discretion, onlyif two conditions are met: (1) The lessee has arm's-length contracts forprocessing other gas production at the same processing plant; and (2) atleast 50 percent of the gas processed at the plant is processed pursuantto arm's-length processing contracts. MMS has decided not to include athird requirement that the persons purchasing processing services fromthe lessee had a reasonable alternative to processing at the lessee's plant.Industry commenters noted that there often is no choice for the purchaser,thus the third requirement would render the exception unrealistic. If theexception is granted, the lessee must use as its allowance the volume-weightedaverage of the prices it charges other persons pursuant to arm's-lengthcontracts at the same plant. Although some State and Indian commentersexpressed concern over deviating from a true cost-based approach, MMS issatisfied that if these conditions are met, the processing allowance willreflect the market and that MMS will be able to monitor the use of theseallowances.Three industry commenters recommended that the 50-percent threshold bereduced to 25 percent. The MMS did not adopt this change because theredid not appear to be broad support for a change to the 50-percent threshold.Two industry commenters stated that State and Federal income taxes shouldbe considered as allowable costs on the premise that such costs are real,tangible costs to the lessee.Two other industry commenters suggested that plant dismantling and abandonmentcosts should be allowable, advising that such costs are a real cost ofdoing business.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS views income taxes to be an apportionmentof profit rather than a valid operating expense. Therefore, income taxesare not an appropriate expense that should be included in the processingallowance. The MMS takes the position that, because it does not participatein the profit or losses from the sale of processing facilities, no costsfor dismantling and abandonment should be included in processing allowances.The basic issue regarding requirements to allocate processing costs amongall plant products is discussed under andSection; 206.158(b). However, specificcomments pertaining to the allocation under non-arm's-length and no-contractsituations are discussed here.Industry commenters disagreed with the requirement to allocate costs ongenerally accepted oil and gas accounting principles. One of these commentersrecommended deleting this requirement. Other commenters advised that generallyaccepted principles for cost allocation do not exist. One commenter suggestedinstead that allocations be based on (1) cost-benefit analysis, and (2)cause-and-effect relationships.One industry commenter recommended that this requirement be modified toinclude an allocation of costs to residue gas.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that if cost-benefit analysis andcause-and-effect relationships are generally acceptable procedures in costallocation, these procedures would be acceptable to MMS. MMS will considercost allocation procedures for unique situations on the basis of individualcases in order to arrive at an equitable allocation procedure. As statedpreviously, MMS believes that it is not appropriate to allocate processingcosts to residue gas.Section 206.159(c).The MMS received several comments on paragraph (c) of this section, whichaddresses reporting requirements for processing allowances. Again, thisparagraph is virtually identical to the corresponding provision for transportationallowances, and the response to comments for that section is, for the mostpart, applicable here.The two major areas of concern were (1) use of Form MMS-4109, and (2) theterms of the reporting periods and filing timetables.Industry commenters and Indian Tribes expressed some opposition to FormMMS-4109. One industry respondent and one industry trade group objectedto commenting on the form until it is published, adding that it shouldnot conflict with any rights of the lessee. Several industry commentersopposed the filing of Form MMS-4109 at all. One of the industry commentersstated that processing rates under an arm's-length or non-arm's-lengthcontract should be accepted at face value. An industry trade group claimedthat filing of the form would be an unnecessary burden for both industryand MMS. Another industry commenter stated that it opposed any reportingrequirements such as annual renewals or contract change updates. A Tribeopposed industry taking an allowance on the honor system and merely filinga form to claim it.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS believes that Form MMS-4109 must be requiredin order for MMS to monitor the processing allowance program. The MMS believesit can effectively monitor the processing allowance deductions withoutthe preapproval of the allowances. The MMS has made the information onForm MMS-4109 as clear and uncomplicated as possible considering the complexnature of processing allowances. The filing of a Form MMS-4109 does notconflict with any lease provisions or rights of the lessees. The MMS agreesthat its procedure for determining a processing allowance places initialreliance on the gas industry. However, this program will be under continuousreview and oversight by MMS. Thus, the ability to effectively review, evaluate,and audit processing allowances has been maintained under the new regulations.The MMS received several comments on the Form MMS-4109 format. These commentswill be considered in designing the final form.The initial concern about reporting periods was MMS's proposal to createa new reporting period for all allowances which would commence the datethe new regulations are effective. Industry commenters opposed this, recommendinginstead that all existing allowances be grandfathered under the new regulations.Another industry commenter requested 180 days for conversion to the newreporting period.Another topic addressed by the respondents was the term of the reportingperiod. Industry commenters favored a reporting period that extends aslong as the contract terms are effective, instead of an arbitrary 12-monthperiod. One of the industry commenters stated that resources are wastedby requiring the lessee to file year after year even though there are nochanges. However, one industry commenter and one industry trade group endorsedthe 12-month reporting period. The industry commenter specifically requesteda calendar-year period.Two industry commenters recommended a longer grace period in which to filesubsequent Forms MMS-4109. These commenters both suggested 120 days tofile updated forms.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS concurs with a 12-month term and the regulationshave been changed to allow filing of Form MMS-4109 by calendar year. Theregulations have also been changed to allow a grace period of 3 monthsduring which the lessee continues to use the previous allowance. The MMSalso decided that existing allowances (but only those approved in writingby MMS) will continue in effect until they expire, subject to later audit,with the exception of processing allowances for OCS production, which arebased on non-arm's-length or no-contract situations. Because these allowancesare based upon a procedure radically different from the procedure adoptedin the final rule, they will continue in effect until they expire or untilthe end of the calendar year, whichever occurs first.Section 206.159(d)Paragraph (d) of this section is the same as for transportation allowances.If a lessee deducts a processing allowance without filing the proper forms,it will owe interest on the amount of the deduction until the proper formsare filed, subject to the 3-month retroactivity provision. Section 206.159(e).As with transportation allowance adjustments, the issues regarding paragraph(e) of this section were (1) the requirement to file adjustments, (2) therefund procedure under Section 10 of the OCS Lands Act, and (3) the paymentof interest.It was the general consensus that adjustments were a very large burdenon both industry and MMS and that some way should be found to eliminatethe need for so many adjustments resulting from differences between actualand estimated processing allowances. Six industry representatives and twoindustry trade groups recommended that positive or negative differencesbetween estimated and actual costs should be rolled forward into the processingallowance for the subsequent period, or prospectively.One industry commenter asserted that retroactive adjustments should notbe necessary if the actual allowance falls within an allowable range ofthe estimated allowance, and two other industry commenters suggested rollingforward small differences into next year's costs within an allowable range.One industry commenter proposed single-entry adjustments for an entireyear instead of month-by-month adjustments. This party also made the commentthat if a market-based allowance were permitted, it would be more certainand fewer adjustments would be necessary.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS expended considerable effort in an attemptto arrive at an accounting methodology that would eliminate retroactiveadjustments of processing allowances and continue to be fair to industry,MMS, and Indian lessors, but was unable to do so.One industry representative stated that overpayments, when estimates wereless than actual costs, should not be judged as refunds of a payment ofroyalty under section 10 of the OCS Lands Act because estimates are not``actual'' payments of royalty. Overpayments could then be treated as line-itemadjustments not subject to the refund process.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The refund procedure will not be specified in theseregulations. MMS is reviewing the issue and will provide guidance to thelessees on refund procedures. Industry representatives commented that the MMS-proposed procedure forhandling interest payments was not fair. These commenters believed that,if the lessee must pay any difference plus interest, MMS should also payany difference plus any interest statutorily authorized. Another issueof concern was the payment of interest requirement.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> The MMS has no legal authority to pay interest tolessees on their overpayments. Section 206.159(f).Paragraph (f) of this section requires that the provisions in this sectionwill apply to determine processing costs in situations where value mustbe established under other methods such as net-back.One industry commenter recommended that the definition of ``net-back method''be clarified.<T3>MMS Response:</T3> A definition of the netback method has been includedin andSection; 206.151, which is slightly different from that proposed. TheMMS believes this revised definition clarifies MMS's intent.IV. Procedural MattersExecutive Order 12291 The Department of the Interior (DOI) has determined that this documentis not a major rule and does not require a regulatory analysis under ExecutiveOrder 12291. This proposed rulemaking is to consolidate Federal and Indiangas royalty valuation regulations, to clarify the DOI gas royalty valuationpolicy, and to provide for consistent royalty valuation policy among allleasable minerals.Regulatory Flexibility ActBecause this rule primarily consolidates and streamlines existing regulationsfor consistent application, there are no significant additional requirementsor burdens placed upon small business entities as a result of implementationof this rule. Therefore, the DOI has determined that this rulemaking willnot have a significant economic effect on a substantial number of smallentities and does not require a regulatory flexibility analysis under theRegulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>).Paperwork Reduction ActThe information collection and recordkeeping requirements located at andSection;andSection;206.157 and 206.159 of this rule have been approved by the Office of Managementand Budget under 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq.</T3> and assigned clearance number 1010-0075.Lessee reporting requirements will be reduced. All gas sales contracts,transportation agreements and gas processing contracts, as well as anyother agreements affecting value, will be required to be retained by thelessee, but will only be required to be submitted upon request rather thanroutinely, as under the existing regulations.National Environmental Policy Act of 1969It is hereby determined that this rulemaking does not constitute a majorFederal action significantly affecting the quality of the human environmentand a detailed statement pursuant to section 102(2)(C) of the NationalEnvironmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. 4332(2)(C)) is not required.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>30 CFR Part 202Coal, Continental shelf, Geothermal energy, Government contracts, Indianlands, Mineral royalties, Natural gas, Petroleum Public lands-mineral resources,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.30 CFR Part 206Coal, Continental shelf, Geothermal energy, Government contracts, Indianlands, Mineral royalties, Natural gas, Petroleum, Public lands-mineralresources, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements. <ITAG tagnum="21">Date: January 6, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">J. Steven Griles,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary, Land and Minerals Management.</ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, 30 CFR Parts 202 and 206 are amendedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">TITLE 30_MINERAL RESOURCES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 202_ROYALTIES</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 202 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 25 U.S.C. 396 <T3>et seq.</T3>; 25 U.S.C. 396a <T3>et seq.</T3>; 25 U.S.C. 2101 <T3>et seq.</T3>; 30 U.S.C. 181 <T3>et seq.</T3>; 30 U.S.C. 351 <T3>et seq</T3>.; 30 U.S.C. 1001 <T3>et seq</T3>.; 30 U.S.C. 1701 <T3>et seq</T3>.; 43 U.S.C. 1301 <T3>et seq</T3>.; 43 U.S.C. 1331 <T3>et seq</T3>.; and 43 U.S.C. 1801 <T3>et seq</T3>.</ITAG>2. A new Subpart D consisting of andSection;andSection; 202.150, 202.151, and202.152 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72"/><T2>Subpart D_Federal and Indian Gas</T2><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">202.150 Royalty on gas.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">202.151 Royalty on processed gas.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">202.152 Standards for reporting and paying royalties on gas.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart D_Federal and Indian Gas</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 202.150</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Royalty on gas.</ITAG>(a) Royalties due on gas production from leases subject to the requirementsof this subpart, except helium produced from Federal leases, shall be atthe rate established by the terms of the lease. Royalty shall be paid invalue unless MMS requires payment in kind. When paid in value, the royaltydue shall be the value, for royalty purposes, determined pursuant to 30CFR Part 206 of this title multiplied by the royalty rate in the lease.(b)(1) All gas (except gas unavoidably lost or used on, or for the benefitof, the lease, including that gas used off-lease for the benefit of thelease when such off-lease use is permitted by the MMS or BLM, as appropriate)produced from a Federal or Indian lease to which this subpart applies issubject to royalty.(2) When gas is used on, or for the benefit of, the lease at a productionfacility handling production from more than one lease with the approvalof MMS or BLM, as appropriate, or at a production facility handling unitizedor communitized production, only that proportionate share of each lease'sproduction (actual or allocated) necessary to operate the production facilitymay be used royalty free. (3) Where the terms of any lease are inconsistent with this subpart, thelease terms shall govern to the extent of that inconsistency.(c) If BLM determines that gas was avoidably lost or wasted from an onshorelease, or that gas was drained from an onshore lease for which compensatoryroyalty is due, or if MMS determines that gas was avoidably lost or wastedfrom an OCS lease, then the value of that gas shall be determined in accordancewith 30 CFR Part 206.(d) If a lessee receives insurance compensation for unavoidably lost gas,royalties are due on the amount of that compensation. This paragraph shallnot apply to compensation through self-insurance.(e)(1) In those instances where the lessee of any lease committed to aFederally approved unitization or communitization agreement does not actuallytake the proportionate share of the production attributable to its Federalor Indian lease under the terms of the agreement, the full share of productionattributable to the lease under the terms of the agreement nonethelessis subject to the royalty payment and reporting requirements of this title.Except as provided in paragraph (e)(2) of this section, the value for royaltypurposes of production attributable to unitized or communitized leaseswill be determined in accordance with 30 CFR Part 206. In applying therequirements of 30 CFR Part 206, the circumstances involved in the actualdisposition of the portion of the production to which the lessee was entitledbut did not take shall be considered as controlling in arriving at thevalue for royalty purposes of that portion, as if the person actually sellingor disposing of the production were the lessee of the Federal or Indianlease.(2) If a Federal or Indian lessee takes less than its proportionate shareof agreement production, upon request of the lessee MMS may authorize aroyalty valuation method different from that required by paragraph (e)(1)of this section, but consistent with the purpose of these regulations,for any volumes not taken by the lessee but for which royalties are due.(3) For purposes of this subchapter, all persons actually taking volumesin excess of their proportionate share of production in any month undera unitization or communitization agreement shall be deemed to have takenratably from all persons actually taking less than their proportionateshare of the agreement production for that month.(4) If a lessee takes less than its proportionate share of agreement productionfor any month but royalties are paid on the full volume of its proportionateshare in accordance with the provisions of this section, no additionalroyalty will be owed for that lease for prior periods at the time the lesseesubsequently takes more than its proportionate share to balance its accountor when the lessee is paid a sum of money by the other agreement participantsto balance its account.(f) For production from Federal and Indian leases which are committed tofederally-approved unitization or communitization agreements, upon requestof a lessee MMS may establish the value of production pursuant to a methodother than the method required by the regulations in this title if: (1)The proposed method for establishing value is consistent with the requirementsof the applicable statutes, lease terms and agreement terms; (2) to theextent practical, persons with an interest in the agreement, includingroyalty interests, are given notice and an opportunity to comment on theproposed valuation method before it is authorized; and (3) to the extentpractical, persons with an interest in a Federal or Indian lease committedto the agreement, including royalty interests, must agree to use the proposedmethod for valuing production from the agreement for royalty purposes.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 202.151 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Royalty on processed gas.</ITAG>(a) A royalty, as provided in the lease, shall be paid on the value of:(1) Any condensate recovered downstream of the point of royalty settlementwithout resorting to processing; and (2) residue gas and all gas plantproducts resulting from processing the gas produced from a lease subjectto this subpart. The MMS shall authorize a processing allowance for thereasonable, actual costs of processing the gas produced from Federal andIndian leases. Processing allowances shall be determined in accordancewith Subpart D of 30 CFR Part 206.(b) A reasonable amount of residue gas shall be allowed royalty free foroperation of the processing plant, but no allowance shall be made for boostingresidue gas or other expenses incidental to marketing, except as providedin 30 CFR Part 206. In those situations where a processing plant processesgas from more than one lease, only that proportionate share of each lease'sresidue gas necessary for the operation of the processing plant shall beallowed royalty free.(c) No royalty is due on residue gas, or any gas plant product resultingfrom processing gas, which is reinjected into a reservoir within the samelease, unit area, or communitized area, when the reinjection is includedin a plan of development or operations and the plan has received BLM orMMS approval for onshore or offshore operations, respectively, until suchtime as they are finally produced from the reservoir for sale or otherdisposition off-lease.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 202.152 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standards for reporting and paying royalties on gas. </ITAG>(a)(1) Gas volumes and Btu heating values, if applicable, shall be determinedunder the same degree of water saturation. Gas volumes shall be reportedin units of one thousand cubic feet (mcf), and Btu heating value shallbe reported at a rate of Btu's per cubic foot, at a standard pressure baseof 14.73 pounds per square inch absolute (psia) and a standard temperaturebase of 60 anddegrees;F, except that for OCS leases in the Gulf of Mexico,gas volumes and Btu heating values shall be reported at a standard pressurebase of 15.025 psia and a standard temperature base of 60 anddegrees;F. Gasvolumes and Btu heating values shall be reported, for royalty purposes,on the same water vapor saturated or unsaturated basis prescribed by FederalEnergy Regulatory Commission (FERC) regulation, or on the basis prescribedin the lessee's gas sales contract provided that the sales contract doesnot conflict with FERC regulation. (2) The frequency and method of Btu measurement as set forth in the lessee'scontract shall be used to determine Btu heating values for reporting purposes.However, the lessee shall measure the Btu value at least semiannually byrecognized standard industry testing methods even if the lessee's contractprovides for less frequent measurement.(b)(1) Residue gas and gas plant product volumes shall be reported as specifiedin this paragraph. (2) Carbon dioxide (CO<T2>2</T2>), nitrogen (N<T2>2</T2>), helium (He), residue gas, and any other gas marketed as aseparate product shall be reported by using the same standards specifiedin paragraph (a) of this section. (3) Natural gas liquids (NGL) volumes shall be reported in standard U.S.gallons (231 cubic inches) at 60 anddegrees;F. (4) Sulfur (S) volumes shall be reported in long tons (2,240 pounds).<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 206_PRODUCT VALUATION</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 206 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>25 U.S.C. 396 <T3>et seq.;</T3> 25 U.S.C. 396a <T3>et seq.;</T3> 25 U.S.C. 2101 <T3>et seq.;</T3> 30 U.S.C. 181 <T3>et seq.;</T3> 30 U.S.C. 351 <T3>et seq.;</T3> 30 U.S.C. 1001 <T3>et seq.;</T3> 30 U.S.C. 1701 <T3>et seq.;</T3> 43 U.S.C. 1301 <T3>et seq.;</T3> 43 U.S.C. 1331 <T3>et seq.;</T3> and 43 U.S.C. 1801 <T3>et seq.</T3></ITAG>2. A new andSection; 206.10 is added to Subpart A to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52"><T2>Subpart A_General Provisions</T2></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Information collection.</ITAG>The information collection requirements contained in 30 CFR Part 206 havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) under 44 U.S.C.3501 <T3>et seq</T3>. The forms and approved OMB clearance numbers are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>  <H1>Form No., name, and filing date </H1><H1>OMB No. </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">MMS-4109_Gas Processing Allowance Summary Report_due within 3 monthsfollowing the last day of the month for which an allowance is claimed,unless a longer period is approved by MMS. <D>1010-0075</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">MMS-4110_Oil Transportation Allowance Report_due within 3 months followingthe last day of the month for which an allowance is claimed, unless a longerperiod is approved by MMS.<D>1010-0061 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">MMS-4295_Gas Transportation Allowance Report_due within 3 months followingthe last day of the month for which an allowance is claimed unless a longerperiod is approved by MMS.<D>1010-0075</D></ITAG></ITAG>The information is being collected by the Department of the Interior tomeet its congressionally mandated accounting and audit responsibilitiesrelating to Federal and Indian mineral royalty management. The informationwill be used to determine the transportation and processing allowancesthat may be deducted from royalty payments due on Federal and Indian lands.The reports are required to receive a benefit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 206.106 and 206.107</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>3. Sections 206.106 and 206.107 are removed from Subpart C.4. Subpart D is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72"/><T2>Subpart D_Federal and Indian Gas</T2><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.150 Purpose and scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.151 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.152 Valuation standards_unprocessed gas.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.153 Valuation standards_processed gas.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.154 Determination of quantities and qualities for computing royalties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.155 Accounting for comparison.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.156 Transportation allowances_general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.157 Determination of transportation allowances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.158 Processing allowances_general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.159 Determination of processing allowances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Federal and Indian Gas </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.150 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and scope.</ITAG>(a) This subpart is applicable to all gas production from Federal and Indian(Tribal and allotted) oil and gas leases (except leases on the Osage IndianReservation). The purpose of this subpart is to establish the value ofproduction for royalty purposes consistent with the mineral leasing laws,other applicable laws and lease terms.(b) If the specific provisions of any statute, treaty, settlement agreementbetween the United States (or Indian lessor) and a lessee resulting fromadministrative or judicial litigation, or oil and gas lease subject tothe requirements of this subpart are inconsistent with any regulation inthis subpart, then the lease, statute, treaty provision or settlement agreementshall govern to the extent of that inconsistency.(c) All royalty payments made to MMS or to any Tribe or allottee are subjectto audit and adjustment.(d) The regulations in this subpart are intended to ensure that the trustresponsibilities of the United States with respect to the administrationof Indian oil and gas leases are discharged in accordance with the requirementsof the governing mineral leasing laws, treaties, and lease terms. (e)(1) Notice to Lessees 1 is terminated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"> (2) Notice to Lessees 1A is terminated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"> (3) Notice to Lessees 5 is terminated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"> (4) Notice to Lessees and Operators (NTL) on the Outer ContinentalShelf (OCS) concerning royalty payments on oil and gas lost or used onleases or units on the OCS is terminated.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.151 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>For purposes of this subpart:``Allowance'' means an approved or an MMS-initially accepted deductionin determining value for royalty purposes. ``Processing allowance'' meansan allowance for the reasonable, actual costs incurred by the lessee forprocessing gas, or an approved or MMS-initially accepted deduction forcosts of such processing, determined pursuant to this subpart. ``Transportationallowance'' means an allowance for the reasonable, actual costs incurredby the lessee for moving unprocessed gas, residue gas, or gas plant productsto a point of sale or point of delivery off the lease, unit area, communitizedarea, or away from a processing plant, excluding gathering, or an approvedor MMS-initially accepted deduction for costs of such transportation, determinedpursuant to this subpart.``Area'' means a geographic region at least as large as the defined limitsof an oil and/or gas field, in which oil and/or gas lease products havesimilar quality, economic, and legal characteristics.``Arm's length contract'' means a contract or agreement that has been arrivedat in the marketplace between independent, nonaffiliated persons with opposingeconomic interests regarding that contract. For purposes of this subpart,two persons are affiliated if one person controls, is controlled by, oris under common control with another person. For purposes of this subpart,based on the instruments of ownership of the voting securities of an entity,or based on other forms of ownership: (a) Ownership in excess of 50 percent constitutes control;(b) Ownership of 10 through 50 percent creates a presumption of control;and(c) Ownership of less than 10 percent creates a presumption of noncontrolwhich MMS may rebut if it demonstrates actual or legal control, includingthe existence of interlocking directorates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subpart, contracts betweenrelatives, either by blood or by marriage, are not arm's-length contracts.The MMS may require the lessee to certify ownership control. To be consideredarm's-length for any production month, a contract must meet the requirementsof this definition for that production month as well as when the contractwas executed.``Audit'' means a review, conducted in accordance with generally acceptedaccounting and auditing standards, of royalty payment compliance activitiesof lessees or other interest holders who pay royalties, rents, or bonuseson Federal and Indian leases.``BIA'' means the Bureau of Indian Affairs of the Department of the Interior.``BLM'' means the Bureau of Land Management of the Department of the Interior.``Compression'' means the process of raising the pressure of gas.``Condensate'' means liquid hydrocarbons (normally exceeding 40 degreesof API gravity) recovered at the surface without resorting to processing.Condensate is the mixture of liquid hydrocarbons that results from condensationof petroleum hydrocarbons existing initially in a gaseous phase in an undergroundreservoir.``Contract'' means any oral or written agreement, including amendmentsor revisions thereto, between two or more persons and enforceable by lawthat with due consideration creates an obligation.``Field'' means a geographic region situated over one or more subsurfaceoil and gas reservoirs encompassing at least the outermost boundaries ofall oil and gas accumulations known to be within those reservoirs verticallyprojected to the land surface. Onshore fields are usually given names andtheir official boundaries are often designated by oil and gas regulatoryagencies in the respective States in which the fields are located. OuterContinental Shelf (OCS) fields are named and their boundaries are designatedby MMS.``Gas'' means any fluid, either combustible or noncombustible, hydrocarbonor nonhydrocarbon, which is extracted from a reservoir and which has neitherindependent shape nor volume, but tends to expand indefinitely. It is asubstance that exists in a gaseous or rarefied state under standard temperatureand pressure conditions. ``Gas plant products'' means separate marketable elements, compounds, ormixtures, whether in liquid, gaseous, or solid form, resulting from processinggas, excluding residue gas.``Gathering'' means the movement of lease production to a central accumulationand/or treatment point on the lease, unit or communitized area, or to acentral accumulation or treatment point off the lease, unit or communitizedarea as approved by BLM or MMS OCS operations personnel for onshore andOCS leases, respectively.``Gross proceeds'' (for royalty payment purposes) means the total moniesand other consideration accruing to an oil and gas lessee for the dispositionof unprocessed gas, residue gas, or gas plant products. Gross proceedsincludes, but is not limited to, payments to the lessee for certain servicessuch as compression, dehydration, measurement, and/or field gathering tothe extent that the lessee is obligated to perform them at no cost to theFederal Government or Indian lessor, and payments for gas processing rights.Gross proceeds, as applied to gas, also includes but is not limited to:Take-or-pay payments; reimbursements for severance taxes; and other reimbursements.Tax reimbursements are part of the gross proceeds accruing to a lesseeeven though the Federal or Indian royalty interest may be exempt from taxation.Payments or credits for advanced exploration or development costs or prepaidreserve payments that are subject to recoupment through credits againstthe purchase price or through reduced prices in later sales and which aremade before production commences become part of gross proceeds as of thetime of first production. Monies and other consideration, including theforms of consideration identified in this paragraph, to which a lesseeis contractually or legally entitled but which it does not seek to collectthrough reasonable efforts are also part of gross proceeds.``Indian allottee'' means any Indian for whom land or an interest in landis held in trust by the United States or who holds title subject to Federalrestriction against alienation.``Indian Tribe'' means any Indian Tribe, band, nation, pueblo, community,rancheria, colony, or other group of Indians for which any land or interestin land is held in trust by the United States or which is subject to Federalrestriction against alienation.``Lease'' means any contract, profit-share arrangement, joint venture,or other agreement issued or approved by the United States under a mineralleasing law that authorizes exploration for, development or extractionof, or removal of lease products_or the land area covered by that authorization,whichever is required by the context.``Lease products'' means any leased minerals attributable to, originatingfrom, or allocated to Outer Continental Shelf or onshore Federal or Indianleases.``Lessee'' means any person to whom the United States, an Indian Tribe,or an Indian allottee issues a lease, and any person who has been assignedan obligation to make royalty or other payments required by the lease.This includes any person who has an interest in a lease as well as an operatoror payor who has no interest in the lease but who has assumed the royaltypayment responsibility. ``Like-quality lease products'' means lease products which have similarchemical, physical, and legal characteristics.``Marketable condition'' means lease products which are sufficiently freefrom impurities and otherwise in a condition that they will be acceptedby a purchaser under a sales contract typical for the field or area.``Marketing affiliate'' means an affiliate of the lessee whose functionis to acquire only the lessee's production and to market that production.``Minimum royalty'' means that minimum amount of annual royalty that thelessee must pay as specified in the lease or in applicable leasing regulations.``Net-back method'' (or work-back method) means a method for calculatingmarket value of gas at the lease. Under this method, costs of transportation,processing, or manufacturing are deducted from the proceeds received forthe gas, residue gas or gas plant products, and any extracted, processed,or manufactured products, or from the value of the gas, residue gas orgas plant products, and any extracted, processed, or manufactured products,at the first point at which reasonable values for any such products maybe determined by a sale pursuant to an arm's-length contract or comparisonto other sales of such products, to ascertain value at the lease.``Net output'' means the quantity of residue gas and each gas plant productthat a processing plant produces. ``Net profit share'' (for applicable Federal and Indian leases) means thespecified share of the net profit from production of oil and gas as providedin the agreement.``Outer Continental Shelf (OCS'') means all submerged lands lying seawardand outside of the area of land beneath navigable waters as defined insection 2 of the Submerged Lands Act (43 U.S.C. 1301) and of which thesubsoil and seabed appertain to the United States and are subject to itsjurisdiction and control.``Person'' means any individual, firm, corporation, association, partnership,consortium, or joint venture (when established as a separate entity).``Posted price'' means the price, net of all adjustments for quality andlocation, specified in publicly available price bulletins or other pricenotices available as part of normal business operations for quantitiesof unprocessed gas, residue gas, or gas plant products in marketable condition.``Processing'' means any process designed to remove elements or compounds(hydrocarbon and nonhydrocarbon) from gas, including absorption, adsorption,or refrigeration. Field processes which normally take place on or nearthe lease, such as natural pressure reduction, mechanical separation, heating,cooling, dehydration, and compression, are not considered processing. Thechanging of pressures and/or temperatures in a reservoir is not consideredprocessing.``Residue gas'' means that hydrocarbon gas consisting principally of methaneresulting from processing gas. ``Section 6 lease'' means an OCS lease subject to section 6 of the OuterContinental Shelf Lands Act, as amended, 43 U.S.C. 1335.``Selling arrangement'' means the individual contractual arrangements underwhich sales or dispositions of gas, residue gas and gas plant productsare made. Selling arrangements are described by illustration in the MMSRoyalty Management Program Oil and Gas Payor Handbook.``Spot sales agreement'' means a contract wherein a seller agrees to sellto a buyer a specified amount of unprocessed gas, residue gas, or gas plantproducts at a specified price over a fixed period, usually of short duration,which does not normally require a cancellation notice to terminate, andwhich does not contain an obligation, nor imply an intent, to continuein subsequent periods.``Warranty contract'' means a long-term contract entered into prior to1970, including any amendments thereto, for the sale of gas wherein theproducer agrees to sell a specific amount of gas and the gas deliveredin satisfaction of this obligation may come from fields or sources outsideof the designated fields.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.152</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Valuation standards_unprocessed gas.</ITAG>(a)(1) This section applies to the valuation of all gas that is not processedand all gas that is processed but is sold or otherwise disposed of by thelessee pursuant to an arm's-length contract prior to processing. Wherethe lessee's contract includes a reservation of the right to process thegas and the lessee exercises that right, or where the lessee's contractfor the sale of gas prior to processing provides for the value to be determinedbased upon a percentage of the purchaser's proceeds resulting from processingthe gas, andSection; 206.153 shall apply instead of this section. This sectionalso applies to processed gas which must be valued prior to processingin accordance with andSection; 206.155. (2) The value of production, for royalty purposes, of gas subject to thissubpart shall be the value of gas determined pursuant to this section lessapplicable allowances determined pursuant to this subpart.(3)(i) For any Indian leases which provide that the Secretary may considerthe highest price paid or offered for a major portion of production (majorportion) in determining value of production for royalty purposes, if dataare available to compute a major portion MMS will, where practicable, comparethe value determined in accordance with this section with the major portion.The value to be used in determining the value of production for royaltypurposes shall be the higher of those two values.(ii) For purposes of this paragraph, major portion means the highest pricepaid or offered at the time of production for the major portion of gasproduction from the same field. The major portion will be calculated usinglike-quality gas sold under arm's-length contracts from the same field(or, if necessary to obtain a reasonable sample, from the same area) foreach month. All such sales will be arrayed from highest price to lowestprice (at the bottom). The major portion is that price at which 50 percent(by volume) plus 1 mcf of the gas (starting from the bottom) is sold.(b)(1)(i) The value of gas which is sold pursuant to an arm's-length contractshall be the gross proceeds accruing to the lessee, except as providedin paragraphs (b)(1)(ii) and (b)(1)(iii) of this section. The lessee shallhave the burden of demonstrating that its contract is arm's-length. Thevalue which the lessee reports, for royalty purposes, is subject to monitoring,review, and audit. For purposes of this section, gas which is sold or otherwisetransferred to the lessee's marketing affiliate and then sold by the marketingaffiliate pursuant to an arm's-length contract shall be valued in accordancewith this paragraph based upon the sale by the marketing affiliate.(ii) In conducting reviews and audits, MMS will examine whether the contractreflects the total consideration actually transferred either directly orindirectly from the buyer to the seller for the gas. If the contract doesnot reflect the total consideration, then the MMS may require that thegas sold pursuant to that contract be valued in accordance with paragraph(c) of this section. Value may not be less than the gross proceeds accruingto the lessee, including the additional consideration.(iii) If the MMS determines that the gross proceeds accruing to the lesseepursuant to an arm's-length contract do not reflect the reasonable valueof the production because of misconduct by or between the contracting parties,or because the lessee otherwise has breached its duty to the lessor tomarket the production for the mutual benefit of the lessee and the lessor,then MMS shall require that the gas production be valued pursuant to paragraphs(c)(2) or (c)(3) of this section, and in accordance with the notificationrequirements of paragraph (e) of this section. When MMS determines thatthe value may be unreasonable, MMS will notify the lessee and give thelessee an opportunity to provide written information justifying the lessee'svalue.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b)(1) of this section,the value of gas sold pursuant to a warranty contract shall be determinedby MMS, and due consideration will be given to all valuation criteria specifiedin this section. The lessee must request a value determination in accordancewith paragraph (g) of this section for gas sold pursuant to a warrantycontract; provided, however, that any value determination for a warrantycontract in effect on the effective date of these regulations shall remainin effect until modified by MMS.(3) MMS may require a lessee to certify that its arm's-length contractprovisions include all of the consideration to be paid by the buyer, eitherdirectly or indirectly, for the gas.(c) The value of gas subject to this section which is not sold pursuantto an arm's-length contract shall be the reasonable value determined inaccordance with the first applicable of the following methods: (1) The gross proceeds accruing to the lessee pursuant to a sale underits non-arm's-length contract (or other disposition other than by an arm's-lengthcontract), provided that those gross proceeds are equivalent to the grossproceeds derived from, or paid under, comparable arm's-length contractsfor purchases, sales, or other dispositions of like-quality gas in thesame field (or, if necessary to obtain a reasonable sample, from the samearea). In evaluating the comparability of arm's-length contracts for thepurposes of these regulations, the following factors shall be considered:price, time of execution, duration, market or markets served, terms, qualityof gas, volume, and such other factors as may be appropriate to reflectthe value of the gas;(2) A value determined by consideration of other information relevant invaluing like-quality gas, including gross proceeds under arm's-length contractsfor like-quality gas in the same field or nearby fields or areas, postedprices for gas, prices received in arm's-length spot sales of gas, otherreliable public sources of price or market information, and other informationas to the particular lease operation or the saleability of the gas; or(3) A net-back method or any other reasonable method to determine value.(d)(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, except paragraph(h) of this section, if the maximum price permitted by Federal law at whichgas may be sold is less than the value determined pursuant to this section,then MMS shall accept such maximum price as the value. For purposes ofthis section, price limitations set by any State or local government shallnot be considered as a maximum price permitted by Federal law.(2) The limitation prescribed in paragraph (d)(1) of this section shallnot apply to gas sold pursuant to a warranty contract and valued pursuantto paragraph (b)(2) of this section.(e)(1) Where the value is determined pursuant to paragraph (c) of thissection, the lessee shall retain all data relevant to the determinationof royalty value. Such data shall be subject to review and audit, and MMSwill direct a lessee to use a different value if it determines that thereported value is inconsistent with the requirements of these regulations.(2) Any Federal or Indian lessee will make available upon request to theauthorized MMS, State, or Indian representatives, to the Office of theInspector General of the Department of the Interior, or other person authorizedto receive such information, arm's-length sales and volume data for like-qualityproduction sold, purchased or otherwise obtained by the lessee from thefield or area or from nearby fields or areas.(3) A lessee shall notify MMS if it has determined value pursuant to paragraph(c)(2) or (c)(3) of this section. The notification shall be by letter tothe MMS Associate Director for Royalty Management or his/her designee.The letter shall identify the valuation method to be used and contain abrief description of the procedure to be followed. The notification requiredby this paragraph is a one-time notification due no later than the endof the month following the month the lessee first reports royalties ona Form MMS-2014 using a valuation method authorized by paragraph (c)(2)or (c)(3) of this section, and each time there is a change in a methodunder paragraph (c)(2) or (c)(3) of this section.(f) If MMS determines that a lessee has not properly determined value,the lessee shall pay the difference, if any, between royalty payments madebased upon the value it has used and the royalty payments that are duebased upon the value established by MMS. The lessee shall also pay intereston that difference computed pursuant to 30 CFR 218.54. If the lessee isentitled to a credit, MMS will provide instructions for the taking of thatcredit. (g) The lessee may request a value determination from MMS. In that event,the lessee shall propose to MMS a value determination method, and may usethat method in determining value for royalty purposes until MMS issuesits decision. The lessee shall submit all available data relevant to itsproposal. The MMS shall expeditiously determine the value based upon thelessee's proposal and any additional information MMS deems necessary. Inmaking a value determination MMS may use any of the valuation criteriaauthorized by this subpart. That determination shall remain effective forthe period stated therein. After MMS issues its determination, the lesseeshall make the adjustments in accordance with paragraph (f) of this section.(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, under no circumstancesshall the value of production for royalty purposes be less than the grossproceeds accruing to the lessee for lease production, less applicable allowancesdetermined pursuant to this subpart.(i) The lessee is required to place gas in marketable condition at no costto the Federal Government or Indian lessor unless otherwise provided inthe lease agreement. Where the value established pursuant to this sectionis determined by a lessee's gross proceeds, that value shall be increasedto the extent that the gross proceeds have been reduced because the purchaser,or any other person, is providing certain services the cost of which ordinarilyis the responsibility of the lessee to place the gas in marketable condition.(j) Value shall be based on the highest price a prudent lessee can receivethrough legally enforceable claims under its contract. If there is no contractrevision or amendment, and the lessee fails to take proper or timely actionto receive prices or benefits to which it is entitled, it must pay royaltyat a value based upon that obtainable price or benefit. Contract revisionsor amendments shall be in writing and signed by all parties to an arm's-lengthcontract. If the lessee makes timely application for a price increase orbenefit allowed under its contract but the purchaser refuses, and the lesseetakes reasonable measures, which are documented, to force purchaser compliance,the lessee will owe no additional royalties unless or until monies or considerationresulting from the price increase or additional benefits are received.This paragraph shall not be construed to permit a lessee to avoid its royaltypayment obligation in situations where a purchaser fails to pay, in wholeor in part or timely, for a quantity of gas.(k) Notwithstanding any provision in these regulations to the contrary,no review, reconciliation, monitoring, or other like process that resultsin a redetermination by the MMS of value under this section shall be consideredfinal or binding as against the Federal Government, its beneficiaries,the Indian Tribes, or allottees until the audit period is formally closed.(l) Certain information submitted to MMS to support valuation proposals,including transportation or extraordinary cost allowances, is exemptedfrom disclosure by the Freedom of Information Act, 5 U.S.C. 552, or otherFederal Law. Any data specified by law to be privileged, confidential,or otherwise exempt will be maintained in a confidential manner in accordancewith applicable law and regulations. All requests for information aboutdeterminations made under this subpart are to be submitted in accordancewith the Freedom of Information Act regulation of the Department of theInterior, 43 CFR Part 2. Nothing in this section is intended to limit ordiminish in any manner whatsoever the right of an Indian lessor to obtainany and all information as such lessor may be lawfully entitled from MMSor such lessor's lessee directly under the terms of the lease, 30 U.S.C.1733, or other applicable law.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.153 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Valuation standards_processed gas.</ITAG>(a)(1) This section applies to the valuation of all gas that is processedby the lessee and any other gas production to which this subpart appliesand that is not subject to the valuation provisions of andSection; 206.152of this subpart. This section applies where the lessee's contract includesa reservation of the right to process the gas and the lessee exercisesthat right, or where the lessee's contract for the sale of gas prior toprocessing provides for the value to be determined based upon a percentageof the purchaser's proceeds resulting from processing the gas (in whichevent these regulations will apply to determine value as if the personactually selling or disposing of the residue gas or gas plant productswere the lessee of the Federal or Indian lease).(2) The value of production, for royalty purposes, of gas subject to thissection shall be the combined value of the residue gas and all gas plantproducts determined pursuant to this section, plus the value of any condensaterecovered downstream of the point of royalty settlement without resortingto processing determined pursuant to andSection; 206.102 of this part, lessapplicable transportation allowances and processing allowances determinedpursuant to this subpart.(3)(i) For any Indian leases which provide that the Secretary may considerthe highest price paid or offered for a major portion of production (majorportion) in determining value for royalty purposes, if data are availableto compute a major portion MMS will, where practicable, compare the valuesdetermined in accordance with this section for any lease product with themajor portion determined for that lease product. The value to be used indetermining the value of production for royalty purposes shall be the higherof those two values. (ii) For purposes of this paragraph, major portion means the highest pricepaid or offered at the time of production for the major portion of gasproduction from the same field, or for residue gas or gas plant productsfrom the same processing plant, as applicable. The major portion will becalculated using like-quality lease products sold under arm's-length contractsfrom the same field or processing plant (or, if necessary to obtain a reasonablesample, from the same area or nearby processing plants) for each month.All such sales will be arrayed from highest price to lowest price (at thebottom). The major portion is that price at which 50 percent (by volume)plus 1 mcf of the gas (starting from the bottom) is sold, or for gas plantproducts, 50 percent (by volume) plus 1 unit.(b)(1)(i) The value of the residue gas or any gas plant product which issold pursuant to an arm's-length contract shall be the gross proceeds accruingto the lessee, except as provided in paragraphs (b)(1)(ii) and (b)(1)(iii)of this section. The lessee shall have the burden of demonstrating thatits contract is arm's-length. The value that the lessee reports for royaltypurposes is subject to monitoring, review, and audit. For purposes of thissection, residue gas or any gas plant product which is sold or otherwisetransferred to the lessee's marketing affiliate and then sold by the marketingaffiliate pursuant to an arm's-length contract shall be valued in accordancewith this paragraph based upon the sale by the marketing affiliate.(ii) In conducting these reviews and audits, MMS will examine whether ornot the contract reflects the total consideration actually transferredeither directly or indirectly from the buyer to the seller for the residuegas or gas plant product. If the contract does not reflect the total consideration,then the MMS may require that the residue gas or gas plant product soldpursuant to that contract be valued in accordance with paragraph (c) ofthis section. Value may not be less than the gross proceeds accruing tothe lessee, including the additional consideration.(iii) If the MMS determines that the gross proceeds accruing to the lesseepursuant to an arm's-length contract do not reflect the reasonable valueof the residue gas or gas plant product because of misconduct by or betweenthe contracting parties, or because the lessee otherwise has breached itsduty to the lessor to market the production for the mutual benefit of thelessee and the lessor, then MMS shall require that the residue gas or gasplant product be valued pursuant to paragraphs (c)(2) or (c)(3) of thissection, and in accordance with the notification requirements of paragraph(e) of this section. When MMS determines that the value may be unreasonable,MMS will notify the lessee and give the lessee an opportunity to providewritten information justifying the lessee's value.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b)(1) of this section,the value of residue gas sold pursuant to a warranty contract shall bedetermined by MMS, and due consideration will be given to all valuationcriteria specified in this section. The lessee must request a value determinationin accordance with paragraph (g) of this section for gas sold pursuantto a warranty contract; provided, however, that any value determinationfor a warranty contract in effect on the effective date of these regulationsshall remain in effect until modified by MMS. (3) MMS may require a lessee to certify that its arm's-length contractprovisions include all of the consideration to be paid by the buyer, eitherdirectly or indirectly, for the residue gas or gas plant product.(c) The value of residue gas or any gas plant product which is not soldpursuant to an arm's-length contract shall be the reasonable value determinedin accordance with the first applicable of the following methods:(1) The gross proceeds accruing to the lessee pursuant to a sale underits non-arm's-length contract (or other disposition other than by an arm's-lengthcontract), provided that those gross proceeds are equivalent to the grossproceeds derived from, or paid under, comparable arm's-length contractsfor purchases, sales, or other dispositions of like quality residue gasor gas plant products from the same processing plant (or, if necessaryto obtain a reasonable sample, from nearby plants). In evaluating the comparabilityof arm's-length contracts for the purposes of these regulations, the followingfactors shall be considered: price, time of execution, duration, marketor markets served, terms, quality of residue gas or gas plant products,volume, and such other factors as may be appropriate to reflect the valueof the residue gas or gas plant products; (2) A value determined by consideration of other information relevant invaluing like-quality residue gas or gas plant products, including grossproceeds under arm's-length contracts for like-quality residue gas or gasplant products from the same gas plant or other nearby processing plants,posted prices for residue gas or gas plant products, prices received inspot sales of residue gas or gas plant products, other reliable publicsources of price or market information, and other information as to theparticular lease operation or the saleability of such residue gas or gasplant products; or(3) A net-back method or any other reasonable method to determine value.(d)(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, except paragraph(h) of this section, if the maximum price permitted by Federal law at whichany residue gas or gas plant products may be sold is less than the valuedetermined pursuant to this section, then MMS shall accept such maximumprice as the value. For the purposes of this section, price limitationsset by any State or local government shall not be considered as a maximumprice permitted by Federal law.(2) The limitation prescribed by paragraph (d)(1) of this section shallnot apply to residue gas sold pursuant to a warranty contract and valuedpursuant to paragraph (b)(2) of this section.(e)(1) Where the value is determined pursuant to paragraph (c) of thissection, the lessee shall retain all data relevant to the determinationof royalty value. Such data shall be subject to review and audit, and MMSwill direct a lessee to use a different value if it determines upon reviewor audit that the reported value is inconsistent with the requirementsof these regulations.(2) Any Federal or Indian lessee will make available upon request to theauthorized MMS, State, or Indian representatives, to the Office of theInspector General of the Department of the Interior, or other persons authorizedto receive such information, arm's-length sales and volume data for like-qualityresidue gas and gas plant products sold, purchased or otherwise obtainedby the lessee from the same processing plant or from nearby processingplants.(3) A lessee shall notify MMS if it has determined any value pursuant toparagraph (c)(2) or (c)(3) of this section. The notification shall be byletter to the MMS Associate Director for Royalty Management or his/herdesignee. The letter shall identify the valuation method to be used andcontain a brief description of the procedure to be followed. The notificationrequired by this paragraph is a one-time notification due no later thanthe end of the month following the month the lessee first reports royaltieson a Form MMS-2014 using a valuation method authorized by paragraph (c)(2)or (c)(3) of this section, and each time there is a change in a methodunder paragraph (c)(2) or (c)(3) of this section.(f) If MMS determines that a lessee has not properly determined value,the lessee shall pay the difference, if any, between royalty payments madebased upon the value it has used and the royalty payments that are duebased upon the value established by MMS. The lessee shall also pay interestcomputed on that difference pursuant to 30 CFR 218.54. If the lessee isentitled to a credit, MMS will provide instructions for the taking of thatcredit. (g) The lessee may request a value determination from MMS. In that event,the lessee shall propose to MMS a value determination method, and may usethat method in determining value for royalty purposes until MMS issuesits decision. The lessee shall submit all available data relevant to itsproposal. The MMS shall expeditiously determine the value based upon thelessee's proposal and any additional information MMS deems necessary. Inmaking a value determination, MMS may use any of the valuation criteriaauthorized by this subpart. That determination shall remain effective forthe period stated therein. After MMS issues its determination, the lesseeshall make the adjustments in accordance with paragraph (f) of this section.(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, under no circumstancesshall the value of production for royalty purposes be less than the grossproceeds accruing to the lessee for residue gas and/or any gas plant products,less applicable transportation allowances and processing allowances determinedpursuant to this subpart.(i) The lessee is required to place residue gas and gas plant productsin marketable condition at no cost to the Federal Government or Indianlessor unless otherwise provided in the lease agreement. Where the valueestablished pursuant to this section is determined by a lessee's grossproceeds, that value shall be increased to the extent that the gross proceedshave been reduced because the purchaser, or any other person, is providingcertain services the cost of which ordinarily is the responsibility ofthe lessee to place the residue gas or gas plant products in marketablecondition.(j) Value shall be based on the highest price a prudent lessee can receivethrough legally enforceable claims under its contract. Absent contractrevision or amendment, if the lessee fails to take proper or timely actionto receive prices or benefits to which it is entitled it must pay royaltyat a value based upon that obtainable price or benefit. Contract revisionsor amendments shall be in writing and signed by all parties to an arm's-lengthcontract. If the lessee makes timely application for a price increase orbenefit allowed under its contract but the purchaser refuses, and the lesseetakes reasonable measures, which are documented, to force purchaser compliance,the lessee will owe no additional royalties unless or until monies or considerationresulting from the price increase or additional benefits are received.This paragraph shall not be construed to permit a lessee to avoid its royaltypayment obligation in situations where a purchaser fails to pay, in wholeor in part, or timely, for a quantity of residue gas or gas plant product.(k) Notwithstanding any provision in these regulations to the contrary,no review, reconciliation, monitoring, or other like process that resultsin a redetermination by MMS of value under this section shall be consideredfinal or binding against the Federal Government, its beneficiaries, theIndian Tribes, or allottees, until the audit period is formally closed.(l) Certain information submitted to MMS to support valuation proposals,including transportation allowances, processing allowances or extraordinarycost allowances, is exempted from disclosure by the Freedom of InformationAct, 5 U.S.C. 552, or other Federal law. Any data specified by law to beprivileged, confidential, or otherwise exempt, will be maintained in aconfidential manner in accordance with applicable law and regulations.All requests for information about determinations made under this Partare to be submitted in accordance with the Freedom of Information Act regulationof the Department of the Interior, 43 CFR Part 2. Nothing in this sectionis intended to limit or diminish in any manner whatsoever the right ofan Indian lessor to obtain any and all information as such lessor may belawfully entitled from the MMS or such lessor's lessee directly under theterms of the lease, 30 U.S.C. 1733, or other applicable law.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.154 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determination of quantities and qualities for computing royalties.</ITAG>(a)(1) Royalties shall be computed on the basis of the quantity and qualityof unprocessed gas at the point of royalty settlement approved by BLM orMMS for onshore and OCS leases, respectively.(2) If the value of gas determined pursuant to andSection; 206.152 of thissubpart is based upon a quantity and/or quality that is different fromthe quantity and/or quality at the point of royalty settlement, as approvedby BLM or MMS, that value shall be adjusted for the differences in quantityand/or quality.(b)(1) For residue gas and gas plant products, the quantity basis for computingroyalties due is the monthly net output of the plant even though residuegas and/or gas plant products may be in temporary storage. (2) If the value of residue gas and/or gas plant products determined pursuantto andSection; 206.153 of this subpart is based upon a quantity and/or qualityof residue gas and/or gas plant products that is different from that whichis attributable to a lease, determined in accordance with paragraph (c)of this section, that value shall be adjusted for the differences in quantityand/or quality.(c) The quantity of the residue gas and gas plant products attributableto a lease shall be determined according to the following procedure:(1) When the net output of the processing plant is derived from gas obtainedfrom only one lease, the quantity of the residue gas and gas plant productson which computations of royalty are based is the net output of the plant.(2) When the net output of a processing plant is derived from gas obtainedfrom more than one lease producing gas of uniform content, the quantityof the residue gas and gas plant products allocable to each lease shallbe in the same proportions as the ratios obtained by dividing the amountof gas delivered to the plant from each lease by the total amount of gasdelivered from all leases.(3) When the net output of a processing plant is derived from gas obtainedfrom more than one lease producing gas of nonuniform content, the quantityof the residue gas allocable to each lease will be determined by multiplyingthe amount of gas delivered to the plant from the lease by the residuegas content of the gas, and dividing the arithmetical product thus obtainedby the sum of the similar arithmetical products separately obtained forall leases from which gas is delivered to the plant, and then multiplyingthe net output of the residue gas by the arithmetic quotient obtained.The net output of gas plant products allocable to each lease will be determinedby multiplying the amount of gas delivered to the plant from the leaseby the gas plant product content of the gas, and dividing the arithmeticalproduct thus obtained by the sum of the similar arithmetical products separatelyobtained for all leases from which gas is delivered to the plant, and thenmultiplying the net output of each gas plant product by the arithmeticquotient obtained.(4) A lessee may request MMS approval of other methods for determiningthe quantity of residue gas and gas plant products allocable to each lease.If approved, such method will be applicable to all gas production fromFederal and Indian leases that is processed in the same plant.(d)(1) No deductions may be made from the royalty volume or royalty valuefor actual or theoretical losses. Any actual loss of unprocessed gas thatmay be sustained prior to the royalty settlement metering or measurementpoint will not be subject to royalty provided that such loss is determinedto have been unavoidable by BLM or MMS, as appropriate.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (d)(1) of this section and 30 CFR 202.151(c),royalties are due on 100 percent of the volume determined in accordancewith paragraphs (a) through (c) of this section. There can be no reductionin that determined volume for actual losses after the quantity basis hasbeen determined or for theoretical losses that are claimed to have takenplace. Royalties are due on 100 percent of the value of the unprocessedgas, residue gas, and/or gas plant products as provided in this subpart,less applicable allowances. There can be no deduction from the value ofthe unprocessed gas, residue gas, and/or gas plant products to compensatefor actual losses after the quantity basis has been determined, or fortheoretical losses that are claimed to have taken place.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.155</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Accounting for comparison.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, where the lessee(or a person to whom the lessee has transferred gas pursuant to a non-arm's-lengthcontract or without a contract) processes the lessee's gas and after processingthe gas the residue gas is not sold pursuant to an arm's-length contract,the value, for royalty purposes, shall be the greater of (1) the combinedvalue, for royalty purposes, of the residue gas and gas plant productsresulting from processing the gas determined pursuant to andSection; 206.153of this subpart, plus the value, for royalty purposes, of any condensaterecovered downstream of the point of royalty settlement without resortingto processing determined pursuant to andSection; 206.102 of this subpart;or (2) the value, for royalty purposes, of the gas prior to processingdetermined in accordance with andSection; 206.152 of this subpart.(b) The requirement for accounting for comparison contained in the termsof leases, particularly Indian leases, will govern as provided in andSection;206.150(b) of this subpart. When accounting for comparison is requiredby the lease terms, such accounting for comparison shall be determinedin accordance with paragraph (a) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.156</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Transportation allowances_general.</ITAG>(a) Where the value of gas has been determined pursuant to andSection; 206.152or andSection; 206.153 of this subpart at a point (e.g., sales point or pointof value determination) off the lease, MMS shall allow a deduction forthe reasonable actual costs incurred by the lessee to transport unprocessedgas, residue gas, and gas plant products from a lease to a point off thelease including, if appropriate, transportation from the lease to a gasprocessing plant off the lease and from the plant to a point away fromthe plant.(b) Transportation costs must be allocated among all products producedand transported as provided in andSection; 206.157.(c)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(3) of this section, for unprocessedgas valued in accordance with andSection; 206.152 of this subpart, the transportationallowance deduction on the basis of a selling arrangement shall not exceed50 percent of the value of the unprocessed gas determined in accordancewith andSection; 206.152 of this subpart. (2) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(3) of this section, for gas productionvalued in accordance with andSection; 206.153 of this subpart the transportationallowance deduction on the basis of a selling arrangement shall not exceed50 percent of the value of the residue gas or gas plant product determinedin accordance with andSection; 206.153 of this subpart. For purposes of thissection, natural gas liquids shall be considered one product.(3) Upon request of a lessee, MMS may approve a transportation allowancededuction in excess of the limitations prescribed by paragraphs (c)(1)and (c)(2) of this section. The lessee must demonstrate that the transportationcosts incurred in excess of the limitations prescribed in paragraphs (c)(1)and (c)(2) of this section were reasonable, actual, and necessary. An applicationfor exception shall contain all relevant and supporting documentation necessaryfor the MMS to make a determination. Under no circumstances shall the valuefor royalty purposes under any selling arrangement be reduced to zero.(d) If, after a review and/or audit, MMS determines that a lessee has improperlydetermined a transportation allowance authorized by this subpart, thenthe lessee shall pay any additional royalties, plus interest, determinedin accordance with 30 CFR 218.54, or shall be entitled to a credit, withoutinterest.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.157</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determination of transportation allowances.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Arm's-length transportation contracts.</T3> (1)(i) For transportationcosts incurred by a lessee pursuant to an arm's-length contract, the transportationallowance shall be the reasonable, actual costs incurred by the lesseefor transporting the unprocessed gas, residue gas and/or gas plant productsunder that contract, except as provided in paragraphs (a)(1)(ii) and (a)(1)(iii)of this section, subject to monitoring, review, audit, and adjustment.The lessee shall have the burden of demonstrating that its contract isarm's-length. Such allowances shall be subject to the provisions of paragraph(f) of this section. Before any deduction may be taken, the lessee mustsubmit a completed page one of Form MMS-4295 (and Schedule 1), Gas TransportationAllowance Report, in accordance with paragraph (c)(1) of this section.A transportation allowance may be claimed retroactively for a period ofnot more than 3 months prior to the first day of the month that Form MMS-4295is filed with MMS, unless MMS approves a longer period upon a showing ofgood cause by the lessee.(ii) In conducting reviews and audits, MMS will examine whether or notthe contract reflects more than the consideration actually transferredeither directly or indirectly from the lessee to the transporter for thetransportation. If the contract reflects more than the total consideration,then the MMS may require that the transportation allowance be determinedin accordance with paragraph (b) of this section.(iii) If the MMS determines that the consideration paid pursuant to anarm's-length transportation contract does not reflect the reasonable valueof the transportation because of misconduct by or between the contractingparties, or because the lessee otherwise has breached its duty to the lessorto market the production for the mutual benefit of the lessee and the lessor,then MMS shall require that the transportation allowance be determinedin accordance with paragraph (b) of this section. When MMS determines thatthe value of the transportation may be unreasonable, MMS will notify thelessee and give the lessee an opportunity to provide written informationjustifying the lessee's transportation costs. (2)(i) If an arm's-length transportation contract includes more than oneproduct in a gaseous phase and the transportation costs attributable toeach product cannot be determined from the contract, the total transportationcosts shall be allocated in a consistent and equitable manner to each ofthe products transported in the same proportion as the ratio of the volumeof each product (excluding waste products which have no value) to the volumeof all products in the gaseous phase (excluding waste products which haveno value). Except as provided in this paragraph, no allowance may be takenfor the costs of transporting lease production which is not royalty bearingwithout MMS approval.(ii) Notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (i), the lessee maypropose to MMS a cost allocation method on the basis of the values of theproducts transported. MMS shall approve the method unless it determinesthat it is not consistent with the purposes of the regulations in thispart.(3) If an arm's-length transportation contract includes both gaseous andliquid products and the transportation costs attributable to each cannotbe determined from the contract, the lessee shall propose an allocationprocedure to MMS. The lessee may use the transportation allowance determinedin accordance with its proposed allocation procedure until MMS issues itsdetermination on the acceptability of the cost allocation. The lessee shallsubmit all relevant data to support its proposal. The initial proposalmust be submitted by June 30, 1988, or within 3 months after the last dayof the month for which the lessee requests a transportation allowance,whichever is later (unless MMS approves a longer period). The MMS shallthen determine the gas transportation allowance based upon the lessee'sproposal and any additional information MMS deems necessary.(4) Where the lessee's payments for transportation under an arm's-lengthcontract are not based on a dollar per unit, the lessee shall convert whateverconsideration is paid to a dollar value equivalent for the purposes ofthis section.(5) Where an arm's-length sales contract price or a posted price includesa provision whereby the listed price is reduced by a transportation factor,MMS will not consider the transportation factor to be a transportationallowance. The transportation factor may be used in determining the lessee'sgross proceeds for the sale of the product. The transportation factor maynot exceed 50 percent of the base price of the product without MMS approval.(b)<T3> Non-arm's-length or no contract.</T3> (1) If a lessee has a non-arm's-lengthtransportation contract or has no contract, including those situationswhere the lessee performs transportation services for itself, the transportationallowance will be based upon the lessee's reasonable actual costs as providedin this paragraph. All transportation allowances deducted under a non-arm's-lengthor no contract situation are subject to monitoring, review, audit, andadjustment. Before any estimated or actual deduction may be taken, thelessee must submit a completed Form MMS-4295 in accordance with paragraph(c)(2) of this section. A transportation allowance may be claimed retroactivelyfor a period of not more than 3 months prior to the first day of the monththat Form MMS-4295 is filed with MMS, unless MMS approves a longer periodupon a showing of good cause by the lessee. The MMS will monitor the allowancedeductions to ensure that deductions are reasonable and allowable. Whennecessary or appropriate, MMS may direct a lessee to modify its estimatedor actual transportation allowance deduction.(2) The transportation allowance for non-arm's-length or no-contract situationsshall be based upon the lessee's actual costs for transportation duringthe reporting period, including operating and maintenance expenses, overhead,and either depreciation and a return on undepreciated capital investmentin accordance with paragraph (b)(2)(iv)(A) of this section, or a cost equalto the initial depreciable investment in the transportation system multipliedby a rate of return in accordance with paragraph (b)(2)(iv)(B) of thissection. Allowable capital costs are generally those costs for depreciablefixed assets (including costs of delivery and installation of capital equipment)which are an integral part of the transportation system.(i) Allowable operating expenses include: Operations supervision and engineering;operations labor; fuel; utilities; materials; ad valorem property taxes;rent; supplies; and any other directly allocable and attributable operatingexpense which the lessee can document.(ii) Allowable maintenance expenses include: Maintenance of the transportationsystem; maintenance of equipment; maintenance labor; and other directlyallocable and attributable maintenance expenses which the lessee can document.(iii) Overhead directly attributable and allocable to the operation andmaintenance of the transportation system is an allowable expense. Stateand Federal income taxes and severance taxes and other fees, includingroyalties, are not allowable expenses.(iv) A lessee may use either depreciation or a return on depreciable capitalinvestment. After a lessee has elected to use either method for a transportationsystem, the lessee may not later elect to change to the other alternativewithout approval of the MMS.(A) To compute depreciation, the lessee may elect to use either a straight-linedepreciation method based on the life of equipment or on the life of thereserves which the transportation system services, or a unit of productionmethod. After an election is made, the lessee may not change methods withoutMMS approval. A change in ownership of a transportation system shall notalter the depreciation schedule established by the original transporter/lesseefor purposes of the allowance calculation. With or without a change inownership, a transportation system shall be depreciated only once. Equipmentshall not be depreciated below a reasonable salvage value.(B) The MMS shall allow as a cost an amount equal to the allowable initialcapital investment in the transportation system multiplied by the rateof return determined pursuant to paragraph (b)(2)(v) of this section. Noallowance shall be provided for depreciation. This alternative shall applyonly to transportation facilities first placed in service after March 1,1988.(v) The rate of return shall be the industrial rate associated with Standardand Poor's BBB rating. The rate of return shall be the monthly averagerate as published in<T3> Standard and Poor's Bond Guide</T3> for the first month of the reportingperiod for which the allowance is applicable and shall be effective duringthe reporting period. The rate shall be redetermined at the beginning ofeach subsequent transportation allowance reporting period (which is determinedpursuant to paragraph (c) of this section).(3)(i) The deduction for transportation costs shall be determined on thebasis of the lessee's cost of transporting each product through each individualtransportation system. Where more than one product in a gaseous phase istransported, the allocation of costs to each of the products transportedshall be made in a consistent and equitable manner in the same proportionas the ratio of the volume of each product (excluding waste products whichhave no value) to the volume of all products in the gaseous phase (excludingwaste products which have no value). Except as provided in this paragraph,the lessee may not take an allowance for transporting a product which isnot royalty bearing without MMS approval.(ii) Notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (i), the lessee maypropose to the MMS a cost allocation method on the basis of the valuesof the products transported. MMS shall approve the method unless it determinesthat it is not consistent with the purposes of the regulations in thispart.(4) Where both gaseous and liquid products are transported through thesame transportation system, the lessee shall propose a cost allocationprocedure to MMS. The lessee may use the transportation allowance determinedin accordance with its proposed allocation procedure until MMS issues itsdetermination on the acceptability of the cost allocation. The lessee shallsubmit all relevant data to support its proposal. The initial proposalmust be submitted by June 30, 1988 or within 3 months after the last dayof the month for which the lessee begins the transportation, whicheveris later, unless MMS approves a longer period. The MMS shall then determinethe transportation allowance based upon the lessee's proposal and any additionalinformation MMS deems necessary.(5) A lessee may apply to the MMS for an exception from the requirementthat it compute actual costs in accordance with paragraphs (b)(1) through(b)(4) of this section. The MMS will grant the exception only if the lesseehas a tariff for the transportation system approved by the Federal EnergyRegulatory Commission (FERC) (for both Federal and Indian leases) or astate regulatory agency (for Federal leases). The MMS shall deny the exceptionrequest if it determines that: (i) The tariff is excessive as comparedto arm's-length transportation charges by the lessee or others providingsimilar transportation services; or (ii) if there are no arm's-length transportationcharges by the lessee or others providing similar transportation services,the tariff significantly exceeds the lessee's actual costs for transportationas determined under this section. (c)<T3> Reporting requirements</T3>_(1) <T3>Arm's-length contracts. </T3>(i) With the exception of those transportationallowances specified in paragraphs (c)(1)(v) and (c)(1)(vi) of this section,the lessee shall submit page one of the initial Form MMS-4295 (and Schedule1) prior to, or at the same time as, the transportation allowance determinedpursuant to an arm's-length contract is reported on Form MMS-2014, Reportof Sales and Royalty Remittance. A Form MMS-4295 received by the end ofthe month that the Form MMS-2014 is due shall be considered to be timelyreceived.(ii) The initial Form MMS-4295 shall be effective for a reporting periodbeginning the month that the lessee is first authorized to deduct a transportationallowance and shall continue until the end of the calendar year, or untilthe applicable contract or rate terminates or is modified or amended, whicheveris earlier.(iii) After the initial reporting period and for succeeding reporting periods,lessees must submit page one of Form MMS-4295 (and Schedule 1) within 3months after the end of the calendar year, or after the applicable contractor rate terminates or is modified or amended, whichever is earlier, unlessMMS approves a longer period (during which period the lessee shall continueto use the allowance from the previous reporting period).(iv) The MMS may require that a lessee submit arm's-length transportationcontracts, production agreements, operating agreements, and related documents.Documents shall be submitted within a reasonable time, as determined byMMS.(v) Transportation allowances which are based on arm's-length contractsand which are in effect at the time these regulations become effectivewill be allowed to continue until such allowances terminate. For the purposesof this section, only those allowances that have been approved by MMS inwriting shall qualify as being in effect at the time these regulationsbecome effective.(vi) The MMS may establish, in appropriate circumstances, reporting requirementswhich are different from the requirements of this section.(2) <T3>Non-arm's-length or no contract. </T3>(i) With the exception of thosetransportation allowances specified in paragraphs (c)(2)(v), (c)(2)(vii),and (c)(2)(viii) of this section, the lessee shall submit an initial FormMMS-4295 prior to, or at the same time as, the transportation allowancedetermined pursuant to a non-arm's-length contract or no-contract situationis reported on Form MMS-2014, Report of Sales and Royalty Remittance. AForm MMS-4295 received by the end of the month that the Form MMS-2014 isdue shall be considered to be timely received. The initial report may bebased upon estimated costs.(ii) The initial Form MMS-4295 shall be effective for a reporting periodbeginning the month that the lessee first is authorized to deduct a transportationallowance and shall continue until the end of the calendar year, or untilthe transportation under the non-arm's-length contract or the no contractsituation terminates, whichever is earlier.(iii) For calendar-year reporting periods succeeding the initial reportingperiod, the lessee shall submit a completed Form MMS-4295 containing theactual costs for the previous reporting period. If the transportation iscontinuing, the lessee shall include on Form MMS-4295 its estimated costsfor the next calendar year. The estimated transportation allowance shallbe based on the actual costs for the previous reporting period plus orminus any adjustments which are based on the lessee's knowledge of decreasesor increases which will affect the allowance. Form MMS-4295 must be receivedby MMS within 3 months after the end of the previous reporting period,unless MMS approves a longer period (during which period the lessee shallcontinue to use the allowance from the previous reporting period).(iv) For new transportation facilities or arrangements, the lessee's initialForm MMS-4295 shall include estimates of the allowable transportation costsfor the applicable period. Cost estimates shall be based upon the mostrecently available operations data for the transportation system, or ifsuch data are not available, the lessee shall use estimates based uponindustry data for similar transportation systems.(v) Non-arm's-length contract or no contract based transportation allowanceswhich are in effect at the time these regulations become effective willbe allowed to continue until such allowances terminate. For the purposesof this section, only those allowances that have been approved by MMS inwriting shall qualify as being in effect at the time these regulationsbecome effective.(vi) Upon request by MMS, the lessee shall submit all data used to prepareits Form MMS-4295. The data shall be provided within a reasonable periodof time, as determined by MMS.(vii) The MMS may establish in appropriate circumstances, reporting requirementswhich are different from the requirements of this section.(viii) If the lessee is authorized to use its FERC-approved tariff as itstransportation cost in accordance with subsection (b)(5) of this section,it shall follow the reporting requirements of subsection (c)(1) of thissection.(3) The MMS may establish reporting dates for individual lessees differentthan those specified in this subpart in order to provide more effectiveadministration. Lessees will be notified of any change in their reportingperiod.(4) Transportation allowances must be reported as a separate line itemon Form MMS-2014, unless MMS approves a different reporting procedure.(d) <T3>Interest assessments for incorrect or late reports and failure to report.</T3>(1) If a lessee deducts a transportation allowance on its Form MMS-2014without complying with the requirements of this section, the lessee shallpay interest only on the amount of such deduction until the requirementsof this section are complied with. The lessee also shall repay the amountof any allowance which is disallowed by this section. (2) If a lessee erroneously reports a transportation allowance which resultsin an underpayment of royalties, interest shall be paid on the amount ofthat underpayment.(3) Interest required to be paid by this section shall be determined inaccordance with 30 CFR 218.54.(e) <T3>Adjustments.</T3> (1) If the actual transportation allowance is lessthan the amount the lessee has estimated and taken during the reportingperiod, the lessee shall be required to pay additional royalties due, plusinterest computed pursuant to 30 CFR 218.54, retroactive to the first monththe lessee is authorized to deduct a transportation allowance. If the actualtransportation allowance is greater than the amount the lessee has estimatedand taken during the reporting period, the lessee shall be entitled toa credit without interest.(2) For lessees transporting production from onshore Federal and Indianleases, the lessee must submit a corrected Form MMS-2014 to reflect actualcosts, together with any payment, in accordance with instructions providedby MMS.(3) For lessees transporting gas production from leases on the OCS, ifthe lessee's estimated transportation allowance exceeds the allowance basedon actual costs, the lessee must submit a corrected Form MMS-2014 to reflectactual costs, together with its payment, in accordance with instructionsprovided by MMS. If the lessee's estimated transportation allowance isless than the allowance based on actual costs, the refund procedure willbe specified by MMS.(f) <T3>Actual or theoretical losses. </T3>Notwithstanding any other provisionsof this subpart, for other than arm's-length contracts no cost shall beallowed for transportation which results from payments (either volumetricor for value) for actual or theoretical losses. This section does not applywhen the transportation allowance is based upon a FERC or state regulatoryagency approved tariff.(g) <T3>Other transportation cost determinations. </T3>The provisions of thissection shall apply to determine transportation costs when establishingvalue using a net-back valuation procedure or any other procedure thatrequires deduction of transportation costs.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.158</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Processing allowances_general.</ITAG>(a) Where the value of gas is determined pursuant to andSection; 206.153of this subpart, a deduction shall be allowed for the reasonable actualcosts of processing.(b) Processing costs must be allocated among the gas plant products. Aseparate processing allowance must be determined for each gas plant productand processing plant relationship. Natural gas liquids (NGL's) shall beconsidered as one product.(c)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (d)(2) of this section, the processingallowance shall not be applied against the value of the residue gas. Wherethere is no residue gas MMS may designate an appropriate gas plant productagainst which no allowance may be applied.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(3) of this section, the processingallowance deduction on the basis of an individual product shall not exceed66\2/3\ percent of the value of each gas plant product determined in accordancewith andSection; 206.153 of this subpart (such value to be reduced firstfor any transportation allowances related to postprocessing transportationauthorized by andSection; 206.156 of this subpart).(3) Upon request of a lessee, MMS may approve a processing allowance inexcess of the limitation prescribed by paragraph (c)(2) of this section.The lessee must demonstrate that the processing costs incurred in excessof the limitation prescribed in paragraph (c)(2) of this section were reasonable,actual, and necessary. An application for exception shall contain all relevantand supporting documentation for MMS to make a determination. Under nocircumstances shall the value for royalty purposes of any gas plant productbe reduced to zero.(d)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (d)(2) of this section, no processingcost deduction shall be allowed for the costs of placing lease productsin marketable condition, including dehydration, separation, compression,or storage, even if those functions are performed off the lease or at aprocessing plant. Where gas is processed for the removal of acid gases,commonly referred to as ``sweetening,'' no processing cost deduction shallbe allowed for such costs unless the acid gases removed are further processedinto a gas plant product. In such event, the lessee shall be eligible fora processing allowance as determined in accordance with this subpart. However,MMS will not grant any processing allowance for processing lease productionwhich is not royalty bearing.(2)(i) If the lessee incurs extraordinary costs for processing gas productionfrom a gas production operation, it may apply to MMS for an allowance forthose costs which shall be in addition to any other processing allowanceto which the lessee is entitled pursuant to this section. Such an allowancemay be granted only if the lessee can demonstrate that the costs are, byreference to standard industry conditions and practice, extraordinary,unusual, or unconventional.(ii) Prior MMS approval to continue an extraordinary processing cost allowanceis not required. However, to retain the authority to deduct the allowancethe lessee must report the deduction to MMS in a form and manner prescribedby MMS. (e) If MMS determines that a lessee has improperly determined a processingallowance authorized by this subpart, then the lessee shall pay any additionalroyalties, plus interest determined in accordance with 30 CFR 218.54, orshall be entitled to a credit, without interest.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.159</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determination of processing allowances.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Arm's-length processing contracts.</T3> (1)(i) For processing costsincurred by a lessee pursuant to an arm's-length contract, the processingallowance shall be the reasonable actual costs incurred by the lessee forprocessing the gas under that contract, except as provided in paragraphs(a)(1)(ii) and (a)(1)(iii) of this section, subject to monitoring, review,audit, and adjustment. The lessee shall have the burden of demonstratingthat its contract is arm's-length. Before any deduction may be taken, thelessee must submit a completed page one of Form MMS-4109, Gas ProcessingAllowance Summary Report, in accordance with paragraph (c)(1) of this section.A processing allowance may be claimed retroactively for a period of notmore than 3 months prior to the first day of the month that Form MMS-4109is filed with MMS, unless MMS approves a longer period upon a showing ofgood cause by the lessee.(ii) In conducting reviews and audits, MMS will examine whether the contractreflects more than the consideration actually transferred either directlyor indirectly from the lessee to the processor for the processing. If thecontract reflects more than the total consideration, then the MMS may requirethat the processing allowance be determined in accordance with paragraph(b) of this section.(iii) If the MMS determines that the consideration paid pursuant to anarm's-length processing contract does not reflect the reasonable valueof the processing because of misconduct by or between the contracting parties,or because the lessee otherwise has breached its duty to the lessor tomarket the production for the mutual benefit of the lessee and the lessor,then MMS shall require that the processing allowance be determined in accordancewith paragraph (b) of this section when MMS determines that the value ofthe processing may be unreasonable, MMS will notify the lessee and givethe lessee an opportunity to provide an opportunity to provide writteninformation justifying the lessee's processing costs.(2) If an arm's-length processing contract includes more than one gas plantproduct and the processing costs attributable to each product can be determinedfrom the contract, then the processing costs for each gas plant productshall be determined in accordance with the contract. No allowance may betaken for the costs of processing lease production which is not royalty-bearing.(3) If an arm's-length processing contract includes more than one gas plantproduct and the processing costs attributable to each product cannot bedetermined from the contract, the lessee shall propose an allocation procedureto MMS. The lessee may use its proposed allocation procedure until MMSissues its determination. The lessee shall submit all relevant data tosupport its proposal. The initial proposal must be submitted by [June 30,1988] or within 3 months after the last day of the month for which thelessee requests a processing allowance, whichever is later (unless MMSapproves a longer period). The MMS shall then determine the processingallowance based upon the lessee's proposal and any additional informationMMS deems necessary. No processing allowance will be granted for the costsof processing lease production which is not royalty bearing.(4) Where the lessee's payments for processing under an arm's-length contractare not based on a dollar per unit basis, the lessee shall convert whateverconsideration is paid to a dollar value equivalent for the purposes ofthis section.(b) <T3>Non-arm's-length or no contract.</T3> (1) If a lessee has a non-arm's-lengthprocessing contract or has no contract, including those situations wherethe lessee performs processing for itself, the processing allowance willbe based upon the lessee's reasonable actual costs as provided in thisparagraph. All processing allowances deducted under a non-arm's-lengthor no-contract situation are subject to monitoring, review, audit, andadjustment. Before any estimated or actual deduction may be taken, thelessee must submit a completed Form MMS-4109 in accordance with paragraph(c)(2) of this section. A processing allowance may be claimed retroactivelyfor a period of not more than 3 months prior to the first day of the monththat Form MMS-4109 is filed with MMS, unless MMS approves a longer periodupon a showing of good cause by the lessee. The MMS will monitor the allowancededuction to ensure that deductions are reasonable and allowable. Whennecessary or appropriate, MMS may direct a lessee to modify its estimatedor actual processing allowance.(2) The processing allowance for non-arm's-length or no-contract situationsshall be based upon the lessee's actual costs for processing during thereporting period, including operating and maintenance expenses, overhead,and either depreciation and a return on undepreciated capital investmentin accordance with paragraph (b)(2)(iv)(A) of this section, or a cost equalto the initial depreciable investment in the processing plant multipliedby a rate of return in accordance with paragraph (b)(2)(iv)(B) of thissection. Allowable capital costs are generally those costs for depreciablefixed assets (including costs of delivery and installation of capital equipment)which are an integral part of the processing plant.(i) Allowable operating expenses include: Operations supervision and engineering;operations labor; fuel; utilities; materials; ad valorem property taxes;rent; supplies; and any other directly allocable and attributable operatingexpense which the lessee can document.(ii) Allowable maintenance expenses include: maintenance of the processingplant; maintenance of equipment; maintenance labor; and other directlyallocable and attributable maintenance expenses which the lessee can document.(iii) Overhead directly attributable and allocable to the operation andmaintenance of the processing plant is an allowable expense. State andFederal income taxes and severance taxes, including royalties, are notallowable expenses.(iv) A lessee may use either depreciation or a return on depreciable capitalinvestment. When a lessee has elected to use either method for a processingplant, the lessee may not later elect to change to the other alternativewithout approval of the MMS.(A) To compute depreciation, the lessee may elect to use either a straight-linedepreciation method based on the life of equipment or on the life of thereserves which the processing plant services, or a unit-of-production method.After an election is made, the lessee may not change methods without MMSapproval. A change in ownership of a processing plant shall not alter thedepreciation schedule established by the original processor/lessee forpurposes of the allowance calculation. With or without a change in ownership,a processing plant shall be depreciated only once. Equipment shall notbe depreciated below a reasonable salvage value.(B) The MMS shall allow as a cost an amount equal to the allowable initialcapital investment in the processing plant multiplied by the rate of returndetermined pursuant to paragraph (b)(2)(v) of this section. No allowanceshall be provided for depreciation. This alternative shall apply only toplants first placed in service after March 1, 1988.(v) The rate of return shall be the industrial rate associated with Standardand Poor's BBB rating. The rate of return shall be the monthly averagerate as published in <T3>Standard and Poor's Bond Guide</T3> for the first month of the reportingperiod for which the allowance is applicable and shall be effective duringthe reporting period. The rate shall be redetermined at the beginning ofeach subsequent processing allowance reporting period (which is determinedpursuant to paragraph (c)(2) of this section).(3) The processing allowance for each gas plant product shall be determinedbased on the lessee's reasonable and actual cost of processing the gas.Allocation of costs to each gas plant product shall be based upon generallyaccepted accounting principles. The lessee may not take an allowance forthe costs of processing lease production which is not royalty bearing.(4) A lessee may apply to MMS for an exception from the requirement thatit compute actual costs in accordance with paragraphs (b)(1) through (b)(3)of this section. The MMS may grant the exception only if: (i) The lesseehas arm's-length contracts for processing other gas production at the sameprocessing plant; and (ii) at least 50 percent of the gas processed annuallyat the plant is processed pursuant to arm's-length processing contracts;if the MMS grants the exception, the lessee shall use as its processingallowance the volume weighted average prices charged other persons pursuantto arm's-length contracts for processing at the same plant.(c) <T3>Reporting requirements.</T3> (1) Arm's-length contracts. (i) With theexception of those processing allowances specified in paragraphs (c)(1)(v)and (c)(1)(vi) of this section, the lessee shall submit page one of theinitial Form MMS-4109 (and Schedule 1) prior to the time, or at the sametime as, the processing allowance determined pursuant to an arm's-lengthcontract is reported on Form MMS-2014, Report of Sales and Royalty Remittance.A Form MMS-4109 received by the end of the month that the Form MMS-2014is due shall be considered to be timely received.(ii) The initial Form MMS-4109 shall be effective for a reporting periodbeginning the month that the lessee is first authorized to deduct a processingallowance and shall continue until the end of the calendar year, or untilthe applicable contract or rate terminates or is modified or amended, whicheveris earlier.(iii) After the initial reporting period and for succeeding reporting periods,lessees must submit page one of Form MMS-4109 within 3 months after theend of the calendar year, or after the applicable contract or rate terminatesor is modified or amended, whichever is earlier, unless MMS approves alonger period (during which period the lessee shall continue to use theallowance from the previous reporting period).(iv) The MMS may require that a lessee submit arm's-length processing contractsand related documents. Documents shall be submitted within a reasonabletime, as determined by MMS.(v) Processing allowances which are based on arm's-length contracts andwhich are in effect at the time these regulations become effective willbe allowed to continue until such allowances terminate. For the purposeof this section, only those allowances that have been approved by MMS inwriting shall qualify as being in effect at the time these regulationsbecame effective.(vi) The MMS may establish, in appropriate circumstances, reporting requirementswhich are different from the requirements of this section.(2) Non-arm's-length or no contract. (i) With the exception of those processing allowances specified in paragraphs(c)(2)(v), (c)(2)(vii) and (c)(2)(viii) of this section, the lessee shallsubmit an initial Form MMS-4109 prior to, or at the same time as, the processingallowance determined pursuant to a non-arm's-length contract or no contractsituation is reported on Form MMS-2014, Report of Sales and Royalty Remittance.A Form MMS-4109 received by the end of the month that the Form MMS-2014is due shall be considered to be timely received. The initial report maybe based upon estimated costs.(ii) The initial Form MMS-4109 shall be effective for a reporting periodbeginning the month that the lessee first is authorized to deduct a processingallowance and shall continue until the end of the calendar year, or untilthe processing under the non-arm's-length contract or the no-contract situationterminates, whichever is earlier.(iii) For calendar-year reporting periods succeeding the initial reportingperiod, the lessee shall submit a completed Form MMS-4109 containing theactual costs for the previous reporting period. If gas processing is continuing,the lessee shall include on Form MMS-4109 its estimated costs for the nextcalendar year. The estimated gas processing allowance shall be based onthe actual costs for the previous period plus or minus any adjustmentswhich are based on the lessee's knowledge of decreases or increases whichwill affect the allowance. Form MMS-4109 must be received by MMS within3 months after the end of the previous reporting period, unless MMS approvesa longer period (during which period the lessee shall continue to use theallowance from the previous reporting period).(iv) For new processing plants, the lessee's initial Form MMS-4109 shallinclude estimates of the allowable gas processing costs for the applicableperiod. Cost estimates shall be based upon the most recently availableoperations data for the plant, or if such data are not available, the lesseeshall use estimates based upon industry data for similar gas processingplants.(v) Processing allowances based on non-arm's-length or nocontract situationswhich are in effect at the time these regulations become effective willbe allowed to continue until such allowances terminate for gas productionfrom onshore Federal and Indian leases. For gas production from OCS leasessuch allowances will be allowed to continue until they terminate or untilthe end of the calendar year, whichever is earlier. For the purposes ofthis section, only those allowances that have been approved by MMS in writingshall qualify as being in effect at the time these regulations become effective.(vi) Upon request by MMS, the lessee shall submit all data used by thelessee to prepare its Form MMS-4109. The data shall be provided withina reasonable period of time, as determined by MMS.(vii) The MMS may establish, in appropriate circumstances, reporting requirementswhich are different from the requirements of this section.(viii) If the lessee is authorized to use the volume weighted average pricescharged other persons as its processing allowance in accordance with paragraph(b)(4) of this section, it shall follow the reporting requirements of paragraph(c)(1) of this section.(3) The MMS may establish reporting dates for individual leases differentfrom those specified in this subpart in order to provide more effectiveadministration. Lessees will be notified of any change in their reportingperiod.(4) Processing allowances must be reported as a separate line on the FormMMS-2014, unless MMS approves a different reporting procedure.(d) <T3>Interest assessments for incorrect or late reports and failure to report.</T3>(1) If a lessee deducts a processing allowance on its Form MMS-2014 withoutcomplying with the requirements of this section, the lessee shall pay interestonly on the amount of such deduction until the requirements of this sectionare complied with. The lessee also shall repay the amount of any allowancewhich is disallowed by this section.(2) If a lessee erroneously reports a processing allowance which resultsin an underpayment of royalties, interest shall be paid on the amount ofthat underpayment. (3) Interest required to be paid by this section shall be determined inaccordance with 30 CFR 218.54.(e) <T3>Adjustments.</T3> (1) If the actual gas processing allowance is lessthan the amount the lessee has estimated and taken during the reportingperiod, the lessee shall be required to pay additional royalties due plusinterest computed pursuant to 30 CFR 218.54, retroactive to the first dayof the first month the lessee is authorized to deduct a processing allowance.If the actual processing allowance is greater than the amount the lesseehas estimated and taken during the reporting period, the lessee shall beentitled to a credit without interest.(2) For lessees processing production from onshore Federal and Indian leases,the lessee must submit a corrected Form MMS-2014 to reflect actual costs,together with any payment, in accordance with instructions provided byMMS. (3) For lessees processing gas production from leases on the OCS, if thelessee's estimated processing allowance exceeds the allowance based onactual costs, the lessee must submit a corrected Form MMS-2014 to reflectactual costs, together with its payment, in accordance with instructionsprovided by MMS. If the lessee's estimated costs were less than the actualcosts, the refund procedure will be specified by MMS.(f) <T3>Other processing cost determinations. </T3>The provisions of this sectionshall apply to determine processing costs when establishing value usinga net back valuation procedure or any other procedure that requires deductionof processing costs.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-491 Filed 1-14-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4310-MR-D </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>